@relation F__reuters_RetuersData_Train

@attribute text string
@attribute @@class@@ {gas,crude,ship,gnp,acq}

@data
'Abu Dhabi\'s offshore Abu al-Bukhoosh oilfield in the Gulf, shut since an aerial attack last November, will reopen when new anti-aircraft defences are ready, and this could be in the next two months, oil industry sources said.     They said the Abu Dhabi government and Compagnie Francaise des Petroles (Total) TPN.PA, whose Total Abu al-Bukhoosh subsidiary owns 51 pct of the field, have agreed on the reopening, but that a date has not been definitely fixed.     Unidentified planes hit the field, 100 miles off Abu Dhabi, last November 25.     The raid killed eight workers and destroyed the main living quarters and a bridge linking a wellhead to the main production platform.     Western diplomats in the region say Iran was responsible but Tehran has blamed its Gulf War enemy Iraq.     Abu al-Bukhoosh was producing 57,000 barrels per day (bpd) at the time of the attack, but the sources said it would resume at a maximum of half that level because of reduced staff and the fact only four of five wellheads were now operable.     The sources said only 80 personnel can be housed in remaining accomodations, the sources said.     Facilities being installed to protect the field include aircraft detection equipment, anti-aircraft missiles, housing for military personnel and helicopter landing pads, the sources said.     Abu Dhabi is the largest oil producer in the United Arab Emirates, accounting for about 800,000 bpd of its total 1.15 mln bpd production, the sources said.     They also said Iran was working to reopen its Sassan field, part of the same reservoir as Abu al-Bukhoosh and located only a few miles away. Sassan was heavily damaged by an Iraqi air raid only 10 days before Abu al-Bukhoosh was attacked.  \n',crude
'The U.S. Amoco Petroleum Corp has reported an offshore oil find at its Pearl River basin concession in the South China Sea, the New China News Agency said.     It said the Liu Hua 11-1-1 A well produced at around 2,240 barrels per day at a depth of 305 metres.     The news agency said Amoco plans to drill a second well in the area this year, but gave no further details.  \n',crude
'American Petroleum Institute President Charles DiBona said no options should be rejected to combat  growing U.S. dependence on foreign oil.     \"No action should be ruled out--import fees or quotas, floor prices, tax incentives or other alternatives--while a national dialogue on the issue continues,\" DiBona said at a  paper institute conference in New York today.     DiBona said there is no unanimity within the industry on how to stimulate energy production but there is consensus on removing several government policies that hinder investments in new prospects.     DiBona said the windfall profit tax should be abolished immediately and current proposals for increased environmental regulations on acid rain and waste disposal should be not adopted. He also suggested that the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge in Alaska should be opened up for leasing to oil companies, DiBona said.     \"This is a battle the industry cannot afford to lose if the nation is to continue to benefit from Alaskan oil,\" DiBona said. Since 1986 U.S. oil production has fallen while consumption rose and that has raised dependence on imported oil, particularly from OPEC, DiBona said.      \n',crude
'Estimated oil and gas drilling completions in the United States dropped by almost 41 per cent in 1986 from 1985, the American Petroleum Institute said.     API, an industry group, said that of the 42,387 wells completed last year, a total of 19,741 were oil wells, 8,645 were natural gas wells and 14,001 were dry holes.     In 1985, a total of 71,539 wells were drilled - 36,834 oil wells, 13,036 gas wells and 21,669 dry holes.  \n',crude
'Distillate fuel stocks held in primary storage fell by 7.35 mln barrels in the week ended March 13 to 112.74 mln barrels from a revised 120.09 mln the previous week, the American Petroleum Institute (API) said.     In its weekly statistical bulletin, the oil industry trade group said gasoline stocks fell 2.89 mln barrels to 248.44 mln barrels from a revised 251.33 mln, and crude oil stocks dropped 4.39 mln barrels to 325.13 mln from a revised 329.52 mln.     It said residual fuel stocks fell 250,000 barrels to 35.73 mln from 35.98 mln barrels.     API said refinery runs in the week rose to 11.80 mln barrels per day (bpd) from a revised 11.70 mln and refinery use of operating capacity was 75.7 pct, up from a revised 75.0 pct.     Crude oil imports in the week rose to 3.66 mln bpd from a revised 2.67 mln, API added.  \n',crude
'The American Petroleum Institute said that U.S. crude oil production in February declined 9.8 pct from year-ago levels to about 8.3 mln barrels a day.     In its monthly report on U.S. oil supplies and stocks, API said that domestic demand for petroleum products, as measured by products supplied, continued to rise reaching 16.3 mln barrels a day in the month, up 1.5 pct from February 1986.     API noted the drop in crude oil output coupled with a drop in natural gas liquids production, which was off 11 pct from February 1986 levels, represented a decline in U.S. production of more than one mln barrels a day.     API said the decline in domestic production and the rise in demand brought petroleum imports to about six mln barrels a day in February, a 30.3 pct increase from last year\'s level.     So far this year, API said growth in domestic demand, which was up 2.9 pct from last year\'s year-to-date level, has slowed in comparison to the accelerated growth in the last half of 1986.     It said crude oil production for the first two months of 1987 was off 8.6 pct from the comparable year-ago period while crude imports were up 30.6 pct.  \n',crude
'Argentine crude oil production was down 10.8 pct in January 1987 to 12.32 mln barrels, from 13.81 mln barrels in January 1986, Yacimientos Petroliferos Fiscales said.     January 1987 natural gas output totalled 1.15 billion cubic metrers, 3.6 pct higher than 1.11 billion cubic metres produced in January 1986, Yacimientos Petroliferos Fiscales added.  \n',crude
'Argentina\'s total oil and gas production fell 9.4 pct in February to 2.78 mln cubic metres from January\'s total of 3.11 mln cubic metres, the state oil company Yacimientos Petroliferos Fiscales (YPF) reported.     A YPF statement blamed the drop on momentary problems owing to the summer season but gave no further details.     February\'s production figure fell slightly short of YPF\'s target figure of 2.90 mln cubic metres.     Oil production totalled 1.76 mln cubic metres last month and natural gas production 1.02 mln cubic metres, down from 1.95 and 1.15 mln cubic metres in January, respectively.  \n',crude
'Continuous rebel raids against oil pipelines and foreign exploration camps endanger Colombia\'s present oil bonanza, Franciso Chona, manager of the state-run oil company Ecopetrol said.     \"It seems the subversion wants to end with our oil bonanza,\" he told reporters.     He was speaking after a meeting with Defense Minister Rafael Samudio, military chiefs and Mines and Energy Minister Guillermo Perry to review the security situation in the light of a recent upsurge of leftist guerrilla attacks in the oil-rich Arauca region, bordering Venezuela.     Ecopetrol chief of security, Retired General Carlos Narvaez, said security measures would be stricter and that the armed forces were closely collaborating but gave no details.     Samudio said new plans had been designed and hoped they would be effective. Samudio stressed that, despite the most recent attacks, which cost more than four mln dlrs in damage, the overall situation had improved compared with last December when initial measures were taken to combat a wave of attacks.     Repeated bombings of a vital pipeline from the Cano Limon oilfield to the Caribbean then led to a loss of 51,000 barrels of crude.  \n',crude
'The government\'s over-reliance on revenue from crude oil is adversely affecting Australia\'s economic performance, Australian Petroleum Exploration Association (APEA) chairman Dennis Benbow said.     Over one-third of Australia\'s indirect tax income is derived from oil at a time of falling domestic output and weak crude prices, he told the APEA annual conference here.     This dependence on oil-generated revenue distorts the country\'s economic performance directly by acting as a disincentive to new exploration and indirectly by affecting trading competitiveness through high energy costs, he said.     Australia\'s medium-term liquid fuel self-sufficiency position is posing a major economic threat, yet the government\'s response has been to load new tax burdens on the oil industry, Benbow said.     Domestic oil output from existing fields is expected to fall to 280,000 barrels per day (bpd) in fiscal 1992/93 from 546,000 bpd in 1985/86, reflecting mainly the decline of the Bass Strait fields, he said.     Bass Strait reserves are now two-thirds depleted, with the three largest fields 80 pct depleted, he said.     By 1992/93, Bass Strait output is expected to be just over half the 1985/86 level, assuming a number of so far undeveloped fields are brought on stream and enhanced recovery from existing fields goes ahead, Benbow said.     Government projections of output from as yet undiscovered fields range from 40,000 to 130,000 bpd, he said.     Australian liquid fuel demand is forecast to rise to 680,000 bpd in 1992/93 from 565,000 in 1985/86, implying a crude oil gap of between 270,000 and 360,000 bpd in five years time, he said.     At present world oil prices and the current value of the Australian dollar, annual oil imports in 1992/93 would cost between 3.2 billion and 3.6 billion dlrs, Benbow said.     Despite intensive exploration in the early 1980\'s, the addition to reserves has been inadequate, he said.     For example, the 409 mln barrels discovered in the five years 1980-84 represent about two years\' consumption, he said.     He called on the government to review its tax policies to restore incentive to exploration.  \n',crude
'Australia\'s crude oil tax strategy is probably best tackled in terms of a targeted rather than broadly-based approach, Federal Resources and Energy Minister Gareth Evans told a meeting here.     He told the Australian Petroleum Exploration Association (APEA) annual conference there was a prospect of developing a package that would recognise the government\'s economic priorities while also meeting some of the industry\'s concerns.     Evans was referring to a nearly completed government review of oil taxation.     Evans said there were plenty of examples where targeted approaches to oil industry taxation had produced good results in recent years.     These include the reduction in the top marginal crude excise rate on \'old\' Bass Strait oil found before September 1975 to 80 pct from 87 pct, and the waiver of excise on onshore oil announced last September, he said.     The industry, through the APEA, has been calling for the elimination of secondary taxation on oil in order to boost incentives for prospecting against a background of weak prices and Australia\'s relatively low exploration levels.     \"While nobody wants to add further unnecessary complexity to an already complex taxation regime, I am inclined to favour these kinds of tailored approaches ahead of sweeping changes, which leave (government) revenue much reduced and may still leave a lot of uncertainty as to what individual companies are going to do in major areas,\" Evans said.     He said the government did not intend to change its resource rent taxation (RRT) legislation, now before parliament, in response to industry calls to allow all exploration expenditure in a given area to be deductible.     As previously reported, RRT is a tax of 40 pct limited to highly prospective offshore areas, based on profits after a certain rate of return has been achieved for individual projects.     APEA has said it is not a true profit-based tax because exploration deductibility is limited to successful projects.     Evans said the decision not to change RRT was based more than anything on the government\'s desire to ensure the certainty and stability of the new regime, adding that major investments have already been planned on the existing ground rules.  \n',crude
'The council of the Australian Petroleum Exploration Association (APEA) said it will press on with its campaign for major improvements to Australia\'s petroleum taxation structure.     The council said in a statement the industry was bitterly disappointed by the Australian government\'s position on taxation, as presented in a speech by Resources and Energy Minister Gareth Evans to the APEA conference.     As earlier reported, Evans said he was inclined to target any tax changes rather than take a broad-based approach to secondary taxation of petroleum.     APEA had expected the government to make positive responses to detailed industry submissions seeking the removal of existing secondary tax disincentives to exploration and development, the council said.     It said it plans to reply in detail to issues raised by Evans, but its immediate concern was the decision to proceed with the current resource rental tax (RRT) legislation.     Evans told the conference the government did not plan to accept industry pleas for changes in the legislation to allow deductibility of unsuccessful exploration expenditure.     \"The government\'s unwillingness to allow the deduction of unsuccessful exploration expenditure within the whole offshore area in which RRT applies negates any claim that the tax is profit based,\" the APEA council said.     The government missed a major opportunity to persuade oil exploration companies that it had realistic answers to the industry\'s concerns, despite its recognition of the industry\'s problems, the council said.     The industry has called for the end of all discriminatory secondary taxation of petroleum, citing them as major disincentives at a time of low oil prices.  \n',crude
'A 10 percentage point reduction in the Australian government\'s maximum crude oil levy on old oil would stabilize Bass Straits oil output, resources analyst Ian Story said here.     A reduction to 70 pct from 80 pct would enable Bass Strait output to be maintained at the current rate of 420,000 barrels per day (BPD) for the next year rather than falling to 380,000 BPD in 1987/88, he told the Australian Petroleum Exploration Association annual conference.     Story is an analyst with and a director of Sydney stockbroker Meares and Philips Ltd.     Windfall profits taxes on Bass Strait crude are no longer appropriate in the current economic climate, Story said.     The maximum 80 pct levy on old oil -- that discovered before September 1975 -- is now forcing the Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd BRKN.S/Exxon Corp XON partnership to shut-in production, accelerating the decline in output and reducing government revenue, he said.     He said the producer return per barrel at a price of 30 Australian dlrs a barrel would rise to 2.07 dlrs from 0.80 dlrs if the levy was cut to 70 pct.     \"The economics at an 80 pct levy are simply not attractive at oil prices below 30 dlrs,\" Story said.     Cutting the maximum levy rate to 70 pct would create higher levels of self-sufficiency, increase government revenue, boost exports and provide incentives for exploration and development, he said.     The government is currently reviewing the oil tax structure.  \n',crude
'Strong winds and high seas today closed Alexandria, Egypt\'s biggest port, and an oil pipeline terminal nearby, officials said.     Facilities of the Suez-Mediterranean Arab Petroleum Pipelines Company at Sidi Kreir, 32 km southeast of Alexandria, were closed this morning after one tanker loaded and sailed.     Officials said that five other tankers were waiting outside the terminal for conditions to improve.  \n',crude
'The Emirates Industrial Bank has predicted a modest economic recovery in the Gulf Arab states following higher oil revenues.     A bank study, carried by the Emirates news agency WAM, said total oil revenues of the six Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) countries were likely to reach 39 billion dlrs this year from 33.5 billion in 1986.     The GCC groups Bahrain, Kuwait, Oman, Qatar, Saudi Arabia and the United Arab Emirates (UAE).     The bank said the improvement would result from higher oil prices made possible by last December\'s OPEC accord to restrain overall group production.     These curbs have pushed up oil prices from around eight dollars a barrel in mid-1986 to around 18 dlrs.     \"All signs point to the possibility of a modest recovery in the economies of these (GCC) countries, although this expected growth will not be similar to that of the (1970s) boom years,\" the study said.     It added, however, that GCC states would experience higher budget deficits this year because of needs arising from past recession and the difficulty of making fresh spending cuts.     The study said the combined GCC bugdet deficits would rise to 23.2 billion dlrs from 17.9 billion last year.     It said lower oil exports cut the GCC states\' combined trade surplus to 18 billion dlrs in 1986 from 21.5 billion in 1985.     The UAE suffered a 19.5 pct drop in gross domestic product to 77.6 billion dirhams last year from 96.4 billion in 1985, it added.  \n',crude
'The U.S. Department of Energy said it has awarded bids for about 90,000 barrels per day, bpd, of crude oil from the Elk Hills Naval Petroleum Reserve in California. The contract period runs from April one through July one, the DOE said.     Successful bidders, the amount of crude oil and the price per bbl according to the DOE are as follows -      Texaco Inc\'s TX Texaco Trading and Transport 15,000 bpd at 15.79 dlrs and 2,200 bpd at 15.19 dlrs, Beacon Oil Co 7,000 bpd at 15.66 dlrs and 2,500 bpd at 16.04 dlrs, Golden West Refining 8,110 bpd at 15.42 dlrs.     Successful bidders, the amount of oil and price per bbl, according to the DOE continue as follows -     Chevron\'s CHV Chevron USA Inc 3,000 bpd at 14.51 dlrs and 4,000 bpd at 14.61 dlrs, Chevron International Oil Co 2,600 bpd at 14.41 dlrs and 2,800 bpd at 14.51 dlrs, Newhall Refining Co 6,000 bpd at 15.82 dlrs, Caljet Inc 4,000 bpd at 15.32 dlrs, Casey Co 4,000 bpd at 15.45 dlrs.     Also, Cryssen Refining Inc 4,000 bpd at 15.47 dlrs, Edgington Oil Co 4,000 bpd at 15.54 dlrs, Sound Refining Inc 3,100 bpd at 15.51 dlrs, Atlantic Richfield Co ARC 3,000 bpd at 15.75 dlrs.     Successful bidders, the amount of crude oil and the price per bbl according to the DOE continue as follows -     Orkin Inc 2,679 bpd at 15.24 dlrs, Lunday-Thagard Co 2,511 bpd at 15.27 dlrs, Golden Eagle Refining 2,500 bpd at 15.37 dlrs, MacMillan Ring-Free Oil Co 1,000 bpd at 15.81 dlrs, 1,000 bpd at 15.71 dlrs and 230 bpd at 16.02 dlrs, Mock Resources 2,000 bpd at 15.76 dlrs, Petro-Diamond 2,000 bpd at 15.46 dlrs.  \n',crude
'The entire British Petroleum Co PLC refinery at Grangemouth in Scotland has been shut down following the explosion and fire that severely damaged the hydrocracker at the site, a refinery spokesman said.     He said the rest of the 178,500 bpd refinery, including the 19,000 bpd catalytic cracker, was undamaged. The whole refinery was closed pending enquiries but a decision when to reopen the main units will be taken in the next couple of days, he said.     But there was extensive damage to the central part of the 32,000 bpd hydrocracker, which upgrades heavy oil products to gasoline, and it will be out of operation for some months.     The spokesman said BP will not suffer supply shortages as a result of the explosion as it will be able to bring in product from other sources. BP has a 437,000 bpd refinery in Rotterdam, a 181,900 bpd unit at Ingolstadt, West Germany, a 181,900 bpd plant at Lavera in France and a smaller Swedish plant.     He said the explosion and fire, in which one worker was killed, occurred when the hydrocracker was not in operation.     The refinery as a whole had been operating at about half of its capacity since the end of January while an extensive overhaul was carried out on the North Side of the complex where the hydrocracker is sited, he said.     This work was scheduled to be completed by mid-April, but this is now being assessed following the hydrocracker accident.     Two people were killed in an explosion and fire in a flare line at the Grangemouth refinery on March 13, but the spokesman said this incident was some 100 yards from the latest accident.  \n',crude
'The British Petroleum Co Plc BP.L said it had no plans to close its refinery in Gothenburg, despite forecasts by a Swedish finance ministry committee that it might be planning such a move.     The committee said the refinery\'s future looked bleak because the Swedish petroleum industry\'s competitiveness was expected to worsen unless it invested, and because of the effects of a possible tightening of rules on sulphur content.     But BP said the unit, in which Sweden\'s OK Petroleum AB has a 22 pct stake, had performed well both technically and financially up to and including the first quarter of 1987.     Current restrictions on sulphur emissions and known future plans for both Sweden and export markets did not cause it any serious problems, it said in a statement.     The refinery started up in 1967 and has an annual capacity of 4.7 mln tonnes.  \n',crude
'The British Petroleum BP.L Co Plc\'s refinery at Grangemouth, Scotland, shut down after an explosion and fire in the hydrocracker on March 22, will probably be back in operation towards the week-end, a refinery spokesman said.     He said the refinery will resume at about half its 178,500 barrels per day (bpd) capacity, as work on overhauling the North Side of the complex, which began at the end of January, will not be completed before the end of April.     He said the refinery had been closed for longer than originally expected due to the lengthy safety checks being carried out prior to restarting.     The explosion and fire, in which one worker was killed, caused extensive damage to the central part of the 32,000 hydrocracker and the spokesman said today this unit would be out of operation for several months. The remainder of the refinery, including the 19,000 catalytic cracker, was undamaged.     He said inquiries into the accident, which happened while the hydrocracker was not in operation, were continuing.     In an earlier incident, two people were killed in an explosion and fire at the refinery on March 13.  \n',crude
'The British Petroleum Co PLC (BP.L) oil refinery at Grangemouth, closed after an explosion and fire eight days ago, is expected to partially reopen next week, a refinery spokesman said.     He said the entire 178,500 bpd refinery has been shut since the accident which killed one person and damaged the site\'s hydrocracker. The main units will resume operation next week but the hydrocracker will be closed for an unspecified period. The spokesman said the refinery had been operating at about half its capacity since end-January due to overhaul work on part of the complex. The overhaul is expected to end by late April.  \n',crude
'Brazil\'s state-oil company, Petrobras, cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from Saudi Arabia after the Saudis refused to accept credit guarantees from the Bank of Brazil, a Petrobras official said.     Export director Carlos Santana told a press conference the Saudis were the first suppliers of oil to impose such conditions after Brazil\'s decision to halt interest payment of its commercial debts last month.     The shipment of 2.2 mln barrels represents two days of oil consumption in Brazil.     But Santana said if the Saudis change their minds and decide to respect the terms of the contract, then Petrobras will lift the order to cancel the shipment.     Santana said if the Saudis do not accept Brazil\'s terms by Monday then Petrobras will negotiate elsewhere.     \"Petrobras has been Saudi Arabia\'s traditional client since 1955. If they do not accept our conditions now, it will be much better for us, because with the market prices more or less the same, buying from Iraq and China is an advantage,\" he said.     Iraq and China have barter deals with Brazil, importing Brazilian goods in exchange for oil, but the Saudis buy nothing from Brazil, he said.     Santana said despite a strike threat by oil industry workers and a two-week stoppage by Brazilian seamen, Petrobras oil stocks are \"reasonably balanced.\"      Saudi Arabia is Brazil\'s second biggest oil supplier, with an average 115,000 bpd. Iraq is the main supplier with 235,000 bpd. China comes third, with 58,000 bpd.     \"If the Saudis wish to stop our trade relationship, fine, I am sure that if they do, we will be getting dozens of offers from elsewhere,\" Santana added.  \n',crude
'The Brazilian state oil company Petrobras has made a second oil discovery in the Amazon region, President Jose Sarney said.     He said the well had an initial flow of 150,000 cubic meters of gas and 220 barrels of oil per day. It is situated 14 kilometres from the first well to be discovered in the region last year, which is currently yielding 500,000 cubic meters of gas and 900 barrels of oil daily.     The wells, the biggest onshore well in the country, are on the banks of the river Uruc in the Amazon basin 3,600 kilometres (2,250 miles) north of Brasilia.  \n',crude
'Brazilian crude oil and liquefied natural gas production fell to an average 583,747 barrels per day in February from 596,740 in the same 1986 month, the state oil company Petrobras said.     The drop was due to operating problems in the Campos Basin, the country\'s main producing area, where output was down to 346,011 bpd from 357,420, a Petrobras statement said.     Consumption of oil derivatives totalled 1.14 mln bpd in February, 16.7 pct up on February last year but down from the record 1.22 mln bpd used in October last year. Use of alcohol fuel in February was 208,600 bpd, 42 pct above February, 1986.  \n',crude
'Brazil will import 30,000 barrels per day of crude oil from Kuwait, a spokesman for the state oil company Petrobras said.     He said that, unlike Saudi Arabia, Kuwait did not impose any conditions on Brazil.     Last month, Petrobras cancelled a 40-mln dlr oil purchase from Saudi Arabia after the Saudis refused to accept credit guarantees from the official Bank of Brazil.     The Saudis eventually lifted the condition and Brazil decided to reconfirm the purchase.     Brazil currently consumes 1.1 mln barrels of oil per day.  \n',crude
'With troops in place in Brazil\'s ports and oil installations, the government of Prersident Jose Sarney today sought to end a wave of labour unrest by a show of force.     Yesterday the government sent thousands of troops supported in some instances by tanks to occupy nine oil refineries and six areas of oil production.     The state-oil company Petrobras requested the intervention because of a threatened strike by 55,000 oil industry employees.     The government had already dispatched more than 1,000 marines to occupy the country\'s main ports after a national seamen\'s strike was ruled illegal last Friday.     The strike by 40,000 seamen, now in its 13th day, represents a stern challenge to the government.     The stoppage has delayed exports at a time when Brazil desperately needs foreign exchange.     It was a deterioration in the country\'s trade balance which precipitated Brazil\'s current debt crisis and the decision on February 20 to suspend interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of commercial debt.     There was no sign today of an early end to the seamen\'s strike, which has badly hit the port of Santos -- the most important in South America -- and the country\'s other main ports.     Small groups of marines armed with submachineguns stand on the quays near the strike-bound ships, but the military presence here is generally discreet.     A total of 800 marines are inside the docks but most are out of sight.     Yesterday marines and police occupied one ship, the Docemarte, seamen\'s leaders said. After explaining to the captain that the strikers faced up to one year in jail because the strike was illegal, the men returned to work.     One of the strike leaders, Elmano Barbosa, said \"it is a psychological war. They are using force and we are using peaceful methods.\"     Port sources said only two Brazilian ships in Santos, the Docemarte and the Henrique Leal, were working.     At the seamen\'s national strike headquarters in Rio de Janeiro, spokesmen say a total of about 190 ships are strike-bound in Brazil and in foreign ports.     Contradicting earlier reports from strike headquarters in Rio de Janeiro, seamen in Santos said the strikers on board ships here were not running out of food.     The current labour unrest is the worst faced by Sarney\'s civilian government since it came to power two years ago.     Yesterday, in a separate protest, hundreds of thousands of farmers held rallies directed largely against high bank interest rates.     The current rash of labour unrest in industry and agriculture stems from the failure of the government\'s now-collapsed Cruzado Plan price freeze.  \n',crude
'Brazilian bank workers voted to launch a nationwide strike this month, compounding labour unrest arising from the failure of the government\'s anti-inflation plan.     At a rally in this city, about 100 km northwest of Sao Paulo, about 5,000 bank workers voted to strike on March 24 unless their demand for 100 pct pay rises is met.     Wilson Gomes de Moura, president of the national confederation which groups the bank employees\' 152 unions representing 700,000 workers, tolds the indefinite stoppage would affect all banks.     The vote came as a stoppage by seamen entered its third week and as 55,000 oil workers threatened action against the state-owned petroleum company Petrobras.     The government ordered thousands of troops into the refineries on Tuesday to forestall any occupation, but the troops were removed yesterday.     Petrobras said it had requested their withdrawal because the refineries were calm and oil workers had indicated their willingess to negotiate next Wednesday. The government has also sent marines into the main ports.     A spokesman at strike headquarters for the seamen in Rio de Janeiro said unions were studying an offer by private shipowners for a 120 pct pay rise.     Seamen employed by two small companies have already accepted a 120 pct pay rise and returned to work, as have about 5,000 seamen employed by Petrobras.     Last week also saw widespread protests by hundreds of thousands of farmers over what they see as unfairly high interest rates charged by banks.     According to official estimates, prices rose by more than 33 pct in the first two months of this year.  \n',crude
'A strike by Brazil\'s 40,000 seafarers who want pay rises of up to 180 pct may have cost the state-owned oil company Petrobras 20 mln dlrs in lost export orders, the company\'s commercial director Arthur de Carvalho was quoted as saying in press reports.     More than 170 ships in Brazil, and about nine more in foreign ports, have been halted by the strike, which began on February 27.     Marines began blockading the ships on Friday after the strike was ruled illegal, and some strikers are running short of food, National Merchants Marine Union president Edson Areias said.  \n',crude
'Brazil\'s labour troubles eased a little today as the authorities announced they were withdrawing troops from the country\'s main oil installations occupied three days ago.     The troops went in at the request of the state-oil company Petrobras because of the threat of a strike by 55,000 oil industry employees.     Petrobras said in a statement today it had requested the withdrawal of the troops. The situation in the refineries was calm, it said, and the employees had indicated their willingness to negotiate a pay deal.     A national seamen\'s strike, however, continued and marines remained in the country\'s main ports. The marines were despatched to the ports after the seamen\'s strike, now two weeks old, was ruled illegal last Friday.     A spokesman at the national strike headquarters in Rio de Janeiro said today a total of l63 ships were strike-bound, 135 in Brazil and 28 in foreign ports.     Yesterday two small companies specialised in the transport of chemicals, Global and Flumar, struck a pay accord with their seamen who have secured a 120 pct increase.     Brazilian newspapers today hailed these agreements as a sign that the national strike could soon come to an end.     Both companies employ fewer than 200 seamen and union leaders said the vast majority of Brazil\'s 40,000 seamen were still on strike.     The threat of a stoppage by oil industry employees appeared today to be receding. Petrobras said in its statement that the company would meet union leaders for pay talks in Rio de Janeiro next Wednesday.     Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto would act as a mediator.     Besides industrial troubles, there has also been considerable unrest this week in the agricultural sector.     On Tuesday hundreds of thousands of farmers held rallies throughout the country to protest against high interest rates.     Television reports showed some of these protests still continuing today, with farmers blockading banks with their vehicles in several towns in the states of Sao Paulo and Parana.     The strikes in Brazil come as the government is trying to extricate itself from a serious debt crisis brought on by a deterioration in its trade balance.     On February 20 President Jose Sarney announced that Brazil was suspending interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of debt to private banks.     Because of the seamen strike exports are being delayed and the country is losing badly needed foreign exchange.  \n',crude
'Britoil Plc\'s BTOL.L exploration expenditure for the U.K. In 1987 was likely to be only about a third of the level in 1986, though overseas expenditure would remain approximately the same, Chief executive David Walker said.     He told reporters following the release of the company\'s 1986 figures that project expenditure would also remain at 1986 levels.     U.K. Project expenditure in 1986 rose to 208 mln stg from 184 mln while exploration expenditure dropped to 87 mln from 156 mln. Overseas exploration fell to 28 mln from 58 mln in 1985.     Earlier, Britoil posted a drop in pretax profit for 1986 to 134 mln stg from 759 mln in 1985, before an extraordinary charge of 50 mln stg on the company\'s U.S. Assets. The results were slightly better than analysts forecast and the share firmed to 231p from 222p at last night\'s close. Chairman Sir Philip Shelbourne said the collapse in the oil price in 1986 had made the period extremely difficult but the company had come through remarkably well.     Provided the recovery in oil prices was maintained, the conditions would be right for a substantially improved performance this year.     He added that the firmness of oil prices in March, when they were normally weaker, made him \"a bit encouraged\" about the prospects for future levels.     Walker added that Britoil would feel confident if the price stayed within a band of 15 dlrs to 20 dlrs a barrel.     Britoil had received some 100 responses to its announcement of a desire to sell the assets and was asking for bids by the latter part of April.     End-year reserves rose to 603 mln barrels of oil compared with 503 mln previously. However, Walker noted that this included a revised definition of reserves.     If 1985 figures were restated along the same lines, the reserve figure would show a drop from 720 mln barrels previously.     Gas reserves also eased to 3,568 billion cubic feet from a restated 3,660 billion. \n',crude
'Caltex Petroleum Corp said it will raise posted prices for naphtha and several grades of residual fuel in Bahrain, effective March 25.      Caltex, a joint venture of Chevron Corp CHV and Texaco INC TX, said its naphtha posting is up four cts a gallon to 43 cts. It said it is raising its marine diesel oil posting by 30 cts a barrel to 20.24 dlrs a barrel.     Light, medium, and heavy fuel oil postings are up 1.50 dlrs a barrel, the company said. This will bring the light fuel oil price to 16.90 dlrs, medium to 15.50 dlrs, and heavy to 14.60 dlrs, the company said.  \n',crude
'Canada Northwest Energy Ltd said it reached agreement in principle to sell one mln preferred shares by way of private placement to raise 32.5 mln dlrs for oil and gas exploration.     The 5.4 pct cumulative redeemable convertible series D preferred shares will be flow-through shares entitling holders to tax deductions not claimed by the company.     The shares will be convertible anytime after issue into common shares at an equivalent conversion price of 32.50 dlrs a share. After one year, they will be redeemable at any time by the company at 25 dlrs a share plus accrued dividends.   \n',crude
'Canadian oil exports rose 20 pct in 1986 over the previous year to 33.96 mln cubic meters, while oil imports soared 25.2 pct to 20.58 mln cubic meters, Statistics Canada said.     Production, meanwhile, was unchanged from the previous year at 91.09 mln cubic feet.     Natural gas exports plunged 19.4 pct to 21.09 billion cubic meters, while Canadian sales slipped 4.1 pct to 48.09 billion cubic meters.     The federal agency said that in December oil production fell 4.0 pct to 7.73 mln cubic meters, while exports rose 5.2 pct to 2.84 mln cubic meters and imports rose 12.3 pct to 2.1 mln cubic meters.     Natural gas exports fell 16.3 pct in the month 2.51 billion cubic meters and Canadian sales eased 10.2 pct to 5.25 billion cubic meters.  \n',crude
'Firmer crude oil prices, government aid packages and corporate spending cuts will help Canada\'s oil industry recover from last year sharp downturn, industry analysts said.     They said there will be significant earnings gains in 1987 compared to last year\'s dismal results when oil prices dropped about 50 pct.     On Canada\'s stock exchanges, energy shares have soared to their highest levels since 1983, with many issues trading at record highs.     \"This is reflecting a tremendous amount of optimism on the part of the investment community that the outlook for the industry for the future is extremely attractive,\" Peters and Co Ltd oil analyst Wilf Gobert said.     Financial statements from Canada\'s major oil companies, culminating with Dome Petroleum Ltd\'s 2.20 billion Canadian dlr 1986 loss reported this week, painted a bleak picture of last year\'s results, analysts said.     \"But the financial statements are a snap shot and a recording of history. The stock market is the indication of the future,\" Gobert commented.     The Toronto Stock Exchange\'s oil and gas index of 41 companies is up to 4065.4 so far in trading today from 3053.15 at the end of 1986.     Among Canada\'s largest oil companies, class A shares of Imperial Oil Ltd IMO.A, 70 pct owned by Exxon Corp XON, is trading at 71, up from a 52-week low of 34-3/4.     Shell Canada Ltd, 72 pct owned by Royal Dutch/Shell Group, is at 40-1/2, up from a low during the last year of 18-3/4. Texaco Canada Inc TXC, 78 pct owned by Texaco Inc TX, is at 34-7/8, up from a low of 24-1/2.     Levesque Beaubien Inc oil analyst Robert Plexman forecasts operating profit for 10 of Canada\'s largest oil and gas companies will rise 37 pct in 1987 to about 1.44 billion dlrs and operating cash flow will increase 12 pct to 3.24 billion dlrs, based on an average oil price for the year of 16.50 U.S. dlrs a barrel. \"However, if prices hold about 18 U.S. dlrs a barrel...1987 net operating income could show a 69 pct increase with cash flow 27 pct higher,\" analyst Plexman said.     \"Although it is difficult to forecast the extent of the profit improvement this year, the gain should be significant,\" he added.     Those improvements follow a sharp downturn in 1986, when operating income for the ten companies dropped 47 pct to 1.05 billion dlrs and operating cash flow fell 22 pct to 2.90 billion dlrs.     But one industry source doesn\'t think oil prices will hold recent gains and more government assistance is needed.     Canadian Petroleum Association technical director Hans Maciej sees industry cash flow falling another 10 pct in 1987, after dipping about 60 pct last year. Maciej said he sees crude oil supply outweighing demand and doesn\'t believe a recent OPEC production accord will continue to support prices.     However, several companies share the optimistic industry outlook expressed by a majority of analysts.     Shell Canada and Norcen Energy Resources Ltd forecast improved 1987 earnings in their annual reports issued this week, assuming oil prices remain at or above 1986 levels.     \"The industry\'s outlook for 1987 is positive, but not robust,\" Texaco Canada said in its annual report.     \"While oil prices have strengthened somewhat and there is good reason to believe that the general level is sustainable, continued volatility is likely,\" Texaco Canada added.     In the face of short-term uncertainty, many companies have pared 1987 spending plans from last year\'s lower levels, deferring most frontier exploration work.     \"The industry is becoming very selective in investments, very conservative and cautious, which is not unexpected,\" Canadian Petroleum Association\'s Maciej said.     Federal and Alberta goverment aid measures helped cushion the industry downturn in 1986 and are improving 1987 results.     The most significant help came last September when the federal government lifted the 10 pct Petroleum Gas Revenue Tax (PGRT) 28 months earlier then planned.     Analysts estimate the tax relief will save larger oil companies about 1.50 billion dlrs by the end of 1988.     The PGRT cut helped brake the steep profit and cash flow decline in 1986 for many oil companies and prevented further exploration spending cuts, analysts said.     \"For a number of companies, the PGRT cut was absolutely necessary to even maintain the kind of reduced investments that were made, otherwise the reduction would have been considerably more,\" Maciej said.    \n',crude
'Canada\'s federal government will provide a 350 mln dlr oil industry aid package that includes cash incentives designed to cover one-third of a company\'s oil and gas exploration and development costs, Energy Minister Marcel Masse announced.     The aid program will inject about 350 mln dlrs a year into the oil and gas industry and could lead to more than one billion dlrs in new investment, Masse told a news conference.     The program will affect drilling done anywhere in Canada on or after April 1, 1987.     Masse told reporters that the government\'s oil industry aid package is aimed at small and medium sized companies.     The aid package, called the Canadian Exploration and Development Incentive Program, will restrict the total payments that any individual company can claim to 10 mln dlrs a year.     Masse said the program will probably generate new employment equivalent to 20,000 people working for a year.     He said oil industry aid is needed because exploration and development spending dropped by at least 50 pct since world oil prices fell during the first half of 1986.     Energy Minister Masse said the federal government decided to provide cash incentives so a large number of non-tax paying companies, mainly small Canadian firms, will receive the full value of the incentive. Such companies would not immediately benefit from tax benefits, he said.     The federal government also wanted to deliver an aid program outside the tax system. Finance Minister Michael Wilson is now reviewing Canada\'s tax system and plans to announce tax reform proposals later this spring.     An important feature of the aid program is a decision to let companies issue flow-through shares, allowing investors to benefit from the subsidy rather than restricting benefits to only participating companies, he said.     Allowing flow-through shares under the program will make it easier for companies to attract investors in exploration and development, Masse said.     He told reporters his department is still considering whether to allow partnerships and other entities to qualify for the subsidy.  \n',crude
'Petro-Canada, the state-owned oil company, said it raised the contract price it will pay for crude oil 64 Canadian cts a barrel, effective March six.     Petro-Canada\'s posted price for the benchmark light sweet grade, Edmonton/Swann Hills at 40 api gravity, now stands at 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl. Their light sour grade is posted at 19.88 Canadian dlrs/bbl.     Earlier today, Shell Canada SHC said it raised its crude postings about 47 Canadian cts/bbl, bringing Edmonton light sweet to 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl, and the light sour crude to 19.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl.     Imperial oil IMO.A, a 70 pct owned subsidiary of Exxon Corp, said that effective March five it also raised its light sweet crude posting to 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl.  \n',crude
'Canadian Roxy Petroleum Ltd said a new oil discovery in the Peerless Lake area of north-central Alberta is capable of flowing at over 1,000 barrels of oil a day from a lower zone and more than 1,500 barrels a day from a separate upper zone.     Canadian Roxy has a 35 pct interest in the five-year royalty free well, known as the Canadian Roxy et Al Trout A14-8-89-3 W5M. Texaco Canada Inc holds 25 pct, MLC Oil and Gas Ltd 15 pct, Northstar Energy Corp 13.5 pct and Tricentrol Oils Ltd 11.5 pct.     Canadian Roxy said drilling has started on a follow-up exploratory well about one mile northwest of the discovery well.     The company said it holds a net 6,500 acres in the vicinity of the discovery and a seismic program is underway to evaluate further drilling opportunities.  \n',crude
'Canterra Energy Ltd said it will drill an exploratory well on the Scotian shelf, about 280 kilometers east-southeast of Halifax, Nova Scotia.     Drilling will begin in late April 1987 in 61 meters of water and will be drilled to a total depth of 3,500 meters, Canterra said.     Canterra will operate the well and has a 39 pct interest in it. Petro-Canada Inc has 26 pct, Trillium Exploration Corp has 20 pct and Nova Scotia Resources (Ventures) Ltd has 15 pct.  \n',crude
'China has closed the second round of bidding by foreign firms for offshore oil exploration rights, the China Daily has reported.     It quoted a spokesman for the China National Offshore Oil Corp (CNOOC) as saying China signed eight contracts with 15 foreign firms for blocks in the Pearl River mouth and south Yellow Sea covering a total area of 44,913 sq km.     Second round bidding began at the end of 1984 and only one well has so far produced results -- Lufeng 13-1-1, 250 km south-east of Shenzhen, with an output of 6,770 barrels a day. The well was drilled by a group of Japanese companies.     The spokesman added CNOOC was ready to enter into contracts for offshore blocks before third round bidding began. He did not say when this would be, but added the contracts would not be bound by restrictions imposed during the second round.     China has signed 36 oil contracts and agreements with 37 companies from 10 countries since 1979, when offshore exploration was open to foreigners. Eleven contracts were terminated after no oil was discovered.     Foreign firms have invested 2.1 billion dlrs on offshore China since 1979.  \n',crude
'A Swedish Finance Ministry committee forecast that British Petroleum Plc BP.L may have to close its refinery in Gothenburg because of an anticipated worsening of the Swedish petroleum industry\'s competitiveness.     It said in a report that the future of the Swedish refining business was bleak due to the steady drop in domestic oil consumption since the mid-1970s, a possible tightening of rules on sulphur content and competition from Norway\'s Mongstad facility of Den Norske Stats Olieselskab (Statoil) STAT.OL when its expansion is completed in the 1990s.     The committee said the BP refinery, which lacks a de-sulphurisation plant, was likely to be closed or sold unless costly investments were made to enhance the facility\'s capacity to refine a broader range of products.     But the committee noted that capacity utilisation had in recent years been above that of the European refining industry on average. The BP plant, in which Sweden\'s state-owned OK Petroleum AB has a 22 pct, started up in 1967 and has an annual capacity of 4.7 mln tonnes.     There was nobody at British Petroleum immediately available for comment. \n',crude
'State-run oil company Ecopetrol said Colombia\'s main oil pipeline was bombed again and pumping of 170,000 barrels per day was suspended.     A spokeswoman for the company said that the early morning dynamite attack was the 31st in the last nine months on the Cano Limon-Covenas pipeline, which links Colombia\'s biggest oilfied at Cravo Norte to the Caribbean.     She said about 2,000 barrels of crude were spilled and could not indicate when pumping would resume. The attack was near Magangue in northeastern Bolivar province.     Ecopetrol is exploiting Cravo Norte in association with Occidental Petroleum Corp OXY and Shell Petroleum N.V., a unit of the Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD ST.     Ecopetrol said in a communique that bombings since last July led to a loss of more than 110,000 barrels of crude, or the equivalent of 10 mln dlrs.  \n',crude
'Colombian oil installations were not damaged by an earthquake which shook Ecuador and southern Colombia last night and there are no plans to suspend exports, a spokesman for the state-run oil company Ecopetrol said.     He said no damage was reported, unlike in Ecuador where indefinite force majeure was declared on crude exports.     Colombia currently produces about 360,000 barrels per day (bpd) of crude. Exports in january totalled 123,000 bpd.     The quake, which in Colombia measured between 6.5 and seven on the 12-point international Mercalli scale, caused panic among residents but no injuries were reported.  \n',crude
'Renewed confidence in OPEC\'s ability to limit production helped U.S. energy futures settle above yesterday\'s closing prices, according to analysts.     They also said the heating oil contract found additional support from a short-covering rally on the close.     April crude closed 24 cts higher to 17.75 dlrs. April heating oil was 1.47 cts higher to 47.91 cts a gallon.     \"Most traders expected follow through profit-taking from yesterday but the market found suport from bullish reports that OPEC is producing within its quota,\" said Simon Greenshields, a vice president with Morgan Stanley and Co Inc.     News today, including OPEC President Rilwanu Lukman statement that OPEC February production did not exceed its official quota of 15.8 mln barrels per day, helped bouy prices, traders said. A survey found OPEC production in early March was 14.7 mln bpd.     In addition to short-covering, heating oil found support from traders buying it against sales of gasoline and crude, as well as from expectations for continued drawdowns in stocks as refiners shut down for maintenance, traders said.     Unleaded gasoline for April finished 0.55 cent higher to 51.24 cts a gallon.  \n',crude
'Cooperative Energy Development Corp said two exploratory oil wells in the Zama area of Alberta tested 1,020 and 950 barrels a day, and will increase the company\'s daily oil production by 30 pct.     The company did not immediately elaborate on total production figures.     The wells, flowing oil from the Keg River formation, will be constrained to combined production of about 450 barrels a day to optimize reserve recovery, the company said.     Permanent production facilities are being installed and the wells will produce to pipeline by mid-April.  \n',crude
'Crude oil netback values in complex refineries rose slightly in the U.S. and the Mediterranean  last Friday from the previous week but were lower elsewhere, according to calculations bys Pipeline.     The soft tone to refining margins reflects large worldwide stocks of petroleum products and thin trading activity, traders said.     In the U.S. Gulf, sweet crudes rose in value by as much as 26 cts a barrel for West Texas Intermediate, an increase of 1.4 pct from the previous Friday, while sour crudes, such as Alaska North Slope, were up one pct.     In the Mediterranean, netback values were up 17 cts to 22 cts a barrel, with Arab Light up 17 cts a barrel to 18.62 dlrs, a 0.9 pct increase from the previous Friday and Urals were up 22 cts a barrel to 19.16 dlrs, a 1.2 pct increase.     But netbacks for crude oil refined in Northern Europe was generally lower with Brent valued at 18.89 dlrs, off 30 cts from the previous friday, and Bonny Light was off 17 cts to 19.58 dlrs a barrel.     Refinery netbacks in Singapore were also lower, with heavier and sour crudes weakest. Arab Heavy dropped 10 cts to 16.63 dlrs a barrel and Dubai was off 12 cts to 18.09 dlrs.     On the U.S. West Coast, however, netback values for ANS CIF L.A. were weaker with weak gasoline prices sending the yield at cracking plants down 68 cts to 18.42 dlrs from the previous Friday, as shown below in dlrs a barrel. TOPPING.........15.63......16.10......14.30 CRACKING........18.42......19.10......16.86     The Mediterranean region also showed netback values rising last Friday over the previous week with the largest gains shown by Es Sider and the heavier Urals crude oil, which were each up 22 cts a barrel last Friday to 19.40 dlrs and 19.16 dlrs a barrel, respectively.     Netback values for the mediterranean region are shown below in dlrs a barrel. GRADE...........MAR 27.....MAR 20.....FEB 27 ES SIDER........19.40......19.18......16.44 ARAB LIGHT......18.61......18.44......15.52 IRAN LT.........19.25......19.08......16.16 KUWAIT..........18.51......18.33......15.42 URALS cif.......19.16......18.94......16.07     Netbacks in Northern Europe\'s refinery region were lower last friday from the previous week with Brent falling 1.6 pct to 18.89 dlrs a barrel.      Netbacks for other grades of oil refined in Northern Europe are shown below in dlrs a barrel. ................MAR 27.....MAR 20.....FEB 27 BRENT...........18.89......19.19......16.77 BONNY LIGHT.....19.58......19.75......17.15 ARAB LIGHT......18.49......18.52......16.07 URALS CIF.......19.02......18.98......16.54     Refinery netbacks in Singapore were also lower with heavier and sour crudes weakest.     Arab Heavy dropped 10 cts to 16.63 dlrs a barrel and Dubai was off 12 cts to 18.09 dlrs.      Netbacks for other grades of oil refined in Singapore  are shown below in dlrs a barrel. GRADE...........MAR 27.....MAR 20.....FEB 27 ATTAKA..........19.23......19.24......16.72 ARAB LIGHT......18.00......18.10......15.55 OMAN............18.21......18.25......16.31 DUBAI...........18.09......18.21......15.86 ARAB HEAVY......16.63......16.73......14.24  \n',crude
'U.S. crude oil prices rose above 18  dlrs a barrel this week and industry analysts said the price could rise another dollar as inventories fall.     \"OPEC is keeping its production down, and in the cash market there is tight supply of crude with short transportation time to major refining centers,\" said Daniel McKinley, oil analyst with Smith Barney, Harris Upham and Co. \"That could send prices 50 cts to a dollar higher,\" he added.     The U.S. benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate rose to 18.15 dlrs a barrel today, a rise of 1.50 dlrs this week.     The rally in oil prices this week came after prices fell in February more than two dlrs from its high of 18.25 dlrs a barrel.     \"Oil traders were pulling prices down on the assumption that oil stocks were building and OPEC was producing well above its 15.8 mln bpd quota, but now both of those assumptions have come under question,\" McKinley said.     Yesterday the International Energy Agency in its monthly report said that oil stocks in the OECD area, or in industrialized nations, were drawn down by 1.3 mln bpd during the first quarter of this year.     IEA estimates that the draw in oil stocks during the first quarter of this year will come largely from oil companies whose inventory levels by April one will be an estimated 326 mln tonnes, or about 74 days consumption.     Industry analysts also said the estimate of a 3.5 mln bpd draw in stocks made by Shell Chairman Peter Holmes yesterday fed speculation that other major companies were destocking.     Traders said the destocking has come about as a result of a so-called buyers strike, which kept refiners from buying officially priced OPEC oil in an effort to get the organization to offer discounts to the official price.     \"This struggle between the companies and OPEC is the ultimate game of chicken but it will be resolved relatively soon. I would imagine by about the middle of the month (March),\" the general trading manager of an international oil company tolds in a telephone interview.     For its part OPEC has moved to win this game by cutting excess supplies from the market by a reduction of its own output, traders said. A survey estimates OPEC output to be 14.7 mln bpd this week.     Also, an earthquake in Ecuador yesterday led it to suspend oil exports indefintiely and force majeure its shipments.     \"This will reduce short-haul availabilities by about 250,000 bpd almost immediately and the longer the suspension continues, the larger the draw in stocks will be for companies expecting it to be there,\" McKinley said.     International oil traders said that other short-haul crudes, such as North Sea Brent, were also scarce because Asian refiners bought the oil after absorbing a lot of the readily available Mideast crudes earlier this week.     If this pattern continues then oil companies will bid up the price of oil as they purchase for their refineries, trading managers at several companies tolds.     But there were skeptics who said they wondered how long OPEC can retain its unity if buyer resistance continues.     Stephen Hanke, chief economist at Friedburg Commodity Management, said OPEC production was lower \"because of the Saudi cut (to 3.1 mln bpd) and this could spell trouble if it gives other members an incentive to exceed their quotas.\"      He added, \"The Saudis will be picking up the tab for other members who produce over their quota, and the drain on the Saudis will continue, forcing them to cut output maybe as low as 2.5 mln bpd to support the 18 dlrs average price,\" he added.     There are also signs of some OPEC crudes being sold in the spot market at below OPEC official prices, traders said.     Oil traders said Nigerian Brass River sold for delivery into the U.S. Gulf at a price related to North Sea brent, which traded this week at 17.60 dlrs, far below the official price of 18.92 dlrs for the similar quality Bonny Light.     Iranian oil is also surfacing in the U.S. Gulf and the Far East at reported discounts to its 17.50 dlrs official price.     \"There is a lot of oil priced on government-to-government deals, which are below official prices and this is probably being resold,\" one international trader said.  \n',crude
'Diamond Shamrock Corp said that effective today it had cut its contract prices for crude oil by 1.50 dlrs a barrel.     The reduction brings its posted price for West Texas Intermediate to 16.00 dlrs a barrel, the copany said.     \"The price reduction today was made in the light of falling oil product prices and a weak crude oil market,\" a company spokeswoman said.     Diamond is the latest in a line of U.S. oil companies that have cut its contract, or posted, prices over the last two days citing weak oil markets.  \n',crude
'The U.S. Congress and the oil industry are deeply divided on ways the government should assist the industry, hurt by the sharp fall in oil prices, and the subsequent growth in oil imports, industry analysts said.     \"The industry is deeply divided between those who support an oil tariff and those who believe tax incentives are better,\" said Daniel Yergin, director of Cambridge Energy Research Associates, which recently completed a survey of the U.S. Congress on energy issues.     Yergin said he saw mounting support within Congress for tax incentives rather than an oil tariff or import fee.     Today U.S. Energy Secretary John Herington said he will propose tax incentives to increase edomestic oil and natural gas exploration and production to the Reagan Administration for consideration. White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said the proposal would be reviewed.     Herrington said, \"I would like to shoot for one mln barrels a day (addition) to U.S. production.\" U.S. oil output was off to 8.4 mln bpd in the week of March 13, down six pct from last year, the American Petroleum Institute said.     Oil industry analysts have forecast oil prices to average about 18 dlrs a barrel for the year and many believe that a move above that level will be unlikey for the near term.     Paul Mlotok, oil analyst for Salomon Brothers Inc said that \"even with the rise in prices for the last week or two we\'ve only altered our average price scenerio to about 17.50 dlrs for the year.\"     Analysts said that at that price renewed drilling and exploration to reverse the decline in U.S. crude oil output will not take place as the companies are waiting for stable prices over 20 dlrs to renew exploration.     John Lichtblau, president of the Petroleum Industry Research Foundation Inc in New york in recent testimony to Congress said \"The continuing decline in U.S. oil production is virtually inevitable under any realistic price scenario. But the future rate of decline is very much a function of world oil prices and U.S. government policy.\"     Lichtbalu said that tax breaks could be used to raise oil production but would only work over time.     \"Lowering the producing industry\'s tax burden would probably be a slower stimulant (to output) than a price increase but would not raise energy costs.\" Lichtblau said.     But the small independent oil companies who do much of the drilling in the U.S. are looking for the more immediate relief which could be brought on by an oil import fee.     Ronald Tappmeyer, president of the International Association of Drilling Contractors, said, \"The members of our trade asssociation are convinced that only a variable oil import fee that sets a minimum price trigger can protect our nation.\" The association represents some 1,300 drilling and oil service companies.     The CERA survey of Congress shows that the oil import fee will face a stiff uphill battle.     Yergin said that the poll which was conducted in January by a former Congressman, Orval Hansen, showed support for the oil import fee from 22 pct of the Congressmen surveyed largely as a means of protecting the domestic petroleum industry.      At the same time 48 pct of the Congressmen surveyed opposed the fee with the respondents saying the tariff would hurt consumers and some regional interests.     But 80 pct of the sample said support for a fee could grow if production continued to fall and imports to rise.     Yergin said that imports above 50 pct of U.S. requirements \"is a critical, symbolic level. If they (imports) move above that level, a fee may not be legislated but there will certainly be pressure for some form of action.\"      But Lichtblau, in a telephone interview, said, \"a 50 pct rate of import dependency is not likely to happen before 1990.     In 1986 U.S. oil imports rose to 33 pct of u.s. energy requirements and shopuld be about 34 pct in 1987, he added.  \n',crude
'Energy Secretary John Herrington said he believes the Reagan Administration will review its decision to cut the fill rate of the Strategic Petroleum Reserve because of a department report issued yesterday warning of growing U.S. dependence on oil imports.     \"As part of this study, I think the Administration will take the fill rate under review,\" Herrington said at a House Energy subcommittee hearing.     The Administration has proposed cutting the fill rate from 75,000 barrels of oil per day to 35,000 bpd in fiscal year 1988 to save money.     \"My personal feeling is that is too low. I favor the maximum fill rate (of 100,000 bpd),\" Herrington said.  \n',crude
'Energy Secretary John Herrington said he will propose tax incentives to increase domestic oil and natural gas exploration and production to the Reagan Administration for consideration.     \"These options boost production, while avoiding the huge costs associated with proposals like an oil import fee,\" Herrington told a House Energy subcommittee hearing. \"It is my intention to submit these proposals to the domestic policy council and the cabinet for consideration and review.\"     \"The goal of the Administration policies is to increase domestic production. I would like to shoot for one mln barrels a day,\" he said.     The proposals were based on a DOE study released yesterday warning the United States was threatened by a growing dependence on oil imports.     \"We project free world dependence on Persian Gulf oil at 65 pct by 1995,\" Herrington said.  \n',crude
'Tonight\'s American Petroleum Institute oil inventory report is expected to show another drawdown in distillate stocks of between two and 7.5 mln barrels for the week ending March 20, oil analysts and traders said.     They said they expect gasoline inventories to be depleted by about one to four mln barrels.     Analysts were divided on the crude stocks. Some saw stocks unchanged to as much as three mln barrels higher. Others said stocks could be down one to five mln barrels. Crude throughput volumes are expected to be unchanged to slightly higher or lower than the week ended March 13, traders said.     The API recorded a 7.4 mln barrel stockdraw for U.S. distillates in the week ended March 13. Analysts see another  draw reflecting historic seasonal trends.     For the week ended March 13, API reported gasoline stocks down 2.9 mln barrels.     Those expecting a draw of as much as four mln barrels said they are looking for fairly high consumption rates as the spring and summer driving season gets underway this year, because retail prices are still low compared to recent years.     U.S. crude oil stocks were reported down by 4.4 mln barrels for the week ended March 13. Analysts are divided over the outcome for last week because there is uncertainty about whether throughput levels increased or decreased last week.     Some see crude stock levels unchanged to three mln barrels higher, while others think inventories could be as much as five mln barrels below the previous week.     The lower estimates are supported by the belief that crude runs increased and imports fell.     The API reported crude runs 154,000 b/d higher for the week ended March 13. Analysts are calling it unchanged to slightly up or down for the week ended March 20.     Expectations for product stockdraws are already being reflected in firmer prices, traders said. But if draws are at the higher end of the estimated range, they added, the effect will be bullish. Any stockbuild would be a negative factor, they said.     Crude runs normally increase in March, and any decrease in runs would be friendly to the market, said Peter Beutel of Elders Energy Futures Inc.  \n',crude
'OPEC crude oil output in the first few days of March was running at about 14.7 mln bpd, down from a 16 mln bpd average for February and well below the 15.8 mln bpd ceiling the group adopted in December, a survey shows.     The figures were polled bys correspondents from oil traders, industry executives and analysts in Europe, the Middle East, Africa, Latin America and Asia.     They back recent statements by OPEC ministers that the group is producing within its ceiling to support the return to a fixed price system, which came into effect last month.     OPEC output for the whole of February was about 200,000 bpd above the ceiling, largely because of overproduction by the United Arab Emirates and Kuwait, the figures show.     The UAE, together with the much smaller producer Ecuador, was also producing above quota in the first days of March, the survey reveals.     But such overproduction was compensated for by a sharp fall in Saudi Arabian output, together with Iran\"s inability to export as much as its quota allows.     Iraq rejected its OPEC quota of 1.466 mln bpd and produced 1.75 mln bpd in February and early March, the figures showed.     Saudi output -- excluding movements into stocks -- fell to 3.1 mln bpd in early March from 3.5 mln bpd in February, against a 4.133 mln bpd quota. The Saudi figures include a 200,000 bpd share of Neutral Zone production.     Kuwait, which has consistently denied quota violations, was estimated to be pumping 1.4 mln bpd in February and 1.15 in early March -- both figures including 200,000 bpd as its share of Neutral Zone output -- against its 948,000 bpd quota.     Reports of customer resistance to fixed prices set by some OPEC states were reflected in output from Qatar and Nigeria, both substantially under quota in February and early March.     Qatar\'s February output was 230,000 bpd, and this fell to 180,000 bpd in early March compared with its 285,000 bpd quota.     Industry sources say Japanese buyers are resisting Qatar\"s prices and Gulf Arab oil states have pledged to make up for any shortfall in sales which a fellow Gulf state suffers.     Nigeria\'s early March output was about one mln bpd, down from 1.14 mln bpd in February and its quota of 1.238 mln bpd.     Industry sources say Nigeria\'s customers believe its Bonny grades are overpriced compared with compatible Brent crudes from the U.K. North Sea.     Country-by-country production figures are as follows, in mln bpd -  COUNTRY        CURRENT        FEBRUARY    QUOTA  ALGERIA        0.64           0.64        0.635  ECUADOR        0.26           0.26        0.210  GABON          0.15           0.15        0.152  INDONESIA      1.16           1.16        1.133  IRAN           1.80           2.20        2.255  IRAQ           1.75           1.75        1.466  KUWAIT         1.15           1.40        0.948  LIBYA          0.95           0.95        0.948  NIGERIA        1.00           1.14        1.238  QATAR          0.18           0.23        0.285  SAUDI ARABIA   3.10           3.50        4.133  UAE            1.10           1.15        0.902  VENEZUELA      1.50           1.50        1.495  TOTAL          14.7           16.0        15.8   \n',crude
'Higher world oil prices, coupled with a new realism ushered in by austerity, could lift Saudi Arabia\'s economy after five years of falling revenue and growing budget deficits, bankers and diplomats said.     The months ahead will prove critical as the government attempts a balancing act between defending higher oil prices and fostering recovery through a bigger role for the private sector.     Economists said oil earnings could recover this year to about 20 billion dlrs and nominal gross domestic product could grow by about three pct, the first rise since 1982.     But the economists said this will be possible only if the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) succeeds in defending world oil prices and if Saudi Arabia is not forced to curtail output for too long.     Saudi Arabia is now keeping production down to defend OPEC\'s newly-established 18 dlr a barrel benchmark price.     Oil Minister Hisham Nazer tolds output is running at about three mln barrels per day (bpd), well down on Saudi Arabia\'s OPEC quota of 4.13 mln set for the first half of 1987.     King Fahd has stamped his personal authority on OPEC\'s new-found determination to defend prices in a move Western diplomats believe underlines the kingdom\'s need to secure a stable source of income for its economy.     Saudi Arabia, still the world\'s largest oil exporter, is a hugely wealthy country. But the past five years of declining revenue have taken their toll. Economists estimate gross domestic product fell 10 pct last year and 8.6 pct in 1985.     Oil revenue last year, when prices briefly dipped below 10 dlrs per barrel, probably totalled no more than 17.5 billion dlrs, compared to a peak 101.8 billion in 1981.     \"Austerity is still the watchword, but Saudi Arabia will not be allowed to dip further into recession ... The Saudis can afford to draw down reserves temporarily to offset the worst effects,\" a diplomat said.     In the short-term, the kingdom can lessen the impact of lower oil revenues and a gaping budget deficit by drawing on foreign reserves, still put at around 100 billion dlrs.     But such a policy cannot be pursued indefinitely. Bankers and diplomats said it would amount to fiscal recklessness in the longer term.     It also increases the dominance of the public sector at a time when the government is publicly urging private enterprise to take over the lead role in the economy.     Bankers and diplomats said the government is well aware of the risks attached to this policy but is determined to \"tough it out\" on the oil front even if that means a short-term depletion of reserves.     The 1987 budget deficit is targetted at a huge 52.7 billion riyals or 31 pct of total outlay. The budget explicitly recognises the need to draw down reserves while foreign borrowing has been ruled out.     Commerce Minister Suleiman Abdulaziz al-Salim told Saudi businessmen this week the government had carefully considered the need to stimulate the economy when drawing up its budget plans late last year.     \"It therefore took the bold step of withdrawing more than 50 billion riyals from its reserves and pumping it into the economy,\" he said.     Reserves were built up during the late 1970\'s and early 1980\'s when Saudi Arabia\'s breakneck pace of construction and tales of high spending became legendary.     The shrinking economy has wrought huge changes in the fabric of the Kingdom\'s private sector where poor management had gone unpunished in the easy days of the oil boom.     Modern techniques of cost control have been introduced, markets expanded and outsized labour forces and inventories cut back. The expatriate workforce has fallen sharply.     The number of new bankruptcies appears to be declining but Saudi banks, hit hard by non-performing loans to the corporate sector, have become highly selective in extending new credit.     Government moves to encourage lending and investigate company complaints about late public sector contract payments could boost confidence but recession has slowed the nation\'s industrialisation program and discouraged foreign investment.     Private wealth is still very high and banks report more and more cash being placed on deposit.     As Saudi Arabia attempts to shift the weight of economic development from the public to the private sector, one of the biggest tasks will be to convince businessmen to channel personal savings into industrial projects within the kingdom and refrain from the temptation to invest abroad.  \n',crude
'OPEC member Ecuador adopted austerity measures to conserve fuel after oil production was paralyzed by a strong earthquake.     Energy and Mines Minister Javier Espinosa announced on television the country would cut domestic fuel sales by 30 pct. A ministry statement had earlier announced indefinite suspension of crude oil exports, declaring force majeure.     Deputy Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite told a television interviewer that it could possibly take more than a month to repair Ecuador\'s main pipeline linking Amazon basin oil fields to the Pacific Ocean coast.     The quake on Thursday, which registered six on the 12-point Mercalli scale, killed at least six people and was centred near the Reventador volcano about 90 km (50 miles) east of Quito.     Ecuador had recently been pumping 260,000 barrels per day.     The government\'s austerity measures ban the sale of aviation fuel to foreign airliners on international routes and no fuel will be available for ships owned by foreign lines.     Ecuador also banned the sale of petrol on weekends and holidays and limited sales on weekdays, an Energy and Mines Ministry communique said.  \n',crude
'Construction workers today began building a 26 km (16 mile) pipeline to link Ecuador\'s jungle oilfields to a pipeline in Colombia through which Ecuadorean crude could be pumped to the Pacific Coast, Ecuadorean energy minsitry officials said.     They said it would take about two months and at least 15 mln dlrs to build the pipeline from Lago Agrio in Ecuador to Puerto Colon, Colombia for connection to the Colombian pipeline, which goes to the port of Tumaco on Colombia\'s Pacific Ocean coast.     The Lago Agrio to Puerto Colon pipeline is designed to transport between 30,000 to 50,000 barrels of day (bpd) of Ecuadorean crude to the Colombian pipeline, they said.     The Colombian pipeline to Tumaco has ample room for Ecuadorean crude, they said. It is currently transporting about 17,000 bpd out of its 100,000 bpd capacity, an Ecuadorean energy ministry official said.     The Ecuadorean crude reaching Tumaco will be shipped by boat to Ecuador for refining into oil products to meet domestic demand.     The completion of the pipeline would allow Ecuador to resume some of production, paralysed since March six by an  earthquake the night before.     The tremor ruptured the country\'s main pipeline from jungle oilfields to the Ecuadorean port of Balao, on the Pacific Ocean.     Ecuador was pumping about 260,000 bpd before the earthquake. It would take about five months to repair the pipeline to Balao, government officials said.     Ecuador estimates that it will cost between 145 to 150 mln dlrs to repair oil installations damaged by the earthquake, energy ministry Javier Espinosa said.      \n',crude
'Ecuador needs 120 mln dlrs to repair the damage to its oil export pipeline caused by last week\"s earthquake, which will stop crude exports for five months, energy and mines minister Javier Espinosa Teran said.     Espinosa said yesterday the pipeline, which carries crude from jungle fields to the Pacific Ocean coast of Balao, would be repaired with the help of Texaco Inc TX.N and a Mexican and an Argentine firm.     President Leon Febres Cordero said two days ago that Ecuador, an OPEC member, would have to suspend crude exports for four months due to the quake.     Oil traditionally accounts for up to two-thirds of Ecuador\'s total exports and as much as 60 pct of government revenues.     Deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite said Ecuador would have to import six to seven mln barrels of crude oil to meet its needs until the line was repaired.     The Ecuadorean minister at the Presidency, Patricio Quevedo, told reporters that Venezuela will lend Ecuador five mln barrels of crude, which would repaid in kind after a 180-day period.     He added the Caracas-based Andean Development Corp had granted a loan of 11.7 mln dlrs towards repairing the pipeline, 50 km of which had been damaged in the quake.     In Quito, Foreign Minister Rafael Garcia Velasco yesterday summoned ambassadors from about 40 countries to whom he issued appeal for emergency aid for the country. Only three countries, the U.S., Colombia and Venezuela, had offered assistance.  \n',crude
'Ecuador\'s deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite arrived here last night for talks on further Venezuelan assistance to his country\'s oil industry following last week\'s earthquake, officials said.     Ecuador was obliged to suspend crude oil exports for an expected five months as a result of damage to 25 miles of pipeline linking its jungle oil fields with the Pacific port of Balao. Oil normally accounts for 60 pct of its exports.     Fellow OPEC member Venezuela has already agreed to lend Ecuador five mln barrels of crude, to be repaid in kind after 180 days, to help meet its domestic consumption needs.     The officials could neither confirm nor deny reports that Venezuela will temporarily produce Ecuador\'s entire OPEC quota, set at 210,000 barrels per day for first half 1987.     \"All options are open at this moment in the context of cooperation on oil production,\" a Venezuelan energy and mines ministry source said.     Discussions are also under way to arrive at a formula to compensate Ecuador for the loss in oil export revenue while the pipeline is repaired, officials said.     Santos Alvite last night met Venezuelan energy and mines minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti and will today hold talks at technical level, officials said.     Industry sources said that among the options are for Venezuela to produce Ecuador\'s entire quota, or for Venezuela and non-OPEC Mexico to share it and for the latter to supply Ecuador\'s Far Eastern clients.     But the ministry source said that no decision has yet been reached on the matter, and that an announcement would be made in due course.     Santos Alvite said earlier in Quito that Ecuador would have to import six to seven mln barrels of crude oil to meet its needs until the line was repaired.     Ecuador energy and mines minister Javier Espinosa Teran said last night his country needs 120 mln dlrs to repair the damage to the export pipeline caused by the earthquake.  \n',crude
'The Andean Development Corp (CAF) said today it is lending 11.7 mln dlrs to Ecuador to help repair 25 miles of oil pipeline destroyed by an earthquake earlier this month.     the loan was signed here today in the offices of the caracas based caf by the corporation\'s president, galo montano perez and ecuadorean ambassador antonio parra gil.     the loan had originally been intended to finance an expansion of the pipeline, but following the earthquake the ecuadorean government asked for the terms to be changed so as to permit their use in reconstruction.     Ecuador expects oil production to be suspended for four months as a result of the damage, and has asked Venezuela to help by supplying 50,000 barrels per day while the pipeline is repaired.     The OPEC member has a production quota of 210,000 bpd but has asked the organization to allow it to produce 310,000 bpd once the repairs are completed so as to compensate the loss.  \n',crude
'Earthquake-stricken Ecuador is negotiating with Nigeria to have the African country lend it 10,000 barrels per day (bpd) of crude for export, Deputy Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite tolds.     He said Ecuador was negotiating a shipments schedule and the terms of repaying the loan. Ecuador has suspended crude exports for about five months until it repairs a pipeline ruputured by a March five tremor.     Santos Alvite added Ecuador is finalizing details for a program under which Venezuela would temporarily lend the country 50,000 bpd for export.  \n',crude
'Ecuador\'s deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite arrived here last night for talks on further Venezuelan assistance to his country\'s oil industry following last week\'s earthquake, officials said.     Ecuador was obliged to suspend crude oil exports for an expected five months as a result of damage to 25 miles of pipeline linking its jungle oil fields with the Pacific port of Balao. Oil normally accounts for 60 pct of its exports.     Fellow OPEC member Venezuela has already agreed to lend Ecuador five mln barrels of crude, to be repaid in kind after 180 days, to help meet its domestic consumption needs.  \n',crude
'up to 300 people were feared dead and more than 15,000 people left homeless by thursday\'s earthquake, which will cost Ecuador close to 800 mln dlrs in lost petroleum revenues, authorities said.     They estimated the cost of repairing a damaged oil pipeline at 150 mln dlrs.     \"the magnitude of the damages caused by the earthquake is gigantic,\" president leon febres cordero said after inspecting the damages in napo, the hardest-hit jungle province, 100 miles from here.     The quake damaged 40 km of an oil pipeline, forcing this opec nation to suspend crude exports for four months, president febres cordero said in a statement issued today by the presidential press office.     The country would lose an estimated 800 mln dlrs in crude exports until the pipeline was repaired, the president said. It would cost 150 mln dlrs to repair the pipelline which carries oil from jungle oil fields over the andes to Balao, a pacific ocean port.     Crude traditionally accounts for up to two-thirds of ecuador\'s exports.     the quake triggered landslides, swelling the aguarico river which burst it banks carrying away homes and huts in napo province, health minister jorge brancho tolds.     \"we fear that up to 300 people died in napo though there is no way of now knowing the exact figure because many people have disappeared,\" he said.     Other estimates ranged as high as 500 dead.     So far 20 corpses have been recovered, bracho said.     Information Minister Marco Lara told reporters: \"the number of dead and injured is not known ... because we do not know how many people lived in the homes hit by the landslides.\"     Bracho said at least 15,000 were left homeless in the cayambe district.  \n',crude
'President Leon Febres Cordero said Ecuador would honour its debt when it had the capacity to make payments, but said foreign banks had calculated oil would have to be 25 dlrs a barrel for Ecuador to meet its commitments.     Ecuador said on Friday that last week\'s earthquake was forcing it to reaffirm an earlier decision -- based on the slide in world oil prices -- to suspend debt payments to private foreign banks, which hold two-thirds of its 8.16 billion dlr foreign debt.     \"All legitimate debt is a commitment of honour,\" the president said during a visit to the quake zone. \"A government as a sovereign entity has dignity and prestige to maintain.\"     Private foreign banks and the World Bank had calculated oil would have to be at least 25 dlrs a barrel for Quito to be able to meet its commitments, Febres Cordero said.     He added that Ecuadorean crude was now selling for 15 to 17 dlrs a barrel after having been sold for many months at 12 dlrs a barrel and as low as seven dlrs before that.     Meanwhile, Ecuador announced an austerity program and a price freeze on key consumer goods as a result of the earthquake, which killed at least 300 people.     Presidency Minister Patricio Quevedo said the budget would be cut by five to 10 pct, government hiring would be frozen and salaries of top officials, including the president and cabinet, would be reduced.     He also said a price freeze would be imposed on 20 basic consumer items, mainly food staples, while the price of gasoline would rise by between 69 and 80 pct and bus fares would rise by 20 pct. Gasoline supplies would also be limited.  \n',crude
'Ecuador today suspended its crude oil exports indefinitely due to an earthquake last night that damaged pumping and crude transport installations, an Energy and Mines MInistry statement said.     It said the state oil firm Corporacion Estatal Petrolera Ecuatoriana (CEPE) notified foreign customers that it was declaring force majeure on its crude exports due to the tremor.     Ecuador\"s OPEC oil output quota is 210,000 barrels per day (bpd).     A senior energy ministry official said that one pumping station at El Salado on Ecuador\'s main pipeline was damaged.     He also said an 180 metre section of the pipeline attached to the bridge over the Aguarico river collapsed.     The pumping station was about 20 km from the Reventador volcano, near the epicentre of the quake, which Ecuadorean seismologists said registered six on the 12-point international Mercalli scale. The Aguarico bridge was also close to the volcano, he said.     The quake struck northern Ecaudor and southern Colombia, according to Ecuadorean officials. No injuries were reported.  \n',crude
'Ecuador will ask OPEC to raise its oil export quota by 100,000 barrels per day to 310,000 to compensate for lost output due to last week\'s earthquake, deputy Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite said.     Santos Alvite, who arrived in Caracas last night to discuss an aid plan for Ecuador, did not say when the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) would be approached.     The additional output would be related to plans now under discussion for Venezuela and Mexico to lend Ecuador crude while it repairs a pipeline damaged by the quake.     Earlier, Venezuelan Energy and Mines Minister Aturo Hernandez Grisanti said his country would supply an unspecified part of Ecuador\'s export commitments.     But Santos Alvite told reporters he hoped a first cargo of 300,000 barrels could leave Maracaibo this weekend to supply refineries near Guayaquil. He added Ecuador also wanted to make up for 50,000 bpd it shipped to Caribbean destinations. Mexico might supply Ecuador\'s South Korean market.     Ecuador may be unable to export oil for up to five months due to extensive damage to a 25 mile stretch of pipeline linking jungle oilfields to the Pacific port of Balao.  \n',crude
'The suspension of Ecuador\'s crude oil shipments after an earthquake cut an oil pipeline will last at least four months, a senior Energy Ministry official said.     The official said Ecuador could resume exports after repairing a 40 km section of the 510 km pipeline, which links jungle oil fields at Lago Agrio to Balao on the Pacific coast. It would take about 100 mln U.S. Dlrs to repair the pipeline, the official, who did not want to be named, tolds. Ecuador had enough oil to meet domestic demand for about 35 days and would have to import crude to supplement stocks.     The earthquake last Thursday night registered six on the 12-point international Mercalli scale. The damage to the pipeline was a severe economic blow to Ecuador, where oil accounts for up to two-thirds of total exports and as much as 60 pct of government revenues.     Financially pressed Ecuador, a member of the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC), was recently pumping about 260,000 barrels per day (bpd) of crude, about 50,000 bpd above the output quota assigned by the cartel, another Energy Ministry spokesman said. Last year, it exported an average of 173,500 bpd, according to the central bank.     However, Ecuador might build an emergency 25 km pipeline, costing 15 to 20 mln dlrs, to hook up with a Colombian pipeline, the first official said. He estimated it could take about 60 days to build.     Ecuador, squeezed by the slide in world oil prices in 1986, had only 138 mln dlrs in net international reserves at the end of January, about equal to one month\'s imports.     It suspended interest payments in January on 5.4 billion dlrs owed to about 400 private foreign banks. The country\'s total foreign debt is 8.16 billion dlrs, the eighth largest in Latin America.     In Caracas, President Jaime Lusinchi said Venezuela would loan five mln barrels of crude to Ecuador over the next three months to make up for losses from damage to the pipeline.     Ecuador asked for the loan to guarantee domestic supplies and would ship an equivalent volume back to Venezuela in repayment in May, Lusinchi said.     A commission headed by Venezuelan Investment Fund Minister Hector Hurtado and including representatives from the interior and defence ministries and the state oil company Petroleos de Venezuela will travel to Ecuador Tuesday to evaluate and co-ordinate an emergency relief program, he said.  \n',crude
'The suspension of Ecuador\'s crude oil shipments after an earthquake cut an oil pipeline will last at least four months, a senior Energy Ministry official said.     The official said Ecuador could resume exports after repairing a 40 km section of the 510 km pipeline, which links jungle oil fields at Lago Agrio to Balao on the Pacific coast. It would take about 100 mln U.S. Dlrs to repair the pipeline, the official, who did not want to be named, tolds. Ecuador had enough oil to meet domestic demand for about 35 days and would have to import crude to supplement stocks.     The earthquake last Thursday night registered six on the 12-point international Mercalli scale. The damage to the pipeline was a severe economic blow to Ecuador, where oil accounts for up to two-thirds of total exports and as much as 60 pct of government revenues.     Financially pressed Ecuador, a member of the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC), was recently pumping about 260,000 barrels per day (bpd) of crude, about 50,000 bpd above the output quota assigned by the cartel, another Energy Ministry spokesman said. Last year, it exported an average of 173,500 bpd, according to the central bank.     However, Ecuador might build an emergency 25 km pipeline, costing 15 to 20 mln dlrs, to hook up with a Colombian pipeline, the first official said. He estimated it could take about 60 days to build.     Ecuador, squeezed by the slide in world oil prices in 1986, had only 138 mln dlrs in net international reserves at the end of January, about equal to one month\'s imports.     It suspended interest payments in January on 5.4 billion dlrs owed to about 400 private foreign banks. The country\'s total foreign debt is 8.16 billion dlrs, the eighth largest in Latin America.     In Caracas, President Jaime Lusinchi said Venezuela would loan five mln barrels of crude to Ecuador over the next three months to make up for losses from damage to the pipeline.     Ecuador asked for the loan to guarantee domestic supplies and would ship an equivalent volume back to Venezuela in repayment in May, Lusinchi said.     A commission headed by Venezuelan Investment Fund Minister Hector Hurtado and including representatives from the interior and defence ministries and the state oil company Petroleos de Venezuela will travel to Ecuador Tuesday to evaluate and co-ordinate an emergency relief program, he said.  \n',crude
'Non-Opec Egypt produced 40.3 mln tonnes (about 295 mln barrels) of crude in 1986 against 44.3 mln tonnes (about 323 mln barrels) in 1985, according to official figures released today by the Egyptian General Petroleum Corp. (EGPC).     Officials say Egypt can produce up to one mln bpd per day, but production was cut when world prices plunged last year.     In an attempt to help OPEC stabilize the world market, Egypt cut its 1987 production target of 940,000 bpd to its current output of 870,000 bpd.     Egypt, which exports a third of its output, currently sells its top Suez and Ras Bahar blends for 17.25 dlrs a barrel.  \n',crude
'Distillate fuel stocks held in primary storage fell by 8.8 mln barrels in the week ended March six to 119.6 mln barrels, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.     In its weekly petroleum status report, the Department of Energy agency said gasoline stocks were off 500,000 barrels in the week to 251.0 mln barrels and refinery crude oil stocks fell 1.2 mln barrels to 331.8 mln.     The EIA said residual fuel stocks fell 1.5 mln barrels to 36.4 mln barrels and crude oil stocks in the Strategic Petroleum Reserve (SPR) rose 200,000 barrels to 516.7 mln.     The total of all crude, refined product and SPR stocks fell 10.3 mln barrels to 1,564.8, it said.  \n',crude
'Energy analyst Edward Krapels said the United States should consider an oil tariff to keep U.S. dependence on imports below 50 pct.     \"On the supply side, the argument in favor of a contingent, variable import tariff is most persuasive,\" Krapels, president of Energy Security Analysis, Inc said in a statement at a House Energy and Power subcommittee hearing.     \"An optimal tariff would be one implemented only if the international price of crude oil falls below, say, 15 dlrs a barrel. On the demand side, the obvious policy is an excise tax on transportation fuels,\" Krapels said.     But William Johnson of the Jofree Corp disagreed with the oil tariff proposal, saying Congress should remove price controls on natural gas, repeal the windfall profits tax on oil companies, allow exports of Alaskan oil and provide tax incentives for U.S. oil production, or, at the least, preserve exisiting tax incentives for drilling. He also urging filling the Strategic Petroleum Reserve at a faster rate.     Richard Adkerson of Arthur Andersen and Co told the subcommittee oil imports were expected to increase because funds for exploration and development of domestic oil sources cannot now be economically justified due to low oil prices.  \n',crude
'An explosion followed by a fire ripped through a British Petroleum (BP) oil refinery, killing one man.     A BP spokesman said the fire was confined to one plant at the 700-acre refinery at Grangemouth, 25 miles west of Edinburgh. The cause and extent of the damage had yet to be determined.     Two people were killed in a previous explosion and fire at the plant on March 13. That incident is still being investigated, the spokesman said.  \n',crude
'Development of costly shale oil, liquified coal and other kinds of synthetic fuels, halted in recent years because of cheap and abundant petroleum supplies, will become economic again when world oil prices top 30 dlrs a barrel, an Exxon Co USA executive said.     Joe McMillan, a senior vice president, tolds after addressing a Houston meeting of the American Institute of Chemical Engineers, \"By early in the next century, synthetics should play a significant role in this country\'s energy supply.\"     McMillan also told reporters at a news conference that he believed synthetic fuels would become economic to develop when world oil prices reached a 30 to 40 dlr a barrel price range.     \"You\'re talking about a 50 pct increase in crude oil prices, but I think that time is coming and we\'ve got to be prepared,\" McMillan said.     He predicted U.S. oil demand would rise by about one pct annually in the next few years while the nation fails to replace its oil reserves through exploration. By the turn of the century, world oil prices will be significantly higher because of declining supplies, McMillan said.     Ashland Oil, Inc. chairman John Hall, who also spoke at the meeting, advocated some form of federal tax incentives to help spur development of synthetic fuels.     The United States, Hall said, has nearly 500 billion tons of demonstrated coal reserves, an amount more than triple that of all the world\'s known oil reserves.     \"We must encourage research now in order to make synfuels competitive later,\" Hall said. The average lead time for development of a shale oil or liquified coal project is between five and ten years.     Until last year, the federal government had subsidized synfuels development through the U.S. Synthetic Fuels Corp., a research program created during the Carter Administration with the goal of developing replacements for up to two mln barrels of oil.     The corporation was shut down last April when Congress refused to continue funding its eight billion dlr budget because of uneconomic projects based on forecasts of 50 dlrs a barrel oil and 10 dlr per mcf natural gas during this decade.  \n',crude
'World governments should prepare for an inevitable significant increase in the price of oil as non-Middle East supplies diminish, Exxon Corp XON director and senior vice-president Donald McIvor said.     Policymakers must also face up to the reality that the bulk of world oil reserves lies in the Middle East, he said in a speech prepared for delivery to the Australian Petroleum Exploration Association (APEA) annual conference.     It appears ever more likely that new discoveries elsewhere will not change this fact, he said.     McIvor said 37 of the world\'s 30,000 oil fields contain about 35 pct of all oil ever discovered.     Only 11 of these 37 super-giant fields lie outside the Middle East and only five of the 37 have been discovered in the last 20 years, three of them in the Middle East, he said.     He also said that since 1970, the world has been consuming 20 to 25 billion barrels a year while making discoveries at the rate of only 10 to 15 billion barrels a year.     More than half of remaining proved reserves are in the Middle East, he said.     McIvor said it was important to continue to search for oil outside the Middle East because each addition contributes to a diversity of supply desirable for global political and economic stability.     \"It is important to enhance the likelihood of home-country discoveries with measures such as non-discriminatory and stable taxation, and minimum regulation, together with opening up of acreage for exploration,\" he said.     Increasing reliance on the Middle East will also boost the incentive to use natural gas and synthetic sources of petroleum, he added.  \n',crude
'White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said President Reagan\'s record in opposing tax hikes is \"long and strong\" and not about to change.     \"We\'re opposed to tax increases.... We will fight tax increases.... We will deal with it politically in every forum possible,\" said Fitzwater when questioned about whether there was any change in the administration\'s position.     Fitzwater said Reagan\'s strong feelings against a tax hike included opposition to an oil import fee.     \"The President\'s position is that he is opposed to it,\" he said.  \n',crude
'Greece, replying to a warning from Turkey that it will stop Athens from seeking oil in the Aegean Sea, repeated today that it has an exclusive right to decide where or when to drill in the area.     A government spokesman said in a statement that if Ankara believed Greece was contravening international law, it could bring the issue before the courts.     The spokesman was responding to a statement by Turkish Foreign Ministry spokesman Yalim Eralp that Ankara would take action to stop Greece\'s oil activities beyond its territorial waters as they were a violation of the 1976 Berne accord.  \n',crude
'Greece, responding to a warning by Turkey against conducting oil activities in the Aegean Sea, said today it had the right to decide where and how to do research or drilling work in the area.     A government spokesman said the Greek position was made clear to Turkey\'s ambassador Nazmi Akiman when he met Greek Foreign Affairs Undersecretary Yannis Kapsis last week.     Acting Turkish Prime Minister Kaya Erdem said earlier today Greek activities in the northern Aegean contravened the 1976 Berne Agreement which set the framework for talks on the Aegean continental shelf disputed between Ankara and Athens.     The Greek statement today said, \"Greece is not prepared to give up even a trace of its sovereignty rights to the seabed. It has been stressed to...Mr Akiman that the decision where or how to drill belongs exclusively to the Greek government.\"     \"The Greek government has repeatedly let the Turkish side know that it considers the 1976 Berne protocol as inactive through the fault of Turkey,\" it said.     The Greek statement said Athens was ready to put the continental shelf issue before international courts.  \n',crude
'Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou has withdrawn a request to Washington to suspend operations at an American army base near Athens as a Greek-Turkish row over oil rights in the Aegean eased.     A Turkish research ship which Greece had threatened to tackle if it sailed into disputed waters in the Aegean Sea kept to Turkish territorial waters yesterday, avoiding a potential clash.     Papandreou expressed qualified optimism after briefing opposition leaders on Aegean developments early yesterday.     The Greek government later withdrew Friday\'s request to Washington to close down its telecommunications base at Nea Makri, north of Athens, saying that the reasons which had prompted it to make the request were no longer valid.     Under the terms of the U.S.-Greek bases accord, Greece has the right to ask for suspension of operations at times when its national interests are threatened.     The row in the Aegean erupted after Turkey said it would search for oil round three Greek islands off its coast following an announcement from Greece that it planned to drill east of Thassos island after taking control of a Canadian-led oil consortium operating in the northern Aegean.     Turkey accused Greece of breaching the 1976 Berne Agreement under which both sides agreed to preserve the status quo in the Aegean until their continental shelf dispute was settled. Athens says it considers the accord inactive.     The Turkish Foreign Ministry said in a statement it had received an assurance from Greece that it would not carry out oil activities outside its territorial waters. Greece declined comment on the statement.     Papandreou repeated an invitation to Turkey to take the long-standing continental shelf dispute to the International Court of Justice at The Hague.     Conservative opposition leader Constantine Mitsotakis said he had urged Papandreou to accept an offer from NATO General Secretary Lord Carrington to help resolve the row.  \n',crude
'Deputy oil ministers from six Gulf Arab states will meet in Bahrain today to discuss coordination of crude oil marketing, the official Emirates news agency WAM reported.     WAM said the officials would be discussing implementation of last Sunday\'s agreement in Doha by Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) oil ministers to help each other market their crude oil.     Four of the GCC states - Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Kuwait and Qatar - are members of the Organiaation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) and some face stiff buyer resistance to official OPEC prices.  \n',crude
'No action has been taken yet on the Reagan Adminstration\'s offer to escort Kuwaiti oil tankers through the Gulf, but the issue is being discussed, U.S. Secretary of Defence Caspar Weinberger said.     The offer was made to Kuwait in light of Iran\'s deployment of Chinese-built missiles to cover the entrance to the Gulf.     Weinberger told reporters prior to a speech at Texas Christian University that he did not think Iran and the United States were moving towards a potential conflict, adding that the Straits of Hormuz at the mouth of the Gulf were still \"free water.\"  \n',crude
'Energy Secretary John Herrington said he may recommend to the White House that the domestic oil industry be given tax benefits to help it produce more oil and head off increasing U.S. dependence on foreign oil.     He said also at a news conference that he would recommend to the White House that the fill rate of the Strategic Petroleum Reserve be increased from its planned 35,000 barrels per day.     The oil reserve fill rate capacity is 100,000 barrels a day.     Herrington said he had always advocated a greater fill rate for the petroleum reserve, but the rate had been kept down because of budgetary constraints.     Herrington did not disclose what tax incentives he might advocate, but U.S. officials have shown interest in tax benefits for oil and gas exploration and for research and development into new ways to extract oil which is now considered uneconomical to produce.     He made the remarks in conjunction with the release of the Energy Department\'s study on oil\'s impact on national security.     Herrington said that before he disclosed what recommendations for tax benefits for the oil and gas industry he might make, he would raise the matter with the White House Economic Policy Committee to see if the proposals to increase oil production made good tax policy.     He said he would like to increase U.S. production by one mln barrels a day.     The report said that by the end of the century the United States may be relying on foreign sources for 50 pct of its oil consumption, posing a serious economic and national security threat.  \n',crude
'House Speaker Jim Wright endorsed a proposal to require the president to take action to reduce oil imports if they threaten to top 50 pct of U.S. consumption.     Wright told reporters the plan by Sen. Lloyd Bentsen, a fellow Texas Democrat, was positive and useful. Oil imports peaked in 1977 at 47 pct, were short of 36 pct last year and this year are up over 40 pct, Bentsen said.      The Bentsen proposal, supported by 24 other Senators, would would require the president to issue annual three-year oil import forecasts. In any year they threatened to top 50 pct, he would be ordered to propose quotas or other solution.      \n',crude
'U.S. drilling activity rose last week with the number of working rotary rigs up by 23 to 784, against 1,063 working rigs one year ago, Hughes Tool Co. said.     The improvement was the first increase this year in the weekly rig count, which had dropped steadily since early January when a total of 962 rotary rigs were working.     Among individual states, Texas and Oklahoma reported the biggest gains in drilling last week with increases of 21 and 11, respectively. California and Louisiana were each up by three and Wyoming gained two additional working rigs.     Hughes Tool said it counted a total of 692 rigs drilling on land, 74 rigs active offshore and 18 drilling in inland waters. In Canada, the rig count was up by two to 183, against 324 one year ago.  \n',crude
'Ice conditions are unchanged at the Soviet Baltic oil port of Ventspils, with continuous and compacted drift ice 15 to 30 cms thick, the latest report of the Finnish Board of Navigation said.     Icebreaker assistance to reach Ventspils harbour is needed for normal steel vessels without special reinforcement against ice, the report said.     It gave no details of ice conditions at the other major Soviet Baltic export harbour of Klaipeda.  \n',crude
'Growth in oil consumption in the Western industrialized countries is likely to slow to around one pct this year compared with 2.3 pct in 1986, the International Energy Agency said.     Oil use in the 24 member countries of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) increased by around one pct in the first quarter of 1987 to 35.9 mln barrels a day, the IEA said in its latest monthly report.     Growth in OECD countries is expected to come primarily from transport fuels, as was the case in 1986. But if average consumer prices are higher than 1986, the rate of growth for these fuels may be below last year\'s 3.6 pct.     The IEA said assuming crude and product prices remain nar current levels, some destocking by end-users can be expected.     If that takes place, natural gas will also regain some of the market share it lost to heavy fuel in 1986, it said.     IEA estimates on April one put oil stocks held in the OECD area at 428 mln tonnes, or 98 days of forward consumption. This is about the same as at the begining of the year.     The agency said this flat trend is explained by the projected seasonal consumption decline in the second quarter of the year which offset a reduction in stocks.     Company stocks on land in the OECD rose to 326 mln tonnes on April one this year compared with 316 mln tonnes in calender 1986 while governments also built up their strategic stocks to 102 mln tonnes against 97 mln in 1986.     The year-on-year trend of government stock building is continuing with company stocks rising, more or less in line with consumption, after declining for five years, IEA said.     Oil stocks on land in the United States and Canada were put at 206.6 mln tonnes down from the 214 mln tonnes on January one and equivalent to 94 and 98 days of consumption, respectively.     Oil stocks in Western Europe were 147.4 mln tonnes, down from the 154 mln tonnes on January one but still equivalent to 94 days of consumption.     The IEA said that initial estimates indicate that company stocks fell by 1.2 mln bpd in OECD countries in the first quarter of the year. This followed a small rise in January of 400,000 bpd but a decline of 1.5 bpd in February and 2.5 bpd in March.     And it is possible that final data will show a larger draw, particulary for March, it said.     As crude production also fell, there is likely to have also been a decline in non-reported stocks, particularly at sea, the IEA said.     World oil supply fell through the first quarter by about two bpd to 45.2 bpd from 47.5 bpd in the last quarter of 1986.     This drop was mostly due to a decline in OPEC crude production to around 15.5 bpd in February/March from 16.5 bpd in January and to the seasonal drop in exports from Centrally Planned Economies, the IEA said.     Total OPEC oil supply totalled 17.2 bpd in the first quarter of 1987 compare with 19.3 bpd in the last three months of 1986 while supply from non-OPEC countries totalled 28 bpd as against 28.2 bpd in the same 1986 period.     A drop in Saudi Arabian output to a tentatively forecast 3.3 bpd in march from 3.6 bpd in February was the largest factor behind the OPEC production decline, the IEA said.  \n',crude
'OPEC produced an average 16.1 mln barrels per day (bpd) of crude oil in February, down from 16.5 mln the previous month and an overall 17.3 mln bpd in fourth quarter 1986, the International Energy Agency said.     A few OPEC countries last month exceeded the production quotas set at their last conference in December, but liftings were reduced from several countries, it said in its latest monthly oil market report.     These cutbacks were due in part to buyer resistance to fixed prices, introduced from February 1, particularly for fixed volumes over an extended period.     It gave this breakdown for OPEC crude output, in mln bpd                     FOURTH QTR 1986  JANUARY 1987  FEBRUARY 1987     SAUDI ARABIA    4.9              3.7           3.8     IRAN            1.6              2.2           1.9     IRAQ            1.6              1.6           1.7     UAE             1.3              1.2           1.2     KUWAIT          1.0              1.0           1.0     NEUTRAL ZONE    0.5              0.4           0.4     QATAR           0.3              0.3           0.2     NIGERIA         1.3              1.2           1.2     LIBYA           1.0              1.0           1.0                     FOURTH QTR 1986  JANUARY 1987  FEBRUARY 1987     ALGERIA         0.6              0.6           0.6     GABON           0.1              0.2           0.2     VENEZUELA       1.6              1.6           1.6     ECUADOR         0.2              0.2           0.2     INDONESIA       1.3              1.2           1.2     TOTAL           17.3             16.5          16.1     The IEA said while Saudi production stayed below its quota of 4.133 mln bpd, actual sales might exceed output due to Norbec stock disposals. Contracts for Saudi crude have been signed, but it is understood they have much leeway in required liftings.     The report said the reduction in Iraqi air attacks on Iranian export facilities allowed Iran\'s output to reach 2.2 mln bpd in January, but buyer resistance to fixed prices apparently cut February production.     It said Iraqi exports are about 1.0 mln bpd through the Turkish pipeline, 0.1-0.2 mln by truck through Jordan and 0.2-0.3 mln via the Saudi pipeline to Yanbu. Internal consumption is some 0.3 mln bpd.     The IEA estimated total non-communist world oil supply in February at 45.0 mln bpd, down from 45.4 mln in January and 47.0 mln in the fourth quarter.     The February world supply figure is made up of 16.1 mln bpd OPEC crude production, 1.4 mln bpd OPEC natural gas liquids (ngls), 16.6 mln bpd OECD crude and ngls, 8.3 mln bpd other developing countries\' crude and ngls, net trade of 1.1 mln bpd with centrally planned economies, 0.5 mln bpd of non-conventional crudes (such as tar sands and oil from coal) and 1.0 mln bpd from processiing gains.     Within the OECD, preliminary Norwegian data show record 1.06 mln bpd output in January, with lower production expected in February in accordance with government curtailments of approximately 80,000 bpd, announced in support of OPEC.  \n',crude
'Growth in oil consumption in the Western industrialised countries is likely to slow to around one pct this year compared with 2.3 pct in 1986, the International Energy Agency (IEA) said.     Oil use in the 24 countries of the OECD increased by around one pct in first quarter 1987 to 35.9 mln bpd, the IEA said in its Monthly Oil Market Report.     Growth in OECD countries is expected to come primarily from transport fuels, as in 1986. But if average consumer prices are higher than 1986, the rate of growth for these fuels may be below last year\'s 3.6 pct, it said.     The IEA said that assuming crude oil and product prices stay close to current levels, some destocking by end-users can be expected. If that happens, natural gas will also regain some of the market share it lost to heavy fuel in 1986, and there may be slightly less growth in transport fuels.     IEA estimates on April 1 put oil stocks in the OECD area at 428 mln tonnes, representing 98 days of forward consumption. This is about the same level as at the begining of the year.     The agency said this flat trend is explained by the projected seasonal consumption decline in the second quarter of the year which offset a reduction in stocks.     It said initial estimates indicate that company stocks fell by 1.2 mln bpd in OECD countries in the first quarter of the year. This followed a small rise in January of 0.4 mln bpd but a decline of 1.5 mln bpd in February and 2.5 mln bpd in March.     It is possible that final data will show a larger draw, particulary for March, it said. As crude production also fell, there is likely to have also been a decline in non-reported stocks, particularly at sea, the IEA said.     Company stocks on land in the OECD rose to 326 mln tonnes on April 1 against 316 mln on April 1 1986. Governments built up strategic stocks to 102 mln tonnes against 97 mln in the period.     The year-on-year trend of government stock building is continuing with year-on-year company stocks also rising, more or less in line with consumption, after declining for five years, the IEA noted.     Oil stocks on land in the U.S. And Canada were put at 206.6 mln tonnes on April 1, down from the 214 mln tonnes on January 1 and equivalent to 94 and 98 days of consumption, respectively.     Oil stocks in Western Europe were 147.4 mln tonnes on April 1, down from the 154 mln on January 1 but still equivalent to 94 days of consumption.     World oil supply fell in the first quarter by about two mln bpd to 45.2 mln bpd from 47.2 mln bpd in last quarter 1986.     This drop was mostly due to a decline in OPEC crude production to around 15.5 mln bpd in February/March from 16.5 mln bpd in January and to the seasonal drop in exports from centrally-planned Economies, the IEA said.     Total OPEC crude oil supply was 15.8 mln bpd in the first quarter, plus 1.4 mln bpd of NGLs, compared with 17.3 mln bpd of crude in the last three months of 1986 and 17.9 mln average for the whole of 1986. Supply from non-OPEC countries totalled 28 mln bpd, against 28.5 mln bpd in the fourth quarter 1986.     A drop in Saudi Arabian output to a tentatively forecast 3.3 mln bpd in March from 3.6 mln bpd in February was the largest factor behind the OPEC production decline, the IEA said.     Saudi Arabia\"s Opec-assigned output quota is 4.133 mln bpd.  \n',crude
'The World Bank said it approved a 140 mln dlr loan for India to help lessen that country\'s dependence on imported oil and spur development of its own petroleum resources.     The bank said the loan will be used to boost production by injecting gas in the partially depleted Assam oil fields and to assist exploration in other areas, including drilling 10 exploratory wells.     The bank said the recipient of the 20-year loan will be Oil India Ltd (OIL), which is the smaller of two public Indian petroleum exploration and production companies.  \n',crude
'Indonesia has minimised the economic impact of falling oil prices, kept inflation within limits and boosted exports, Finance Minister Radius Prawiro said.     Indonesia was badly hit by last year\'s steep plunge in crude prices, which cut revenue from oil exports by half.     But Prawiro was quoted by Indonesian newspapers as telling President Suharto that inflation was kept to around nine pct in the financial year ending tomorrow, against around 4.3 pct the previous year.     Exports were estimated to have risen by seven pct, he said, although he did not give complete figures.     The depressed economy forms the main backdrop to general elections next month in Indonesia, a major producer of rubber, palm oil, tin, timber and coffee.     Prawiro said 1986/87 had also been difficult because of the appreciation of currencies like the yen and the mark against the dollar, which increased Indonesia\'s debt repayments.     He said the economy would have suffered more from the world economic recession if the government had not devalued the rupiah by 31 pct last September.     In an editorial on the economic outlook, the Jakarta Post said the government must press ahead with measures to deregulate the economy to help boost non-oil exports.     The English-language daily said bigger export earnings were needed to finance not only imports but also the country\'s growing foreign debt, estimated at around 37 billion dlrs.     \"About 50 pct of our foreign debt obligations fall due within the next three to five years and will steadily increase the debt servicing burden,\" the paper said.     However, end-investors were seen bargain hunting in expectation of a further yen interest rate decline, dealers said.     Most dealers were cautious in the face of the dollar\'s nosedive today and the possibility of a U.S. Interest rate rebound to halt further dollar depreciation.     A 4.7 pct coupon and volume of 1,400 billion yen for the April 10-year bond proposed by the Finance Ministry this afternoon were taken favourably by the market.  \n',crude
'Negotiations between Indonesia\'s state oil company Pertamina and foreign oil contractors on extension of the standard 30-year production sharing contract will be concluded by the end of this month, a Pertamina official said.     Jumardi Jukardi, head of Pertamina\'s foreign contractors coordinating board, gave no details about the outcome of the talks.     But Pertamina President Abdul Rachman Ramly has said priority will be given to extending contracts for companies whose exploration and production contracts expire within the next seven to 10 years.     Jukardi, speaking to Indonesian reporters, said the negotiations would determine whether the 85-15 production sharing split in favour of Pertamina would be adhered to or altered in some cases as oil companies are asking for.     Hardjoko Seputro, spokesman for the Mines and Energy Ministry, has said that President Suharto has agreed in principle to extension of the standard 30-year production sharing contract to reflect better current depressed conditions on the international oil market.  \n',crude
'Indonesia appears to be nearing a political crossroads over measures to deregulate its protected economy, the U.S. Embassy says in a new report.     To counter falling oil revenues, the government has launched a series of measures over the past nine months to boost exports outside the oil sector and attract new investment.     Indonesia, the only Asian member of OPEC and a leading primary commodity producer, has been severely hit by last year\"s fall in world oil prices, which forced it to devalue its currency by 31 pct in September.     But the U.S. Embassy report says President Suharto\"s government appears to be divided over what direction to lead the economy.     \"(It) appears to be nearing a crossroads with regard to deregulation, both as it pertains to investments and imports,\" the report says. It primarily assesses Indonesia\"s agricultural sector, but also reviews the country\"s general economic performance.     It says that while many government officials and advisers are recommending further relaxation, \"there are equally strong pressures being exerted to halt all such moves.\"     \"This group strongly favours an import substitution economy,\" the report says.     Indonesia\"s economic changes have been welcomed by the World Bank and international bankers as steps in the right direction, though they say crucial areas of the economy like plastics and steel remain highly protected, and virtual monopolies.     Three sets of measures have been announced since last May, which broadened areas for foreign investment, reduced trade restrictions and liberalised imports.     The report says Indonesia\"s economic growth in calendar 1986 was probably about zero, and the economy may even have contracted a bit. \"This is the lowest rate of growth since the mid-1960s,\" the report notes.     Indonesia, the largest country in South-East Asia with a population of 168 million, is facing general elections in April.     But the report hold out little hope for swift improvement in the economic outlook. \"For 1987 early indications point to a slightly positive growth rate not exceeding one pct. Economic activity continues to suffer due to the sharp fall in export earnings from the petroleum industry.\"     \"Growth in the non-oil sector is low because of weak domestic demand coupled with excessive plant capacity, real declines in construction and trade, and a reduced level of growth in agriculture,\" the report states.     Bankers say continuation of present economic reforms is crucial for the government to get the international lending its needs.     A new World Bank loan of 300 mln dlrs last month in balance of payments support was given partly to help the government maintain the momentum of reform, the Bank said.  \n',crude
'Iran said reports that it intended to threaten shipping in the Gulf were baseless, and warned the U.S. And other countries not to interfere in the region.     Tehran radio, monitored by the BBC, quoted a Foreign Ministry spokesman as saying any attempt at interference would be met by \"a strong response from Iran and other Moslems in the world.\"      U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger, in remarks apparently unrelated to the broadcast, said the U.S. Would do whatever was necessary to keep shipping lanes open in the face of new Iranian anti-ship missiles in the Gulf.     The U.S. State Department said two days ago Tehran had been told of U.S. Concern that Iranian anti-ship missiles posed a threat to the free flow of oil from the Gulf.     U.S. Officials have said Iran has new Chinese-made anti-ship \"Silkworm\" missiles, which pose a greater threat to merchant ships than missiles used before.     The Iranian spokesman said the reports that Iran intended to attack ships were \"misleading propaganda.\"     He said Iraq\'s President Saddam Hussein was the main cause of tension in the Gulf and said Iran would continue to use \"all its legitimate means to stem the cause of tension.\"     Weinberger said in a television interview in the U.S. \"We are fully prepared to do what\'s necessary to keep the shipping going and keep the freedom of navigation available in that very vital waterway.\"     \"We aren\'t going into any disclosures or discussions of what might happen, but we are certainly very sympathetic to and listening carefully to any suggestions for our assistance in keeping navigation free in that area,\" he said.     Weinberger said U.S warship movements in the Gulf area were not unusual.     A U.S. Navy battle group led by the aircraft carrier Kitty Hawk is currently in the northern Arabian Sea.     The Iranian spokesman was quoted by Tehran radio as saying the U.S. Was trying to build up its military presence in the region.  \n',crude
'Japanese customers have bought nearly six mln barrels of crude oil from the National Iranian Oil Company (NIOC) at a substantial discount to the official price, and Western traders have received even larger discounts, Japanese traders involved in the transactions tolds.     NIOC has sold its crude for March shipment to Japanese customers with different formulas. One company has bought 800,000 barrels of Iranian Heavy at a straight discount of 30-35 cents below the official price, the sources said.     Other deals have been fixed with prices linked to Oman and Dubai spot prices less a discount, they said.      Iran\'s discounted sales have not, however, managed to reverse the bullish tone in the crude oil and products spot markets, oil traders said.     Market sentiment is being influenced more by the colder weather in Europe, and reports that OPEC\'s February output was below its self-imposed quota of 15.8 mln barrels per day.     Firmer gas oil on the London futures, and more bullish sentiment on the New York Mercantile Exchange futures market are supporting spot price levels, they said.      Another Japanese trading house has paid the official price but through a processing arrangement will effectively receive a discount, the sources said. \"It\'s just disguised cheating,\" one Japanese trader said.     The sources said only one Japanese company had paid the official price for Iranian oil. It has purchased 1.5 mln barrels of Iranian Heavy for April shipment for refining in Singapore. They said about nine VLCCs of Iranian crude have been sold to Western traders with pricing based 60 pct on the official price and 40 pct on spot prices, or with part of the price related to processing arrangements.  \n',crude
'Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh arrived in Algiers at the head of a large delegation for talks on stabilizing oil prices, the official news agency APS said.     In a brief arrival statement, he said Iran and Algeria were engaged in \"continuous and stronger cooperation\" on the world petroleum market and had \"deployed considerable efforts to stablise petroleum prices.\"     He was greeted on arrival by Belkacem Nabi, the Algerian Minister of Energy, Chemical and Petro-Chemical Industries.  \n',crude
'Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh is expected here on Friday for talks with his Algerian counterpart Belkacem Nabi, the official Algerian news agency APS said today.     Aqazadeh, who will be accompanied by a large delegation, will have talks on bilateral relations in the field of energy and exchange views with Algerian officials on the current world energy situation, it said.  \n',crude
'Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh is in the United Arab Emirates (UAE) to discuss oil prices and the general market situation, Iranian officials accompanying him said.     He will meet UAE President Sheikh Zaid bin Sultan al-Nahayan and Oil Minister Mana Said al-Oteiba.     Aqazadeh arrived last night after a brief stopover in Riyadh, where he met Saudi Arabia\'s Oil Minister Hisham Nazir.     The official Saudi Press Agency quoted him as saying his talks at Riyadh with Nazir had been constructive and good.     Aqazadeh said Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) members were agreed on holding production stable and he reiterated the importance of maintaining oil prices.     OPEC members agreed in December to limit production to 15.8 mln barrels per day for the first half of this year and on a benchmark price of 18 dlrs a barrel from February 1.     Aqazadeh also visted OPEC members Gabon, Algeria and Libya. The Iranian news agency, IRNA, quoted him as saying before leaving Tripoli that OPEC should do everything possible to make oil prices permanently stable.  \n',crude
'Iraqi President Saddam Hussein carried out his first major government shakeup in five years tonight, naming a new oil minister in shuffling three posts.     One minister was dropped in the shuffle, announced in a presidential decree. It gave no reason for the changes in the government of the Arab Baath Socialist Party which has ruled Iraq since a revolution in 1968.     The decree named the head of the Iraqi National Oil Company (INOC), Isam Abdul-Rahim al-Chalaby, to take over as oil minister replacing Qassem Ahmed Taqi.     Taqi, appointed oil minister in the last significant government reorganization in 1982, was moved to be minister of heavy industries.  \n',crude
'Iraq said today its warplnes had attacked a supertanker and four Iranian oil sites and vowed to keep up such raids until the Gulf war ends.     The surprise escalation of attacks on oil installations broke more than a month-long lull in Iraqi air force action.     It also followed celebrations yesterday of what Baghdad hailed as Iran\'s failure to achieve victory during the Iranian year which ended on Saturday.     A high command communique said warplanes hit the western jetty at Iran\'s Kharg island oil terminal in the afternoon and struck a supertanker nearby at the same time.     The Kharg terminal, attacked about 135 times since August 1985, was last raided in January.     The communique did not identify the supertanker, but said columns of smoke were seen billowing from it.     In London, Lloyds insurance said the 162,046-ton Iranian tanker Avaj was hit on Saturday, when Iraq reported an earlier Gulf attack.     But there has been no independent confirmation of today\'s supertanker attack nor of other raids on shipping reported by Baghdad in the past 24 hours.     The last confirmed Iraqi attack took place on March eight, when the Iranian tanker Khark-5 was hit south of Kharg.     Iraqi warplanes also struck Iran\'s offshore oilfields at Nowruz, Cyrus and Ardeshir in northern gulf, some 80 km (50 miles) west of Kharg island, today\'s communique said.     The three oilfields have been raided several times in the past three years. Oil sources said they were not crucially important to Iran\'s oil export trade.     A second high command communique today said Iraqi warplanes flew 94 sorties against Iranan targets and positions at the war front.     It also reported a clash between Iraqi naval units and several Iranian boats carrying men to attack an Iraqi oil terminal at the northen tip of the Gulf.     Two Iranian boats wer destroyed and sunk with their occupants and the others fled, it said.  \n',crude
'Iraq said its warplanes launched two bombing raids on Iran\'s offshore Nowruz oilfield in the northern Gulf today.     A military spokesman, quoted by the official Iraqi news agency, said platforms at the field were reduced \"to rubble.\"     He said attacks on the field, 55 miles northwest of Iran\'s Kharg Island oil terminal, were carried out at 0600 GMT. He said today\'s raids \"fall within Iraq\'s policy to deprive Iranian rulers of oil revenue used to serve their aggressive aims.\"     Iraqi planes yesterday raided the nearby Ardeshir oil field, resuming attacks on Iranian targets after a month-long lull.  \n',crude
'Iraq said its warplanes had hit a vessel in the Gulf off the Iranian coast today, the third in the past 24 hours.     A military spokesman told the Iraqi news agency INA the latest attack was at 1250 GMT. It earlier reported strikes at 0650 GMT and at 1930 GMT last night. The planes \"dealt accurate and effective blows\" to the targets and returned safely to base.     There was no immediate confirmation of the attacks from Gulf shipping sources. The last confirmed Iraqi attack was on on March 8, when an Iranian tanker was hit by a missile south of Iran\'s Kharg island oil export terminal.  \n',crude
'Iraq said its forces sank three Iranian boats which tried to approach its disused deep water oil terminal in the northern Gulf today.     A military spokesman, quoted by the official Iraqi news agency, said other Iranian boats fled. He did not identify the vessels.     Iraq\'s major oil outlets in the northern Gulf were closed shortly after the war with Iran started in late 1980.  \n',crude
'Turkey oil pipeline near the southern town of Adana after it was cut by a landslide, the Hurriyet and Anatolian news agencies said.     Little oil was lost in the landslide Friday night because taps on the one mln bpd line were switched off after the accident, they said.     The pipeline, which carries oil for Turkey and other customers from Iraq\'s Kirkuk field to the Yumurtalik terminal on the Turkish Mediterranean coast, is Iraq\'s main oil outlet.  \n',crude
'Iraq\'s Oil Minister Qassem Ahmed Taqi has been moved to the Heavy Industries ministry, the official Iraqi news agcny INA said tonight.     It quoted a Presidential decree appointing Oil Ministry undersecretary Isam Abdul-Rahim Al-Chalaby as the new Oil Minister.     The Ministers of Industry and Communication and Transport had both been relieved of their posts, the news agency said.     No immediate explanation was given for the changes.     Al-Chalaby is the head of the Iraqi National Oil Company.     INA said the decree, signed by President Saddam Hussein, relieved the Minister of Heavy Industries, Subhi Yassin Khadeir of his post and appointed him a Presidential adviser.     His ministry was formerly known as the Industry and Mineral Resources Ministry. The Minister of Communications and Transport, Abdel-Jabbar Abdel-Rahim al-Asadi was also relieved of his post and replaced by a member of the ruling Baath party regional command, Mohammed Hamza al-Zubeidi. Al-Zubedei is also a Presidential adviser. All three ministers involved in the reshuffle had spent more than four years in their posts.  \n',crude
'Worldwide spot crude oil movements fell to 30.07 mln long dwt in February from 37.25 mln tons in January and 41.44 mln in December, London shipbroker Howard Houlder said.     The decline mainly reflected a sharp drop in movements out of the Mideast Gulf, which totalled 7.4 mln tons last month against 11.65 mln in January. These included shipments to western options at 2.05 mln tons against 3.59 mln previously.     Liftings from the Gulf to eastern options fell to 4.15 mln tons from 5.94 mln and those from the Gulf to other areas dropped to 1.2 mln tons from 2.13 mln, Howard Houlder said.     U.K./Continent coastal movements declined sharply to 2.91 mln tons from 4.77 mln but those from the U.K./Continent to the U.S. rose to 1.99 mln from 1.69 mln.  \n',crude
'A two-year project to search for oil and gas in Jordan was agreed in Amman by Jordan\'s Natural Resources Authority (NRA) and the Canadian company, Petrocanada International Assistance Corporation (PCIAC).     The 19.1 mln dlr assistance agreement was signed by Jordan\'s Minister of Energy Hisham al-Khatib and PCIAC chairman Peter M. Towe.     PCIAC is a Canadian government corporation providing assistance to countries like Jordan to reduce their dependence on oil imports, Towe said.  \n',crude
'Kuwait may re-register part of its tanker fleet with foreign flag jurisdictions, including the U.S. And USSR, in an attempt to protect them from Iranian missile attacks in the Gulf war zone, U.S. Officials were quoted by the New York Times as saying.     The transfers would allow the country of registration to escort Kuwaiti-owned ships in the Gulf. Kuwait had earlier declined an offer of U.S. Naval escorts as too public an admission of its need for protection, they said.     Kuwait is also looking at flagging-out to European registries, the officials said.     Soviet flag tankers transporting Kuwaiti oil through the Gulf may get Soviet escorts, the officials said.     Kuwait had earlier considered having both USSR and U.S. Escorts, but the U.S. Was unwilling to give the Soviet Union a naval role in the region, the newspaper quoted the officials as saying.     Kuwait has backed Iraq in the seven-year war against Iran and its ships have increasingly been the target of Iranian attacks.     The U.S. And Kuwait have been negotiating for over a month on methods of protecting Kuwaiti ships.  \n',crude
'Kuwait\'s oil minister said in a newspaper interview that there were no plans for an emergency OPEC meeting after the recent weakness in world oil prices.     Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah was quoted by the local daily al-Qabas as saying that \"none of the OPEC members has asked for such a meeting.\"     He also denied that Kuwait was pumping above its OPEC quota of 948,000 barrels of crude daily (bpd).     Crude oil prices fell sharply last week as international oil traders and analysts estimated the 13-nation OPEC was pumping up to one million bpd over its self-imposed limits.  \n',crude
'Kuwait has asked at least four countries, including the United States, Soviet Union, Britain and China, for temporary use of their flags or tankers to protect Kuwaiti oil shipments in the troubled Persian Gulf, Reagan Administration officials said.     The officials confirmed a New York Times report that Kuwait wants to transfer some of its oil tankers to U.S. or Soviet registration in hopes Iran would be reluctant to launch new \"Silkworm\" missiles at superpower flags.     The United States has vowed to keep the gulf open to international oil traffic and has warned Tehran against using the Chinese-made missiles recently installed in Iran near the mouth of the gulf.     \"They (the Kuwaitis) have also asked Britain, China and possibly some other European countries to lease tankers to carry their oil,\" one of the administration officials, who asked not to be identified, tolds.     The United States is considering the request to temporarily transfer Kuwaiti ships to American registration, but such a move could create insurance and other problems, the officials said.     U.S. defense officials tolds yesterday that Kuwait had decided for at least the time being not to accept a U.S. offer to use American warships to escort its tankers in the gulf, where both Iran and Iraq have been attacking shipping.  \n',crude
'Kuwaiti Oil Minister Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah said in a newspaper interview that no OPEC member was exceeding oil production quotas allocated by the 13-nation group.     Sheikh Ali told Kuwait\'s daily al-Anba \"All OPEC states, without exception, are producing within the quotas allocated to them. Some of them are producing less.\"     Some oil industry sources had said the United Arab Emirates, which had been generally been producing over its quota since OPEC returned to quotas last September, was still pumping more than its allotted amount in the first months of this year.     Ecuador had also publicly stated it was over its quota, but an earthquake early this month stopped that. Iraq has rejected its quota, but oil sources say it may be having problems marketing at official prices all the oil it wants to sell.     OPEC agreed in December to cut overall oil production by 7.25 pct to 15.8 mln barrels per day (bpd) for the first six months of this year and abide by fixed prices around 18 dlrs a barrel from February 1.  \n',crude
'Kuwait\"s Oil Minister, in remarks published today, said there were no plans for an emergency OPEC meeting to review oil policies after recent weakness in world oil prices.     Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah was quoted by the local daily al-Qabas as saying: \"None of the OPEC members has asked for such a meeting.\"     He denied Kuwait was pumping above its quota of 948,000 barrels of crude daily (bpd) set under self-imposed production limits of the 13-nation organisation.     Traders and analysts in international oil markets estimate OPEC is producing up to one mln bpd above a ceiling of 15.8 mln bpd agreed in Geneva last December.     They named Kuwait and the United Arab Emirates, along with the much smaller producer Ecuador, among those producing above quota. Kuwait, they said, was pumping 1.2 mln bpd.     \"This rumour is baseless. It is based on reports which said Kuwait has the ability to exceed its share. They suppose that because Kuwait has the ability, it will do so,\" the minister said.     Sheikh Ali has said before that Kuwait had the ability to produce up to 4.0 mln bpd.     \"If we can sell more than our quota at official prices, while some countries are suffering difficulties marketing their share, it means we in Kuwait are unusually clever,\" he said.     He was referring apparently to the Gulf state of qatar, which industry sources said was selling less than 180,000 bpd of its 285,000 bpd quota, because buyers were resisting official prices restored by OPEC last month pegged to a marker of 18 dlrs per barrel.     Prices in New York last week dropped to their lowest levels this year and almost three dollars below a three-month high of 19 dollars a barrel.     Sheikh Ali also delivered \"a challenge to any international oil company that declared Kuwait sold below official prices.\"     Because it was charging its official price, of 16.67 dlrs a barrel, it had lost custom, he said but did not elaborate.     However, Kuwait had guaranteed markets for its oil because of its local and international refining facilities and its own distribution network abroad, he added.     He reaffirmed that the planned meeting March 7 of OPEC\"s differentials committee has been postponed until the start of April at the request of certain of the body\"s members.     Ecuador\"s deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite said last Wednesday his debt-burdened country wanted OPEC to assign a lower official price for its crude, and was to seek this at talks this month of opec\"s pricing committee.     Referring to pressure by oil companies on OPEC members, in apparent reference to difficulties faced by Qatar, he said: \"We expected such pressure. It will continue through March and April.\" But he expected the situation would later improve.  \n',crude
'Kuwaiti oil minister Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah said OPEC was producing well below its oil output ceiling and this would help prices move higher, according to a Kuwaiti newspaper interview.     The al-Rai al-Aam newspaper quoted him as saying OPEC was pumping 2.4 mln barrels per day (bpd) less than its 15.8 mln bpd ceiling, while consumers were drawing down their petroleum stocks at a rate of 4.5 mln bpd.     As long as OPEC maintains its output curbs, demand for its oil will rise in April and May, Sheikh Ali said, adding that Kuwait was strongly committed to its OPEC quota.  \n',crude
'Five regional oil producing nations will gather in Caracas tommorrow for a two-day meeting expected to center on ways to combat proposals for a U.S. tax on imported petroleum, the Venezuela\'s ministry of energy and mines said.     Oil ministers from Mexico, Trinidad and Tobago, Ecuador and Venezuela will be on hand for the fifth meeting of the informal group of Latin American and Caribbean Petroleum Exporters, formed in 1983, it said. Colombia will also attend for the first time, as an observer nation, the ministry said.     Energy and Mines Minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said the conference has no set agenda but one entire session Friday will be devoted to proposals for a tax on imported oil.     Two of the group\'s members, Venezuela and Mexico, are second and third largest foreign suppliers of oil to the United States, respectively, following Canada.     Venezuela, concerned about the effect such a tax would have on its exports, undertook a diplomatic push to coordinate strategy against such measures. In February, Canadian Energy Minister Marcel Masse was invited to Caracas for talks with Hernandez on proposals for an oil import tax.  \n',crude
'Two new U.K. Tax relief measures for oil producers, announced today, are aimed at encouraging developments in the North Sea to go ahead and boost opportunities for the offshore supplies industry, the Inland Revenue said in a post-budget statement.     Earlier, Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson announced in his annual budget to Parliament that from today, companies will be allowed to offset up to 10 pct of qualifying development expenditure on certain future oil fields against Petroleum Revenue Tax (PRT).     To date, full relief was allowed for expenditure on an individual field itself, when its income stream began, but was not immediately available against other development expenditure, the statement said.     The new relief will apply to fields outside the southern basin for which development consent is first given on or after today, and will improve the post-tax economics of new developments and encourage companies to proceed with project which might have been delayed, it said.     Lawson also announced that he would henceforth allow certain expenditure on oil related research which does not at present qualify for PRT relief to be offset against PRT liability.     This means oil-related expenditure in the U.K. Or on the U.K. Continental shelf, which has not become allowable in a particular field within three years of being incurred, to be allowed against PRT liability in any oil field, the Inland Revenue said.     This brings the scope of PRT relief for research costs more in line with corporation tax relief measures, and is planned to encourage general research into ways of reducing field development costs, it said.     In due course, the industry should benefit by over 100 mln stg a year, it calculated.     The Inland Revenue statement also included other technical measures that Lawson did not comment on in his budget speech.     These included measures to allow companies to balance their shares of PRT-exempt oil allowances through reallocation in two past periods of allowance utilisation.     Tidier rules on incorrectly allowed PRT expenditure reliefs were announced, while there were also ammendments on rules on corporation tax and Advance Corporation Tax relating to the so-called \"ring fence\" of activities in the U.K. And its continental shelf. The Finance Bill will have provisions for the implementation of measures announced in November, it said.     Gareth Lewis Davies, a North Sea expert with stockbrokers Wood Mackenzie and Co Inc in Edinburgh, thought the two reliefs on PRT would help the depressed offshore industry.     He said the 10 pct cross field allowance relief would favour chances that development of smaller North Sea fields such Osprey, Don and Arbroath would be brought forward.     Early development of the larger Miller and Bruce oil fields might also be encouraged, he said.     Lewis Davies said the measure might also aid the offshore construction industry, which suffered a huge amount of lay-offs under the price slump of more than 50 pct last year.     He pointed out that the relief only applies to the development of new fields outside the Southern Basin.     This means more jobs could be created, as the fields in the central and northern sectors of the North Sea are deeper than in the south and thus have greater capital and labour requirements as the waters are deeper than in the south.     He said the PRT relief for certain research expenditure would help fundamental research in the oil industry, although the benefits of this research would not be seen for several year.  \n',crude
'U.S. refiners will have to reduce operations if they want to be profitable this year, said industry officials attending the National Petroleum Refiners Association meeting here.      \"If the refining sector can discipline itself to refine about 12 mln barrels of crude oil a day, we have a chance to pull down inventories to acceptable levels by the second quarter, said Archie Dunham, executive vice president of petroluem products at Conoco Inc     \"If not, the industry will have a tough 1987,\" he added.      Last week\'s American Petroleum Institute report said that U.S. refining capacity rose three pct to 78.7 pct of capacity, with crude oil runs at 12.2 mln barrels per day for the week ended March 20.      The API said that with the higher crude oil runs,  distillate and gasoline inventories were sharply above year-ago levels. Gasoline stocks were at 245.6 mln barrels, some 17.2 mln barrels above year-ago levels. Distillate stocks, at 108.7 mln barrels, are 10.9 mln barrels above last year\'s level, the API said.      Henry Rosenberg, chairman of Crown Central Petroleum Corp CNP tolds that unless refining and marketing return to profitability, oil companies will have to rely on downstream operations to produce an acceptable level of earnings.      \"The jump in refining capacity is a concern if it continues,\" said Kenneth Buckler, executive vice president of refining and marketing at Total Petroleum Co, a U.S. subsidiary of Cie Francaise Des Petroles of France.      Refineries should operate near 75 pct of capacity given the current level of demand but the operating level should increase as gasoline demand picks up in the next quarter, Buckler said.      Dunham said the potential operable capacity of U.S. refineries should also be cut about 500,000 barrels of crude per day. \"I expect to see the shutdown of more small refineries over the next five years,\" he said, adding that these facilities refine between 10,000 and 30,000 barrels of crude oil per day. The API said U.S. operations have the capacity to refine 15.6 mln bpd of crude.  \n',crude
'Madagascar extended its oil exploration agreement with the U.S. Firm Amoco Corp AN for 17 months to allow for further studies of the Morondava basin on the southwest coast, a government statement said.     It said the existing five-year agreement, due to expire this July 24, was extended until the end of 1988 to allow for additional geological and geophysical studies.     Amoco has so far laid 7,100 km of seismic lines and sunk five exploration wells in the Morondava basin. It may drill a further three wells before the end of the extended exploration period, the statement said.     Madagascar has signed oil exploration agreements with four foreign oil companies since 1981. But despite promising indications of large reserves, no commercial production plans have yet been announced.     The foreign firms - Amoco, Occidental Petroleum Corp OXY, Mobil Corp MOB and a unit of Ente Nazionale Idrocarburi - are working in partnership with the National Military Office for Strategic Industries (OMNIS).     Roland Ratsimandresy, the director general of OMNIS, said at a ceremenony to sign the extension of the Amoco agreement that his department would intensify oil exploration with its existing partners and would soon offer a new round of exploration licences.  \n',crude
'Malaysia\'s state oil company Petronas will cut oil production to 420,000 barrels per day (bpd) from May 1, trade sources said.     Malaysia cut its 510,000 bpd target output by 10 pct last September to support Opec moves to boost prices, and the latest cut would reduce output by 17.5 pct from 1986\'s target level.     Petronas said in February that Malaysia would maintain its 10 pct production cutback until mid-1987.     However, the Finance Ministry said in its annual report that Malaysia\'s crude oil output was expected to rise to an average 510,000 bpd in 1987.     The ministry\'s forecast assumed average 1987 crude prices at 13 dlrs/barrel (bbl), but prices have risen enough to permit further production cutbacks, the sources said.     Malaysia\'s benchmark Tapis blend fetched above 18 dlrs/bbl this year against a low of 10.50 dlrs/bbl in July, they said.     Traders said further reductions by Malaysia would add to the tight spot availabilities of Asian grades caused by reduced Indonesian and Chinese crude output.     The cutback will also help Malaysia maintain prices, as there is concern some buyers want to reduce term purchases due to the availability of cheaper alternatives, the sources said.     In addition to term sales, Petronas has been offering two to three 400,000 bbl spot cargoes of Malaysian crude each month for sale through tender, the sources said.     However, this practice is likely to dwindle given the reduced scale of production, they said. \n',crude
'Marathon Petroleum Co said it reduced the contract price it will pay for all grades of crude oil one dlr a barrel, effective today.     The decrease brings Marathon\'s posted price for both West Texas Intermediate and West Texas Sour to 16.50 dlrs a bbl. The South Louisiana Sweet grade of crude was reduced to 16.85 dlrs a bbl.     The company last changed its crude postings on Jan 12.  \n',crude
'OPEC produced only about 14 mln bpd of oil in the second week of March -- 1.8 mln bpd below its ceiling -- largely because of pipeline problems in Turkey and Ecuador, the Middle East Economic Survey (MEES) estimated.     A landslide breached Iraq\'s one mln bpd pipeline through Turkey on March 6 for a week, and earthquakes in Ecuador have shut down its export pipeline for four to five months. Ecuador has an OPEC quota of 210,000 bpd.     MEES put Saudi Arabian output at 2.9 mln bpd in the first week of March and 3.1 mln bpd in the second, in addition to output from the Neutral Zone between Saudi Arabia and Kuwait.     MEES said Saudi Arabia was pumping more than 300,000 bpd of its total production into floating storage.     Saudi Oil Minister Hisham Nazer tolds and the television news agency Visnews yesterday that Saudi output, including Neutral Zone production, was around three mln bpd.     The Cyprus-based newsletter also said authoritative Libyan oil sources said Libya was producing 850,000 bpd, compared with its 948,000 bpd quota, and that actual liftings are much lower than that.     It said one major Libyan equity producer had partially stopped lifting its 55,000 bpd equity entitlement for March because Libya was insisting on official prices, but is still lifting 40,000 bpd of debt crude at official prices and a further 25,000 bpd of \"purchase crude.\"     It said small equity producers, with entitlements of only 2,000 to 3,000 bpd, had also told Tripoli they could not lift at official prices.     MEES said Iraq had sent a telex to OPEC and member countries calling for the formation of a committee to study what it said were inequalities in marketing potential among various members.     The newsletter said the Iraqi letter indicated Baghdad was having difficulty selling crude at official prices.     The Iraqi telex pointed out that some member countries export substantial volumes of oil that are not subject to OPEC price regulations -- exports of refined products, equity crude on which the margins are equivalent to covert discounts and \"other forms of hydrocarbons\" which are marketed in package deals with crude oil.  \n',crude
'The average price of mexico\'s crude oil exports in first quarter 1987 will be 15.25 dlrs per barrel, according to preliminary figures issued in a press release by the state oil company Petroleos Mexicanos (PEMEX).     It gave no direct comparison with the year-ago figure but said crude and products sales were expected to rise to 1.99 billion dlrs this quarter, 420 mln dlrs higher than expected and 22 pct better than the year-ago quarter.     Prospects for the second quarter were relatively favourable with crude exports seen at 1.320 mln bpd after an expected 1.324 mln this month, 1.323 in February and 1.395 mln in January.  \n',crude
'mexico\'s proven reserves of liquid hydrocarbons at end-1986 were 70 billion barrels, slightly down from 70.9 billion a year ago and 71.75 billion in 1984, the state oil company petroleos mexicanos (pemex) announced.     Reserves were just 5.77 billion barrels in 1974, rose sharply to 40.19 billion in 1978 and flattened out at 72 billion in both 1981 and 1982.     In its annual report, pemex said average crude output in 1986 was 2.43 mln barrels per day, 202,000 bpd down on 1985. Average exports were 1.29 mln bpd, down from 1.44 mln bpd.     The company did not say what percentage of hydrocarbons was crude oil, but has previouly said it was about 48 pct.     Natural gas output in 1986 was 3.43 billion cubic feet per day, down from 3.6 billion in 1985.     Due mainly to the fall in oil prices to around 12 dlrs from 25 dlrs in the year, 58 wells, both exploratory and production, were suspended, 38 of them in less productive areas than the offshore campeche fields which accounted for 64 pct of production.  \n',crude
'Mobil Corp MOB.N of the U.S. Plans to open an office in Peking to develop oil exploration opportunities in China, the China Daily said.     It quoted Mobil president Richard Tucker, currently in Peking, as saying he is optimistic about investment prospects in China and that Peking will continue to encourage foreign private businesses to invest here.     It said Mobil bought 73 mln dlrs of crude oil and oil products from China in 1986 and sold it lubricant and fertiliser, but gave no more details.  \n',crude
'Mobil Oil Corp of U.S. Plans to open an office in Peking to develop oil exploration opportunities in China, the China Daily said.      It quoted Mobil president Richard Tucker, currently in Peking, as saying he is optimistic about investment prospects in China and that Peking will continue to encourage foreign private businesses to invest here.      It said Mobil bought 73 mln dlrs of crude oil and oil products from China in 1986 and sold it lubricant and fertiliser, but gave no more details.  \n',crude
'Selm-Societa Energia Montedison is to close its Priolo crude refining units from March 15th to March 28th for maintenance, a company spokesman said.     Throughput at the refinery is currently estimated at 140-150,000 bpd, although total capacity is nearer 200,000 bpd.     Several other Mediterranean refineries are currently shutdown for maintenance, most of which were scheduled some months ago. But industry sources said that shutdowns may have been rearranged to avoid running negative-netback crude.      Tighter availabilities of products as a result of the  shutdowns in the Med is helping to keep products markets bullish, particularly for March deliveries, oil traders said.     Garrone\'s refinery at San Quirico (capacity 130,000 bpd) is due to shutdown on March 14th for three weeks, and the jointly-owned ISAB/Garrone refinery at Mellili, capacity 220,000 bpd, is due to start up around March 20-25th following its closure for maintenance a month ago, a company spokesman said.     The Esso Italiana refineries at Augusta and Siracusa will not be closing this spring, a spokesman for the company said.     In France, the distillation unit at Societe Francaise de BP\'s Lavera refinery has been closed for maintenance since March 2, and is due to restart early April. Total capacity is 181,900 bpd. It is currently operating at around 50 pct capacity, a company spokesman said.     Shell Francaise\'s Berre l\'Etang refinery will shut down in early April until mid-June, a company spokesman said. Capacity is around 150,000 bpd. Compagnie Francaise de Raffinage (CFR) will close the visbreaker at its La Mede refinery in early April, but would not affect crude throughput at the refinery, a company spokesman said. Current capacity is 136,000 bbl/day.     Despite current bullish sentiment in the Med, however, traders noted that crude netbacks are beginning to look more attractive, and most maintenance shutdowns should be finished in two to three weeks.     As a result, oil industry sources suggest that the situation may ease by mid-April.  \n',crude
'Most Japanese companies have decided not to renew term contracts to lift Iranian crude oil because spot prices remain considerably lower than OPEC\'s official levels, industry sources said.     They said a cargo of the Mideast benchmark crude Dubai traded yesterday at 16.50 dlrs a barrel, compared to its official price of 17.42 dlrs.     Only one Japanese company has renewed its term contract for Iranian crude oil for the second quarter, the sources said.     The sources said Japanese companies had been lifting a total of about 185,000 barrels per day (bpd) of Iranian crude under term contracts, but only one firm has agreed to lift in the second quarter. It is lifting just 10,000 to 15,000 bpd.     They said this move could inspire Iran to offer discounts on cargoes loading in April, but the likelihood of discounts depended largely on the levels of spot prices.     \"If the spot price of Dubai goes above 17.30 dlrs we would probably buy Iranian crude at the official price,\" one Japanese refiner said.     \"We don\'t intend to put pressure on them,\" he added.     Buyers have little incentive to renew contracts to lift oil at official OPEC prices while spot prices on all grades are considerably lower, oil traders said.     They said if spot prices move higher there will be no problem finding OPEC crude to purchase at the official prices. Qatar has chartered floating storage for its crude oil after finding no buyers at official prices in March. The problem is likely to recur in April, adding to that country\'s surplus.     The traders added that Iraq had dissociated itself from OPEC\'s December production agreement, while agreeing to the fixed prices.     But oil analysts said if OPEC keeps group output close to its first-half 1987 ceiling of 15.8 mln bpd, supply and demand would be balanced by the end of the second quarter.     They also said if OPEC holds its official price structure based on a reference price of 18 dlrs, spot price fluctuations should be limited to a 16.50 to 17.20 dlrs range for Dubai and a 17 to 18 dlrs range for the North Sea\'s Brent blend.     One Japanese refiner said, \"At the moment there\'s a lot of pressure on OPEC, particularly on Qatar. But if they hold out there will be no problem, and I\'m beginning to trust their ability.\"     Nigerian oil minister and OPEC president Rilwanu Lukman told a news conference in Lagos yesterday, \"Nigeria and all member countries of OPEC remain determined to uphold the December agreement by adhering strictly to their various quotas and official selling prices.\"     He said OPEC believed consumers had drawn heavily on stocks of both crude oil and refined products, reducing them to levels well below this time last year. He said consumers would soon return to the market in search of crude.     A Japanese refiner said, \"The European and U.S. Markets are beginning to look better so OPEC might be quite lucky.\" \n',crude
'Greece and Turkey\'s NATO allies today called on both countries to avoid any action that could aggravate an explosive situation in the Aegean and \"avoid recourse to force at all costs.\"     After an emergency meeting of NATO ambassadors, a statement was issued saying \"the present situation damages the interests of Greece and Turkey, and of the Alliance as a whole.\"     Secretary-General Lord Carrington also offered himself as a mediator in the dispute on the Western Alliance\'s southern flank.     The meeting was called after reports that warships of both countries were sailing towards a disputed oil exploration zone of the Aegean.     The statement said the tensions in the area had reached a serious level and called on both countries to begin immediate discussions. \"Any intensification would make things worse,\" it added.     No attempt was made at the meeting to resolve the complex dispute which was aimed at damage-limitation. Carrington said, \"I am of course anxious to help in any way I can, provided that both Greece and Turkey, and the other allies, wish me to do so.\"  \n',crude
'NATO ambassadors met in emergency session today to discuss tension between members Greece and Turkey over a disputed area of the Aegean Sea on the Western Alliance\'s southern flank, Greek diplomatic sources said.     They said no information had yet emerged from the meeting, called after statements from both countries that they were prepared to back rival oil exploration teams with warships.     General Guven Ergenc, Secretary General of the Turkish General Staff, said today the Turkish research ship Sismik 1, escorted by an unspecified number of warships, would sail into disputed waters in the Aegean Sea tomorrow morning.     Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou said \"The military readiness of our country is able now to give a very hard lesson if our neighbours (Turkey) were to carry out military actions.\"     The row erupted when the Greek government said last month that it was taking control of a Canadian-led consortium which was already producing oil off the Greek island of Thassos and would drill in the same area after the takeover.  \n',crude
'Higher crude oil prices will raise demand for natural gas, helping it to reclaim market share lost to heavy oil when prices plunged in 1986, analysts said.     The analysts said that these efforts will be most successful in the industrial sectors of the economy with large and growing energy requirements.     \"Natural gas stands a good chance to recapture the share of oil supplied to electric utilities that it lost to the residual fuel industry last year,\" Michael Smolinski, an energy economist with Data Resources Inc, tolds.     An estimated 200,000 barrels per day of residual fuel went into the utilities market at the expense of natural gas last year when world oil prices plunged, Smolinski said.      Assuming oil prices hold above 15 dlrs a barrel, national average gas prices delivered to the utilities at a projected 2.10 to 2.25 dlrs per mln Btu would be very competitive, Michael German, vice president of economic analysis at American Gas Association said.     The average delivered prices at the end of January were 2.10 dlrs per mln Btu, compared with 3.26 dlrs a year ago.     \"We expect natural gas to regain 250 to 400 billion cubic feet (of demand) in the overall energy market in the second and third quarter (1987),\" he said.     In addition to price competitiveness, availability will be an important factor persuading energy users to switch to gas, Frank Spadine, senior energy economist with Bankers Trust Corp. in New York noted.     Spadine said the mild winter in many parts of the North American continent has led to a build up of gas inventories and less would be necessary to replenish underground storage this spring freeing gas for spot sales.     These forecasts develop a strong counterpoint to the fears that natural gas suplies would be tight and prices significantly higher given a sharp decline in drilling last year.     AGA\'s German contended that despite the drilling decline, much of U.S. proved reserves could be brought to production quickly through developments such as the infill drilling which permits more wells to be drilled in proved reserve basins.     Citing recent EIA statistics, German said, the gas surplus was likely to contract from three trillion cubic feet in 1986 to two trillion cubic feet in 1987, but the surplus would not go away until 1990.     Smolinski of Data Resources agreed that the surplus would persist until 1990. While gas supplies may tighten in certain consuming areas, notably in California and in the Northeast U.S., an overall shortfall appeared remote.  \n',crude
'New England Electric System NES expects its cash construction spending to reach 205 mln dlrs this year, up from 188 mln dlrs in 1986, the utility said in material distributed at an analysts meeting.     It said spending is expected to advance to 215 mln dlrs in 1988 and 220 mln dlrs in 1989.     The utility said these totals exclude spending on New England Hydro-Transmission being built to import electricity from Quebec Hydro. New England Electric is the operator of this venture as well as owning 51 pct of the project.     The venture expects to spend 65 mln dlr this year, 105 mln dlrs next year and 125 mln dlrs in 1989 to build transmission lines from northern Quebec into New England, the utility said.     New England Electric said internally generated funds will cover all of its power plant construction costs this year and 65 pct of the 108 mln dlrs its retail distribution units plan to spend in 1987.     The company said it also expects to spend 60 mln dlrs on its oil and gas activities this year, adding internally generated funds are expected to provide 85 pct of this total.     New England Electric said it plans to issue 30 mln dlrs worth of pollution control bonds in 1987 and retire additional higher cost preferred stock. Its Granite State Electric unit plans to issue five mln dlrs of long term notes early this year as well.     The company said it does not plan to offer common shares this year or in the foreseeable future, but expects to raise about 40 mln dlrs in equity through the sale of stock under its dividend reinvestment plan and employee share plans.     President Samuel Huntington told the analysts the construction spending projection is based on the expectation that demand for electricity in the New England electric system will grow about two pct a year for the next 15 years.     However, the utility cannot ignore the potential for sharper growth, he said, pointing out that demand was up 5.2 pct in 1986 and 4.7 pct per year in the past four years.     He attributed this growth to declining electricity prices and a strong New England economy.     Huntington said New England Elecetric has \"all but rejected new coal fired plants\" to supply additional power.     He said the most attractive new power supplies are those with short lead times which can be built in modules.     Later, vice president Glenn Schleede said the utility is looking at gas-fired, combined cycle generating units to supply most of its new power needs, but has not rejected coal-fired fluidized bed units.     He explained that fluidized bed technology is available in modular units, adding that Huntington was referring to the traditional coal-fired plant which burns pulverized coal.  \n',crude
'Energy and Mines Minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti today told a meeting of regional oil exporters the next few months will be critical to efforts to achieve price recovery and stabilize the market.      Hernandez said while OPEC and non-OPEC nations have already made some strides in their efforts to strengthen the market, the danger of a reversal is always present.     \"March and the next two or three months will be a really critical period,\" Hernandez said. He said, \"We will be able to define a movement, either towards market stability and price recovery or, depending on the market, a reversal.\"     Earlier this week, Hernandez said Venezuela\'s oil price has averaged just above 16 dlrs a barrel for the year to date. If OPEC achieves its stated goal of an 18 dlrs a barrel average price, he said, Venezuela\'s should move up to 16.50 dlrs.     Hernandez spoke today at the opening of the fifth ministerial meeting of the informal group of Latin American and Caribbean oil exporters, formed in 1983.     Ministers from member states Ecuador, Mexico, Trinidad-Tobago and Venezuela are attending the two day conference, while Colombia is present for the first time as an observer.     Hernandez defined the meeting as an informal exchange of ideas about the oil market. However, the members will also discuss ways to combat proposals for a tax on imported oil currently before the U.S. Congress.     Following the opening session, the group of ministers met with President Jaime Lusinchi at Miraflores, the presidential palace. The delegations to the conference are headed by Hernandez of Venezuela, Energy Minister Javier Espinosa of Ecuador, Energy Minister Kelvin Ramnath of Trinidad-Tobago, Jose Luis Alcudiai, assistant energy secretary of Mexico and Energy Minister Guilermno Perry Rubio of Colombia.  \n',crude
'ESSO SAF ESSF.PA, the French subsidiary of Exxon Corp XON, said it had no immediate plans to shut down one of its two refineries. Exxon\'s new president Lee R. Raymond said earlier that it could decide to close a French refinery.     An ESSO SAF spokesman said a closure was a hypothesis that depended on the evolution of the market and refineries\' ability to make money. He said Port Jerome west of Paris and Fos sur Mer on the Mediterranean had benefitted from new investment over 1985-86 and had last year broken even after stock losses.     The Port Jerome refinery has an annual production capacity of seven mln tonnes while Fos sur Mer\'s is five mln, the spokesman added.     Industry sources said the easiest plant to dispose of would be Fos sur Mer because it is a single refinery, while the Port Jerome refinery is attached to a wider complex comprising a petrochemical plant and a lubricant production plant.     Raymond was quoted as saying in a published interview that Exxon was reviewing its worldwide refinery operations and might decide to close one of its French refineries.  \n',crude
'Norwegian oil companies Norsk Hydro A/S NHY.OL and Saga Petroleum A/S SAGO.OL said they have applied for offshore exploration drilling licenses in Gabon on Africa\'s west coast.     Saga Petroleum said it has applied for a 35 pct share and operatorship on one block, adding Finnish oil company Neste NEOY.HE(25 pct), Spain\'s Hispanoil (25 pct), and the World Bank\'s International Finance Corporation (IFS) (15 pct) have joined Saga to fill remaining shares in the application.     Saga spokesman Roy Halvorsen tolds he expected Gabonese officials would reply to the application by Easter.     Halvorsen said this is the first time Saga has applied to operate on OPEC-member Gabon\'s continental shelf, adding that Italian oil company Agip is heading a group of applicants in a separate bid for the same license.     Norsk Hydro has also applied for an undisclosed share in a single exploration license in which U.S. Oil company Tenneco has already been assigned operatorship, company spokesman Bjoern Tretvoll said.  \n',crude
'Norway has offered 10 new offshore blocks to foreign and domestic applicants in the first phase of the country\'s eleventh concession round, government officials said.     Company shares in each of the licences proposed by the Oil and Energy Ministry are not final. The ministry has given the companies 10 days to accept or decline the proposed shares.     French companies Ste Nationale Elf Aquitaine ELFP.PA and Total Cie Francaise des Petroles TPN.PA, which were expected to receive operatorships following France\'s agreement last autumn to purchase gas from Norway\'s Troll field, were not offered operatorships in this round, industry sources said.     Three eleventh round blocks were awarded in the Haltenbanken exploration tract off central Norway, including the Smoerbukk West field where Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap A/S STAT.OL (Statoil) was appointed operator.     Statoil will share the licence with subsidiaries of U.S. Oil companies Tenneco Inc TGT.N and Texas Eastern Corp TET.N and the Italian oil company Agip SpA\'s Norwegian subsidiary.     E.I. Du Pont de Nemours DD.N subsidiary Conoco Norway Inc was named operator on Haltenbanken block 6406/8 and will share the licence with Statoil.     Norsk Hydro A/S NHY.OL will operate nearby block 6407/10 with partners Statoil, Norsk Agip A/S, Royal Dutch/Shell Group\'s RD.AS A/S Norske Shell and Deminex unit Deminex (Norge) A/S.     Statoil has been offered the operatorship on a new block in the relatively unexplored Moere South exploration area south of Haltenbanken, with A/S Norske Shell, Texas Eastern and Petroleo Brasileiro SA (Petrobras) also offered stakes in the block.     Norwegian companies landed operatorships on all six blocks opened in the Barents Sea area off northern Norway. The blocks were awarded in three licenses, each covering two blocks.     Statoil will head exploration on blocks 7224/7 and 7224/8, sharing the licence with Exxon Corp\'s XON.N Norwegian subsidiary Esso Norge A/S, The British Petroleum Co PLC\'s BP.L BP Petroleum Development (Norway) Ltd, Shell, Norsk Hydro and Saga Petroleum A/S SAGP.OL.     Blocks 7219/9 and 7220/7 were awarded to Norsk Hydro, the operator, Statoil, Mobil Corp\'s MOB.N Mobil Exploration Norway, Petrofina SA\'s PETB.BR Norske Fina A/S and BP.     The third Barents Sea licence, covering blocks 7124/3 and 7125/1, went to Saga Petroleum A/S, the operator, Statoil, Atlantic Richfield Co\'s ARC.N Arco Norge A/S, Total Marine Norge A/S and Amerada Hess Corp AHC.N.     The oil ministry withheld awards on four strategic blocks included in the eleventh round\'s second phase.     The ministry is accepting applications for phase two blocks until early April and the awards will likely be announced this summer, officials said.  \n',crude
'The New York Mercantile Exchange said it will introduce exchanges for physicals (EFPS) to its energy futures markets April one.     An exchange spokeswoman said the change will allow oil traders that do not hold a futures position to initiate, after the exchange closes, a transaction that can subsequently be hedged in the futures market.     EFPs, already in effect for platinum futures on NYMEX, are expected to increase the open interest and liquidity in U.S. energy futures, according to traders and analysts.     The Commodity Futures Trading Commission approved the rule change in February, according to a CFTC spokeswoman.  \n',crude
'The New York Mercantile Exchange set April one for the debut of a new procedure in the energy complex that will increase the use of energy futures worldwide.      On April one, NYMEX will allow oil traders that do not hold a futures position to initiate, after the exchange closes, a transaction that can subsequently be hedged in the futures market, according to an exchange spokeswoman.     \"This will change the way oil is transacted in the real world,\" said said Thomas McKiernan, McKiernan and Co chairman.     Foreign traders will be able to hedge trades against NYMEX prices before the exchange opens and negotiate prices at a differential to NYMEX prices, McKiernan explained.      The expanded program \"will serve the industry because the oil market does not close when NYMEX does,\" said Frank Capozza, secretary of Century Resources Inc.      The rule change, which has already taken effect for platinum futures on NYMEX, is expected to increase the open interest and liquidity in U.S. energy futures, according to traders and analysts.     Currently, at least one trader in this transaction, called an exchange for physical or EFP, must hold a futures position before entering into the transaction.     Under the new arrangement, neither party has to hold a futures position before entering into an EFP and one or both parties can offset their cash transaction with a futures contract the next day, according to exchange officials.     When NYMEX announced its proposed rule change in December, NYMEX President Rosemary McFadden, said, \"Expansion of the EFP provision will add to globalization of the energy markets by providing for, in effect, 24-hour trading.\"     The Commodity Futures Trading Commission approved the rule change in February, according to a CFTC spokeswoman.  \n',crude
'Papua New Guinea (PNG) provides the most exciting new prospect in the Asia-Pacific region for oil production, energy analyst Fereidun Fesharaki said here.     The recent successful find at Iagifu is likely to put PNG on the list of major oil exporters by the early 1990s, he told the Australian Petroleum Exploration Association annual conference.     Fesharaki, leader of the Energy Program at the East-West Center in Honolulu, Hawaii, was speaking on the Asia-Pacific petroleum outlook.     With domestic demand of around 12,000 barrels per day (bpd) and prospects of production of over 100,000 bpd by late 1991, PNG would become an Ecuador-level crude exporter, Fesharaki said.     The Iagifu wells in the Papuan Basin have recorded the best oil flows in more than 60 years of exploration in PNG.     The PNG government\'s Geological Survey in a paper distributed at the conference estimates Iagifu reserves at about 500 mln barrels.     PNG enjoys the most liberal tax regime in the region with no secondary taxes, Fesharaki said.     \"We expect a much larger oil search in Papua New Guinea, and discovery of much larger volumes of oil, similar in quality to (light) Bass Strait crude,\" Fesharaki said.     There are also large pockets of high quality condensates to be produced, notably in the Juha field near Iagifu which is capable of producing 30,000 to 40,000 bpd, he said.     But prices should be somewhat higher than the present levels to justify development of the Juha field, he said.     The PNG Geological Survey paper noted there are five large prospective but little-explored sedimentary basins in PNG.  \n',crude
'Top executives with Tenneco Corp TGT and Sabine Corp SAB said they expected world oil prices to gradually increase over the next two years as U.S. reliance on imports of oil from the Middle East grows.      \"I believe we have bottomed out and can look forward to a trend of gradually increasing prices,\" C.W. Nance, president of Tenneco Oil Exploration and Production, told a meeting of the Petroleum Equipment Suppliers Association.      Nance predicted that by 1990, the Organization of Producing and Exporting Countries would be producing at the rate of 80 pct of capacity.     The gain will come largely through increased imports to the United States, he said.     \"They will be able to raise the price again but I do not think they will raise it as much as they did in 1979,\" Nance said. He did not say how much of a price hike he expected.      Andrew Shoup, chairman of Dallas-based Sabine, predicted that world oil prices would increase from a range of 15 to 20 dlrs a barrel in 1987 to a range of 17 to 22 dlrs a barrel in 1988. Natural gas prices, Shoup said, should similarly climb from a range of 1.30 to 1.70 dlrs per mcf this year to between 1.50 and 1.90 dlrs per mcf in 1988.      \"Fuel switching could help us as much as five pct in increased demand,\" Shoup said, referring to the gas industry\'s outlook for 1987. Repeal of the Fuel Use Act, a federal law prohibiting the use of natural gas in new manufacturing plants and utilities, could increase demand for gas by as much as 15 pct, he said.      Tenneco\'s Nance also said that some U.S. cities may experience peak day shortages in natural gas supplies next winter because of the industry\'s reduced deliverability.      Tenneco\'s gas deliverability, for example, dropped by 20 pct during 1986, he said.      \"This does not mean the gas bubble is gone,\" Nance said. \"We believe gas prices have bottomed out. The real question is how broad the valley is -- is it one year, two years or three years before we start to climb out?\"       J.C. Walter of Walter Oil and Gas Corp, said the recent improvement in oil prices was not enough for independent producers to begin new onshore drilling projects.      \"If crude oil stays below 20 dlrs a barrel and 1.50 dlr per mcf for natural gas prevails, the prospects for onshore exploration at deeper depths in the Texas Gulf Coast by independents in the 1990s are pretty dismal,\" Walter said.      He suggested that some independents may instead turn to exploration in shallow federal offshore leases. Farm-out agreements, cheap rig rates and less competition have held finding costs in those areas to five or six dlrs a barrel, Walter said.  \n',crude
'Foreign oil companies will spend less on exploration in Indonesia this year than last, budgeting 2.7 billion dlrs for calendar 1987 against 1986 spending of 2.8 billion dlrs, the state oil company Pertamina said.     Actual spending last year fell short of the budgeted figure of 3.2 billion dlrs, as oil companies slashed expenditure because of the crash in world oil prices.     Jumardi Jukardi, head of Pertamina\'s coordinating board for foreign contractors, said foreign companies will drill 110 exploration wells and 431 development wells this year, against 108 and 330 last year.  \n',crude
'Crude oil prices rallied today, moving over 17.00 dlrs a barrel because of Saudi Arabia\'s determined effort to support prices, analysts said.     \"The Saudis and other OPEC nations are jawboning the market, hoping to restore confidence and prices and to do this without another meeting,\" said Sanford Margoshes, oil analyst with Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc.     \"But OPEC is not out of the woods yet by a longshot due to seasonal declines in demand and some cheating,\" he added.     Oil industry analysts said Saudi Arabia has led the attempt to get other OPEC members to resist pressures to discount from the official prices agreed to last december.     The analysts said that to get others to hold the line, Saudi Arabia pushed hard at the meeting of deputy oil ministers of the Gulf Cooperation Council last weekend and at the Cooperation Council oil ministers\' meeting the previous week.     The Saudis have also offered to support members having difficulty in selling their oil, analysts said.     \"They are trying to make sure that no one discounts, and to prevent that, it appears that Saudi Arabia or some other OPEC member will allocate some of their oil sales to help members that lose sales,\" Margoshes said.     He added that the allocations would probably be in the form of loans to be repaid when these nations resume sales.     Analysts said this would be useful in keeping in line nations like Qatar, which has had trouble selling oil. But it is also likely that such assistance would be provided to Nigeria which is under pressure to extend discounts.     Analysts said that Saudi Arabia, with assistance from OPEC president Rilwanu Lukman, was trying to avoid an emergency OPEC meeting for fear that it would give the appearance that the December pact is falling apart.     Daniel McKinley, oil analyst with Smith Barney, Upham Harris and Co said, \"both physical and futures markets have been oversold and it only took a small spark to bring on a short covering rally.\"     He believes an Iranian trade mission to Tokyo, which refused discounts to Japanese buyers, brought Japanese refiners into the market to cover their short positions.     Oil traders said one japanese refiner came into the market to but 10 cargoes of May Dubai, which sent prices up on Mideast sours, with Dubai trading up to 16.50 dlrs after trading yeterray as low as 15.63 dlrs and then spilled over into the North sea crude oil market.     Traders said that there have been persistent rumors today that Japanese buyers are looking to pick up cargoes of Brent for Japan and European trade sources indidate rumors of vessels being fixed to make such shipments.     North sea brent today rose over 17.00 dlrs with trades reported as high as 17.05 dlrs, up one dlr.     OPEC members\' denials that they are producing over their quotas sparked moves to cover short postitions.     Indonesian oil minister Subroto said today that OPEC production was below the 15.8 mln bpd quota agreed to last december but he gave no details on OPEC production against claims it was more at least one mln bpd above that level.     \"The production probably is about their quota level and largely because Saudi Arabia will not discount and canot sell its oil as a result,\" Margoshes said.     Analysts have mixed opinions about the extent of the current rally. Some believe prices can continue to rise if Saudi Arabia and OPEC hold steady in a refusal to discount.     But others said that despite the rally today there were still several fundamental factors, including demand, which could cut the rally short.     Marion Stewart, an indepedent petroleum economist, said slow growth in the economies of the U.S. and OECD would keep demand for oil slack and he now estimates that demand to rise about 1.4 pct over 1986.  \n',crude
'Energy futures now set the standard for oil pricing, said Arnold Safer, president of The Energy Futures Group Inc, a consulting firm.      \"Petroleum futures trading at the New York Mercantile Exchange literally set spot market prices in the U.S.,\" he said, adding that some oil products sellers now offer contracts based on a daily average of NYMEX prices.      He also said that petroleum futures are a major market for oil companies as well as for commodity traders. His remarks were made at the National Petroleum Refiners Association.  \n',crude
'A House taxwriter said Energy Secretary James Herrington\'s \"outrageous\" plan to restore an old tax break for oil companies was both bad tax and energy policy.     Rep. Pete Stark, a California Democrat and senior House Ways and Means Committee member, said Herrington\'s plan for a 27.5 pct depletion allowance--which in effect is a special 27.5 pct tax deduction --would cost seven billion dlrs a year.     \"He must have missed the last two years of federal tax reform by sleeping as soundly as Rip Van Winkle,\" Stark said.     He said in a statement the oil industry already pays an effective lower rate of U.S. tax on investment, 15 pct versus aggregate corporate tax on all investment of 34 pct, according to a recent Congressional Research Service study.  \n',crude
'Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said OPEC is deliberately under its production ceiling of 15.8 mln barrels to defend its 18 dlr a barrel price target.     He told reporters at an energy conference in Jakarta that OPEC had decided to maintain its price level of 18 dlrs.     \"We are deliberately defending the price, so OPEC production is less than 15.8 (mln) at the moment,\" he stated.     Asked if OPEC would increase production if prices went above 18 dlrs a barrel, he said this would be decided at the next OPEC meeting in June. \"We will discuss the market situation then,\" he added.     He said a meeting of the OPEC Differentials Committee had been postponed because \"there is no need for the meeting.\"     He did not elaborate. The committee had originally been due to meet in Vienna this week.  \n',crude
'OPEC may be forced to meet before a scheduled June session to readdress its production cutting agreement if the organization wants to halt the current slide in oil prices, oil industry analysts said.     \"The movement to higher oil prices was never to be as easy as OPEC thought. They may need an emergency meeting to sort out the problems,\" said Daniel Yergin, director of Cambridge Energy Research Associates, CERA.     Analysts and oil industry sources said the problem OPEC faces is excess oil supply in world oil markets.     \"OPEC\'s problem is not a price problem but a production issue and must be addressed in that way,\" said Paul Mlotok, oil analyst with Salomon Brothers Inc.     He said the market\'s earlier optimism about OPEC and its ability to keep production under control have given way to a pessimistic outlook that the organization must address soon if it wishes to regain the initiative in oil prices.     But some other analysts were uncertain that even an emergency meeting would address the problem of OPEC production above the 15.8 mln bpd quota set last December.     \"OPEC has to learn that in a buyers market you cannot have deemed quotas, fixed prices and set differentials,\" said the regional manager for one of the major oil companies who spoke on condition that he not be named. \"The market is now trying to teach them that lesson again,\" he added.     David T. Mizrahi, editor of Mideast reports, expects OPEC to meet before June, although not immediately. However, he is not optimistic that OPEC can address its principal problems.     \"They will not meet now as they try to take advantage of the winter demand to sell their oil, but in late March and April when demand slackens,\" Mizrahi said.     But Mizrahi said that OPEC is unlikely to do anything more than reiterate its agreement to keep output at 15.8 mln bpd.\"     Analysts said that the next two months will be critical for OPEC\'s ability to hold together prices and output.     \"OPEC must hold to its pact for the next six to eight weeks since buyers will come back into the market then,\" said Dillard Spriggs of Petroleum Analysis Ltd in New York.     But Bijan Moussavar-Rahmani of Harvard University\'s Energy and Environment Policy Center said that the demand for OPEC oil has been rising through the first quarter and this may have prompted excesses in its production.     \"Demand for their (OPEC) oil is clearly above 15.8 mln bpd and is probably closer to 17 mln bpd or higher now so what we are seeing characterized as cheating is OPEC meeting this demand through current production,\" he tolds in a telephone interview.  \n',crude
'Opec Conference President Rilwanu Lukman said the group was producing well below the 15.8 mln bpd ceiling it set in December, partly because liftings had been delayed or postponed by customers unwilling to pay fixed Opec prices.     Lukman, during a brief visit to London on his way home from Jamaica, tolds in a telephone interview that in February, Opec had underproduced partly because members were strictly abiding by production quotas and partly because they were resisting the temptation to sell at discounts to official prices of around 18 dlrs a barrel.     \"We are determined to stand firm by the (December) accord,\" he said. \"I have spoken to every other Opec minister and they are committed to making the accord work,\" he said.     Lukman gave no specific figures for February output. He said the Opec secretariat in Vienna was finalizing these figures.     Told of as survey published today which estimated that Opec output so far this week was below 15 mln bpd, he said; \"That could well be correct.\"     Opec\"s news agency Opecna today issued a statement saying group output was \"well below\" its ceiling in February. But it gave no figures.     But one source close to Opec indicated that February output may have been between 15.3 and 15.5 mln bpd.     The survey estimated Opec February output at around 16 mln bpd.     Opec agreed in December to cut output by 7.25 pct to 15.8 mln bpd and to return to fixed prices starting February 1.     Lukman said Qatar, Nigeria, Saudi Arabia and Iran had all produced in February below their Opec quotas. Iraq, which said it would not honour its 1.466 mln bpd quota under the December pact, had produced less than had been anticipated, he said.     Lukman said that some industry reports \"may be correct\" that in February, Nigeria propuced 75-100,000 bpd below its 1.238 mln bpd quota, Saudi Arabia 500,000 bpd less than its 4.133 mln allocation and Qatar 20 to 30 pct under its 285,000 bpd quota.     He said that sweet crudes such as those produced by his country were coming under price pressure because they were currently officially priced above sweet North Sea grades and the United States\" West Texas Intermediate (WTI) crude.     However, he said Opec in December had anticipated that demand would be slack at this time of year for seasonal reasons and expected the market to firm in two to three weeks.     \"We have to be patient for two or three weeks. The market is now firming on actual fundamentals,\" he said, adding that he expected it to go \"up and up\" even beyond official prices after early April. This is when, traditionally, there is more demand for gasoline-rich crudes such as Nigeria\"s.     The Opec President said producers such as Kuwait, Venezuela and Indonesia were having less problems with output than producers like his own country because they exported oil products.     Also, some of Venezuela\"s heavy grades were outside the Opec pricing system, he said.     Lukman said that if refiner-buyers, now refusing to lift some Opec oil at official prices, instead used their own stocks and ran them down to \"dangerous levels,\" they would eventually have to buy Opec oil.     \"When they realise it is not a free-for-all (in the market) they will realise they should buy now instead of paying more later on,\" he said.     Lukman, asked about industry reports that Nigeria was being pressured by equity producers for better terms, said it was important to know that terms with them were negotiable, flexible and under constant review, not only when the market seemed weak.     He said that so far, no meeting of the seven-nation ministerial differentials committee had been scheduled and that such a meeting, now twice-postponed, was not a high priority for Opec at the moment.     \"At this time, we have to get our priorities right,\" he said. \"The most important thing now is ensuring that the accord is working, not dealing with a differential of cents between grades.\"     But if any Opec member raised concerns or objections over the differential system, a meeting would be called, he said.  \n',crude
'OPEC has reaffirmed its commitment to fixed crude oil prices of around 18 dlrs a barrel and an overall output ceiling of 15.8 mln barrels per day (bpd) to defend prices, its president Rilwanu Lukman said.     He told a news conference here \"After due consultation with my colleagues in OPEC, I hereby wish to emphasize that Nigeria and all member countries of OPEC remain determined to uphold the December agreement by adhering strictly to their various quotas and official selling prices.\"     Lukman added no extraordinary OPEC conference was planned.     \"We are in a position to re-confirm that, despite misleading news in foreign media to the contrary, ... OPEC member countries as a whole produced below their agreed quota in the month of February,\" Lukman, who is Nigerian oil minister, said.     Lukman put the overall OPEC output shortfall in February at 900,000 bpd and said this was as a result of their firm determination to defend official selling prices of 18 dlrs agreed upon last December in Geneva.     The December agreement set an overall output ceiling for OPEC of 15.8 mln bpd for first half 1987 and restored fixed prices as from February 1 around a reference point of 18 dlrs.     Oil prices rallied immediately after the Geneva accord but fell again last month on reports that OPEC was producing more than the agreed level.     \"The idea was to suggest that OPEC\'s agreement would not hold and this caused some customers to hold back purchases of OPEC oil and resort to destocking to meet their needs,\" Lukman said.     He said the 900,000 bpd shortfall last February was based on the verified figure for 10 out of OPEC\'s 13 members, adding that Nigeria alone had a shortfall in production of 100,000 bpd.     Iraq disassociated itself from the December agreement, while the production figures of Ecuador and the United Arab Emirates needed to be verified, Lukman said.     \"If that is the price we have to pay to make the agreement succeed, we are ready ... OPEC is not changing its price level of 18 dlrs,\" the group\'s president said.     He said the OPEC price differentials committee meeting formerly postponed to April had been put off indefinitely.     \"Furthermore, no extraordinary meeting of the conference is at the moment contemplated since most agreements reached in December are being adhered to,\" he said.     Asked if the committee did not need to meet soon to narrow the gaps in the prices of the various OPEC crudes -- fixed in relation to the 18 dlr benchmark -- Lukman replied \"We consider the defence of our prices much more crucial than differentials.\"     Lukman said OPEC was aware that consumers had heavily drawn on stocks of both crude oil and refined products to levels well below this time last year and soon they would return to the market in search of crude.     \"We don\'t see that there is going to be any difficulty in maintaining the 18 dlr price throughout the rest of the year,\" Lukman said.     The OPEC president praised non-OPEC oil producers, which he said had contributed to the group\'s efforts to stabilise prices, but he criticised Britain for maintaining its long-held view not to do anything to help the market.     \"We are quite confident, however, that in the long-term with two-thirds of the world\'s reserves in OPEC hands, the future is ours. We will use that advantage responsibly,\" he said.     Lukman described the disruption in Ecuador\'s output following an earthquake as tragic, but refused to say if the South American country would be allowed a higher output quota when it recovered from the disaster.  \n',crude
'OPEC output in February was \"well below\" the 15.8 mln bpd ceiling it set in December and all countries are strictly adhering to their quotas, the OPEC news agency Opecna quoted an OPEC secretariat official as saying.     The official was quoted as saying that lower output was the result \"of member countries\' firm determination to defend the organisation\'s official price of 18 dlrs per barrel, and to refrain from selling any quantity below that price.\"     The unnamed official was further quoted as saying that no OPEC meeting was foreseen before the next biannual OPEC session planned to start on June 25.     The official gave no figure for February output. The statement said only that \"the reduction in total supplies, namely actual exports of crude oil and products, plus local deliveries in member countries, is even more pronounced as those supplies fell very noticeably during that month.\"     \"No matter what the pressure on member countries by lifters to align the official selling price to the ongoing market price, member countries are, without exception, strictly adhering to the official selling price in spite of the financial hardship this may entail,\" the statement said.     \"The very recent improvement in the price structure is an indicator of such determination by the organization to stick to the official selling price,\" the statement said.     Free spot market prices rose from around 14.50 dlrs a barrel in early December last year to near OPEC\'s official levels towards the end of the year, after the OPEC pact.     There has been oil industry speculation that OPEC might have to hold an extraordinrary meeting prior to its scheduled June session to discuss reports of overproduction by some states and strains on the differential matrix, which prices each OPEC crude according to its quality and distance from main markets.     The official said in the statement that no such emergency session was scheduled \"because of member countries\' firm determination to defend the price (system)\" agreed in December.     Opec\"s differential committee was to have met in Vienna starting April 2 but this session has been postponed, with no new date set, according to an official of the United Arab Emirates, which chairs the seven-state body.     Other members are Algeria, Kuwait, Saudi Arabia, Libya, Nigeria and Qatar.  \n',crude
'OPEC countries are all sticking firmly to official crude oil prices but the volatility of spot prices is likely to continue into the third quarter, Indonesian Minister of Mines and Energy Subroto tolds.     Subroto, attending a Pacific Energy Cooperation conference, blamed recent rapid spot price changes on unbalanced supply and demand. \"If we stick to the production limitation, the third quarter will be in better balance.\"     He said the market is in a period of transition while the impact of OPEC\'s December agreement to cut output and fix prices at an average 18 dlrs a barrel is worked through.     Asked whether OPEC members of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) had any concrete proposals to help Qatar sell its crude oil in the face of strong resistance to its official prices, Subroto said: \"Apparently they have taken care of that.\"     \"They (the GCC) meet very often among themselves. I think they\'ll help each other,\" he said.     Subroto said that as he was not a member of OPEC\'s Price Differentials Committee he did not know why the meeting had been postponed from its scheduled April 2 date.     \"Maybe they find it is better not to have the meeting because ... Everyone is sticking to official prices,\" he said.  \n',crude
'OPEC believes world oil prices should be set around a fixed average price of 18 dlrs a barrel, OAPEC Assistant General Secretary Abdelaziz Al-Wattari said.     In a speech to a European Community/OAPEC/OPEC seminar in Luxembourg released here, Al-Wattari said, \"OPEC believes ...the world energy trade should be kept without restrictions and should be built around a fixed average price of 18 dlrs.\"     Al-Wattari noted that total OPEC output was below the organization\'s agreed ceiling for all member countries in February, although this had meant sacrifices. The effect of these sacrifices meant that market stability, though restored to a good level, was still under pressure, Al-Wattari said.     \"A lasting stability in the world market requires a wider scope of international cooperation,\" he said.  \n',crude
'Opec remains within its agreed output ceiling of 15.8 mln barrels a day, and had expected current fluctuations in the spot market of one or two dlrs, Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said.     He told reporters after meeting with President Suharto that present weakness in the spot oil market was the result of warmer weather in the U.S. And Europe which reduced demand for oil.     Prices had also been forced down because refineries were using up old stock, he said.     He denied that Opec was exceeding its agreed production ceiling. Asked what Opec\'s output level was now, he replied: \"Below 15.8 (mln barrels per day).\" He did not elaborate.     He said there appeared to have been some attempts to manipulate the market, but if all Opec members stick by the cartel\'s December pricing agreement it would get through present price difficulties.     He predicted that prices would recover again in the third and fourth quarters of 1987.     He also reiterated that there was no need for an emergency Opec meeting.     He said Opec had expected to see some fluctuations in the spot price. \"We hope the weak price will be overcome, and predict the price will be better in the third and fourth quarters.\"     Refiners, he said, appeared to have used up old stock deliberately to cause slack demand in the market and the price to fall. But Opec would get through this period if members stuck together.  \n',crude
'Orbit Oil and Gas Ltd said the value of its oil and gas reserves increased by 19 pct to 52.6 mln dlrs from 44.2 mln dlrs reported at year-end 1985, according to an independent appraisal.     Orbit said it has reserves of 2.4 mln barrels of oil and natural gas liquids and 67.2 billion cubic feet of natural gas.     In addition, 75 pct owned Sienna Resources Ltd has Canadian reserves of 173,000 barrels of oil and 1.6 bcf of natural gas with a current value of 2.2 mln dlrs, Orbit said.  \n',crude
'ORS Corp said Dominion Securities (Alberta) Inc has been appointed to offer common shares in a new Canadaina company being organized to exploit heavy oil production opportunities in Canada and Western Europe.     ORS said the offer for private sale of the stock being made on a best efforts basis is designed to raise five mln Canadian dlrs which the new company will invest in properties and projects using the Electromagnetic Well Stimulation Process developed by IIT Research Institute under sponsorship of ORS.  \n',crude
'PanCanadian Petroleum Ltd said it agreed to sell its working interest in its North Sea properties and its British unit, Canadian Pacific Oil and Gas of Canada Ltd, to Whitehall Petroleum Ltd, a private British company.     PanCanadian, 87 pct-owned by Canadian Pacific Ltd CP, said it would receive 1.7 mln British pounds cash (3.5 mln Canadian dlrs) at closing, expected in two to three months.     It said the deal is subject to approval by regulators and its partners in the properties, which consist of exploration wells. It will also retain a royalty interest in the properties.  \n',crude
'Greek Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou said today that the Greek armed froces were ready to tackle any aggressors following the sailing of a Turkish research vessel and warships towards disputed waters in the Aegean Sea.     Papandreou told an emergency cabinet meeting in Athens \"the military readiness of our country is able now to give a very hard lesson if our neighbours (Turkey) were to carry out military actions.\"     He said the activities of the research vessel could be aimed at partitioning the Aegean.     \"The air force, navy and army are in a state of alert,\" General Guven Ergenc, Secretary General of the Turkish General Staff, told a news conference.     He said the Turkish research ship Sismik 1, escorted by an unspecified number of warships, would sail into disputed waters in the Aegean Sea tomorrow morning.     Ergenc tolds later that all leave had been cancelled for members of the armed forces in the Aegean coast area.     The Turkish government said yesterday it had licensed the state-owned Turkish Petroleum Corp to explore for oil in international waters around three Greek islands off Turkey.      Greece and Turkey have long-standing disputes over areas of the Aegean and the presence of Turkish troops in Cyprus.     The latest row erupted when the Greek government said last month that it was taking control of a Canadian-led consortium which was already producing oil off the Greek island of Thassos and would drill in the same area after the takeover.     Ergenc told the news conference the alert followed a government decision that Turkey should protect its interests \"because of measures Greece has been taking in the Aegean in violation of international agreements.\"     Asked how Turkey would react if Greece attacked any of the vessels, he said \"If there is an attack, it is clear what has to be done. An attack on a warship is a cause for war.\" But he added \"We are not in a state of war. The measures taken by the military are directed towards protecting our rights.\"     Greece said yesterday it would defend its national rights in the Aegean and urged Turkey to accept reference of the dispute to the International Court of Justice in The Hague.     Turkish Foreign Ministry spokesman Yalim Eralp told reporters today this was unacceptable because of preconditions Athens had attached.     In Athens, Greek Prime Minister Papandreou said that if the Turkish vessel Sismik 1 began research operations \"we will hinder it, of course not with words, as it cannot be stopped with words.\"     Greek newspapers said the armed forces were on alert and navy ships had gone to the Aegean. But government spokesman Yannis Roubatis did not confirm the move, saying only \"The Greek fleet is not at its naval base.\"     Papandreou said that a map issued in Turkey showed 95 pct of the areas proposed for research were on the Greek continental shelf.     Papandreou told the U.S. And NATO that if they had a part in orchestrating the present crisis in order to force Greece to negotiate with Turkey, the Greek government would not accept it.     Papandreou has maintained in the past that he will not negotiate with Ankara until Turkey recognises Greek rights in the Aegean and withdraws its troops from Cyprus.     He said that in the case of war with Turkey it would not be possible for Greece to discuss the future of American military bases here. Asked by reporters if he would close the U.S. Bases in Greece in the event of war, Papandreou replied \"Obviously, and perhaps even before the war.\"  \n',crude
'The Papua New Guinea Government will establish a public corporation to invest in resources projects, Minerals and Energy Minister John Kaputin said.     \"We intend to provide a means through which less privileged individuals can become part owners and beneficiaries from the development of mining and petroleum projects,\" he told Parliament.     Existing policy allowing the state up to 30 pct equity in major mining projects and 22.5 pct in oil and gas projects would be maintained, he said. The planned agency could take over the state\'s equity in current developments.     Kaputin said Papua New Guinea was experiencing a boom with exploration companies spending about 60 mln kina annually on about 150 mining and 23 petroleum projects.     \"The Government is determined to ensure that Papua New Guinean ownership in minerals and petroleum projects increases in an orderly way,\" he said.     Kaputin did not say when the corporation would be established or exactly what form it would take, but said the government would study whether it should be directly involved in exploration or development.  \n',crude
'Banque Paribas, which arranged a 220 mln dlr loan for Ecuador last year to pre-finance oil exports, wants to adjust the terms of the facility to help the country recover from a devastating earthquake, bankers said.     But the French bank\'s plan, which would effectively postpone repayment of about 30 mln dlrs of the loan for several months, is running into stiff resistance from many of the 52 members of the loan syndicate.     The pipeline that carries all Ecuador\'s oil exports was ruptured in the March 5 tremor and will take some five months to repair at a cost of about 150 mln dlrs to repair.     President Leon Febres Cordero on Friday estimated total damages caused by the quake at one billion dlrs and said that Ecuador as a result would maintain January\'s suspension of interest payments on its foreign commercial bank debt.     Payments were halted in January because of the drop in the price of oil, which accounts for nearly two-thirds of Ecuador\'s export earnings and 60 pct of government revenue.     Although sympathetic to Ecuador\'s plight, many banks in the Paribas facility feel that emergency financial relief is a job for international financial organizations and not for commercial banks, bankers said.     The 18-month oil-financing facility, which was signed last October 28, is one of the few purely voluntary credits for a Latin American nation since the region\'s debt crisis erupted in August 1982.     Because it was a voluntary deal, many bankers feel strongly that the orginal terms must be adhered to. Otherwise, they fear, the gradual re-establishment of normal market conditions for Latin borrowers will be set back.     \"There\'s a lot of reluctance by the other banks. They feel it\'s a different facility, and so any kind of suggestion of a restructuring would look bad,\" one banker commented.  \n',crude
'Petroleos de Venezuela, S.A. said it will sign a contract March 17 to buy a half interest in a Corpus Christi, Texas refinery and related operations.     The contract, to be signed by PDVSA and Champlin Petroleum\'s parent company, the Union Pacific Corp UNP, will create a new joint venture called Champlin Refining.     The state oil company said PDVSA will pay on the order of 30 mln dlrs for the half interest in Champlin.      Energy minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said Wednesday the cost would be 33 mln dlrs in cash, plus an additional 60 mln in crude and refined oil shipments.     PDVSA and Union Pacific have sought a line of credit from a group of North American and Japanese banks to finance the new company\'s working capital, the Venezuelan company said.     Under the deal, PDVSA will supply up to 140,000 barrels a day to the refinery with the option to place 50,000 bpd more - mostly gasoline and distillates - through Champlin\'s distribution system in 10 U.S. states.     The new company will be directed by a six-member board, with three representatives each from PDVSA and Union Pacific.  \n',crude
'The Mexican state oil company Petroleos Mexicanos (PEMEX) said its Far East customers would be charged 17.25 dlrs per barrel for Isthmus crude in February and 14.45 dlrs for the heavier Maya.     Pemex said this was 32 cts less than January Isthmus and 15 cts less than January Maya.     Far East customers, primarily Japan which buys an average 180,000 barrels per day of which 150,000 is Isthmus, pay retroactively while European and U.S. clients are charged per delivery.  \n',crude
'Mexican state oil firm Petroleos Mexicanos (Pemex) signed for a 500 mln dlr&#127;untied loan from the Export-Import Bank of Japan to finance its Pacific Petroleum Project, Pemex Japan representative Tito Ayal said.     No further details on the loan were immediately available.     Ayala told an oil seminar the project, due for completion in 1988, is aimed at improving distribution of oil products in the domestic market, mainly along the Pacific coast.     The project consists of a pipeline linking Nueva Teapa on the Gulf of Mexico with Salina Cruz on the Pacific Coast, and construction of the second phase of the Salina Cruz refinery.     The project also includes construction of liquified petroleum gas (LPG) storage tanks at Santa Cruz, additional crude oil storage at both ends of the pipeline, an ammonia complex at Lazaro Cardenas on the Pacific Coast and expansion of the infrastructure of the port of Salina Cruz, Ayala said.     Pemex will buy 80 mln dlrs worth of foreign equipment and materials for the project, he said. The new pipeline will enable Japan to load Mexico\'s Maya crude oil at Salina Cruz rather than in the Gulf of Mexico. Pemex will also have some LPG surplus available in Salina Cruz that may help Japan diversify its supply sources of that product, he added.  \n',crude
'Pennzoil Co said it had not yet received any \"meaningful settlement offer\" from Texaco Inc but added that the company remained willing to consider proposals to settle the 10.2 billion dlr jury judgment it won against Texaco.     In its newly-released annual report to shareholders, Pennzoil said it expected the Texas state court judgment, which was upheld by a state appeals court on February 12, to be upheld if appealed again.     \"To date, Pennzoil has yet to receive any meaningful settlement offer from Texaco, though it remains open to any realistic effort to settle the matter,\" Pennzoil chairman Hugh Liedtke said in the annual report.     Pennzoil also said it had budgeted 212 mln dlrs for capital spending in 1987, a drop from the 233 mln dlrs spent last year.     Proved U.S. and foreign reserves of natural gas declined to 964 billion cubic feet last year, from 1.01 trillion cubic feet in 1985, because of a virtual halt in its exploration program, Pennzoil said. Its crude oil reserves dropped to 140 mln barrels from 158 mln barrels in 1985.      The Houston-based company said it sold an average of 339 mln cubic feet of domestic natural gas each day last year, a 17 pct drop from 1985. The average sales price for gas dropped by 60 cents per mcf to 2.16 dlrs per mcf, Pennzoil said.     U.S. crude oil and gas liquids production last year fell to an average of 33,290 barrels per day from 34,102 barrels per day in 1985.     The company\'s total revenues in 1986 declined to 482.3 mln dlrs, from 762.5 mln dlrs the previous year. Operating income in 1986 fell more than 80 pct, to 38.0 mln dlrs.     Pennzoil said its goals for 1987 included development of its Point Arguello oilfield off the California coast, to maintain current production levels in its Bluebell-Altamont Field in Utah and to drill for prospects in the Gulf of Mexico\'s Mobile Bay area.     \"Production should begin late in the year from the Harvest Platform in the Santa Maria Basin offshore California,\" the company said. \"Pennzoil\'s share of this production initially should be five thousand barrels a day, increasing to a peak of 15 thousand barrels a day, net, by 1989.\"     In its sulphur business, Pennzoil said production totaled 2.1 mln long tons last year, a decline of 18 pct from 1985. The average sales price also declined, to 138.25 dlrs per long ton from 141.05 dlrs in 1985.     \"The long term outlook for our sulphur operations remains bright,\" the company said. \"We expect sulphur\'s pricing structure to strengthen during the current year, probably in the third and fourth quarters.\"               \n',crude
'Petro-Canada, Canada\'s state-owned oil company, said it will drill two delineation wells this summer at the Terra Nova oil field offshore Newfoundland.     Evaluation of test results and preliminary engineering work should put Petro-Canada in a position to propose a development plan for the Terra Nova field in 1988, the company said.     Depending on time required for regulatory approvals, construction could begin in 1989, with first oil production as early as 1991, Petro-Canada said.     \"We have a high degree of confidence that the western portion of the (Terra Nova) field contains at least 11 mln cubic meters of recoverable oil, or more than 70 mln barrels, and that we could produce it economicly using a floating production system,\" Petro-Canada said.     The Terra-Nova field, lying 350 kilometers east of St. John\'s and 35 kilometers southeast of Hibernia field, was discovered by Petro-Canada in 1984.     \"We\'ve had encouraging results from the eastern portion of the field, and we hope this summer\'s drilling will prove up additional reserves there,\" the company said.     Petro-Canada believes Terra Nova field is a good commercial prospect and the company wants to move some of those resources towards development so it can start generating a return on investments, Petro-Canada said.     Petro-Canada, which will act as operator of the two wells, has a 75 pct interest in the western portion of Graven block of the Terra Nova field and a 26 pct interest in the field\'s East Flank block, a company spokesman said later. Other field participants include Canterra Energy Ltd, Mobil Oil Canada Ltd, Gulf Canada Resources Inc, ICG Resources Ltd, Trillium Exploration Corp and general partnership PAREX.     Petro-Canada estimates reserves in the Terra Nova field\'s Graven block of between 68 mln and 70 mln barrels of oil, company spokesman Bob Foulkes said from Petro-Canada\'s Calgary office.     Combined reserves for Graven Block and the field\'s East Flank block are estimated between 70 mln and 130 mln barrels, he added.     Petro-Canada expects to spend about 500 mln Canadian dlrs to bring the field to production by about 1991, and the development budget could double if the company builds a production system combining both blocks in the field, he said.     Petro-Canada estimates the Terra Nova field Graven block would produce between 25,000 and 26,000 barrels average daily production, with a production system that would have maximum capacity of 40,000 bpd, company spokesman Foulkes said in answer to a query.     The company estimates a production system combining both Graven and East Flank blocks in the Terra Nova field could produce about 45,000 bpd average daily production, he said.  \n',crude
'Brazil\'s state-oil company Petrobras has asked the Army to withdraw the troops which were occupying its oil installations since Tuesday, Petrobras said in a statement.     The statement said the request for the withdrawal of the troops was made because of the calmness reigning in all of its refineries.     \"The request was also due to the end of the seamen\'s strike and the willingness of the oil industry workers to sit again by the negotiating table,\" the statement said.     Even though the Petrobras statement said the seamen\'s strike was over, a union spokesman said only two small shipping companies had reached a pay agreement. The overwhelming majority of Brazil\'s seamen remained on strike.     The statement said a meeting between Petrobras and oil industry leaders was set for next Wednesday in Rio, with the presence of Labour Minister Almir Pazzionotto as a mediator.     Petrobras said the request for the withdrawal of the troops was made at 1100 local hours (1400 GMT), but a company spokesman said he did not know if the troops had already been removed.  \n',crude
'Brazil\'s state oil company Petrobras has cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from Saudi Arabia after the Saudis refused to accept credit guarantees from the Bank of Brazil and did not disclose reasons, a Petrobras official said.     Export director Carlos Santana told reporters the Saudis were the first suppliers of oil to impose such conditions after Brazil\'s decision to halt interest payment of its commercial debts last month. The shipment of 2.2 mln barrels represents two days of consumption.     He said the Saudis reported they would no longer accept letters of credit from the Bank of Brazil or even from Saudi banks and that Brazil would have to obtain credit guarantees from leading international banks.     In February, Brazil had contracted to buy 125,000 bpd from the Saudis until June. Saudi Arabia is Brazil\'s second biggest oil supplier, with an average 115,000 bpd. Iraq is the main supplier with 235,000 bpd. China comes third, with 58,000 bpd.     \"If the Saudis wish to stop our trade relationship...I am sure that if they do, we will be getting dozens of offers from elsewhere,\" Santana added.     Santana said if the Saudis change their minds and decide to respect the terms of the contract, then Petrobras will lift the order to cancel the shipment.     The Saudis had put similar conditions on a previous shipment, he added. \"We telexed them saying that if they insisted, we would rather cancel the contract and buy the product elsewhere,\" Santana said.     After Petrobras threatened to cancel the contract, the Saudis changed their minds and decided to accept the Bank of Brazil\'s credit guarantees, he said.  \n',crude
'Brazil\'s state oil company Petrobras is pledging to export 4.6 mln cubic meters of fuel, or 28.9 mln barrels in 1987, a company spokesman said.     He said that represents a total sale worth 600 mln dlrs. The volume is 27 pct higher over 1986 sales, which totalled 3.6 mln cubic meters, or 22.6 mln barrels.     The United States, Africa and Latin American are Brazil\'s main fuel buyers, the spokesman said.  \n',crude
'The port of Philadelphia was closed when a Cypriot oil tanker, Seapride II, ran aground after hitting a 200-foot tower supporting power lines across the river, a Coast Guard spokesman said.     He said there was no oil spill but the ship is lodged on rocks opposite the Hope Creek nuclear power plant in New Jersey.     He said the port would be closed until today when they hoped to refloat the ship on the high tide.     After delivering oil to a refinery in Paulsboro, New Jersey, the ship apparently lost its steering and hit the power transmission line carrying power from the nuclear plant to the state of Delaware.  \n',crude
'T. Boone Pickens, the Texas oilman and financier, said he believes the heady days the oil service industry had in the early 1980s, when over 4,500 oil rigs were once reported operating, will not return in his lifetime.      Pickens tolds he expects the rig count to drop to below 600 before recovering. He added that oil prices will eventually rise to 35 dlrs, then to 50 dlrs after 1990.      Currently, some 700 oil rigs are operating in the U.S., down sharply after oil prices slipped from 30 dlrs in late 1985 to around 10 dlrs in 1986. Prices are now around 18 dlrs. The highest number of working rigs was 4,500 in December 1981.      \"The rigs won\'t go back to work until the price of oil gets above 30 dlrs,\" he said, adding that while he expects to see 50 dlr a barrel oil, he does not expect to see 2,000 rigs operating in his lifetime. Pickens is 58.      Pickens, who is currently touring the country promoting his autobiography \"Boone,\" said he does not believe the U.S. should impose an oil import fee in order to stimulate the domestic oil industry.  \n',crude
'Powerine Oil Co said its refinery here will resume operation today, with initial crude oil runs of 20,000 barrels per day.     Powerine, a privately-held company, said it expects the refinery to become fully operational by May, with crude oil throughput at 35,000 bpd.     Initial oil products deliveries are scheduled for Monday, Powerine said. The refinery had been closed due to a change of ownership, the company said.  \n',crude
'President Reagan said the United States must do more to lessen its reliance on imported oil.     President Reagan said during a nationally televised news conference that the rising U.S. reliance on foreign oil is a problem that the administration is studying.     \"We have to study this more,\" Reagan said. \"This is why we increased the Strategic (Petroleum) Reserve, but we have to do more,\" he said.     Reagan said his administration has already proposed deregulating natural gas and eliminating the windfall profits tax on crude oil production.     However, he complained that Congress had not yet approved those measures.     The Department of Energy earlier this week released a report that warned of rising U.S. reliance on foreign oil imports at a time when domestic production is declining. It suggested options for the administration to consider, but made no specific recommendations.  \n',crude
'U.S. oil demand as measured by products supplied rose 0.1 pct in the four weeks ended March 20 to 16.16 mln barrels per day from 16.15 mln in the same period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.     In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy Department agency said distillate demand was off 0.1 pct in the period to 3.258 mln bpd from 3.260 mln a year earlier.     Gasoline demand averaged 6.72 mln bpd, off 1.2 pct from 6.80 mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.38 mln bpd, off 2.1 pct from 1.41 mln, the EIA said.     Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.35 mln bpd, down 7.8 pct from 9.06 mln a year ago, and gross daily crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 3.44 mln bpd, up 16.3 pct from 2.95 mln, the EIA said.     Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 11.90 mln bpd, up 1.4 pct from 11.74 mln a year earlier, it said.     In the first 78 days of the year, refinery runs were up 1.8 pct to an average 12.25 mln bpd from 12.04 mln in the year-ago period, the EIA said.     Year-to-date demand for all petroleum products averaged 16.32 mln bpd, up 1.8 pct from 16.04 mln in 1986, it said.     So far this year, distillate demand rose 0.1 pct to 3.31 mln bpd from 3.30 mln in 1986, gasoline demand was 6.60 mln bpd, up 0.1 pct from 6.59 mln, and residual fuel demand fell 0.4 pct to 1.42 mln bpd from 1.43 mln, the EIA said.     Year-to-date domestic crude output was estimated at 8.41 mln bpd, off 7.7 pct from 9.11 mln a year ago, while gross crude imports averaged 3.96 mln bpd, up 28.1 pct from 3.09 mln, it said.  \n',crude
'U.S. oil demand as measured by products supplied rose 2.1 pct in the four weeks ended February 27 to 16.39 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 16.05 mln in the same period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.     In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy Department agency said distillate demand was down 2.1 pct in the period to 3.37 mln bpd from 3.44 mln a year earlier.     Gasoline demand averaged 6.60 mln bpd, up 2.4 pct from 6.44 mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.47 mln bpd, up 1.9 pct from 1.44 mln, the EIA said.     Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.38 mln bpd, down 8.7 pct from 9.18 mln a year ago, and gross daily crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 4.11 mln bpd, up 36.9 pct from three mln, the EIA said.     Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 12.21 mln bpd, up 2.2 pct from 12 mln a year earlier, it said.     Year-to-date figures will not become available until March 26 when EIA\'s Petroleum Supply Monthly data for January 1987 becomes available, the agency said.  \n',crude
'U.S. oil demand as measured by products supplied rose 2.3 pct in the four weeks ended March 13 to 16.49 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 16.11 mln in the same period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.     In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy Department agency said distillate demand was up 2.9 pct in the period to 3.43 mln bpd from 3.33 mln a year earlier.     Gasoline demand averaged 6.93 mln bpd, up 4.0 pct from 6.67 mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.31 mln bpd, off 7.9 pct from 1.42 mln, the EIA said.     Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.36 mln bpd, down 8.1 pct from 9.10 mln a year ago, and gross daily crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 3.70 mln bpd, up 24.8 pct from 2.96 mln, the EIA said.     Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 11.92 mln bpd, up 1.0 pct from 11.80 mln a year earlier, it said.     Year-to-date figures will not become available until March 26 when EIA\'s Petroleum Supply Monthly data for January 1987 becomes available, the agency said.  \n',crude
'A presidential commission that has been studying oil imports, including their effect on national security, is to to make its report soon, the White House said.     Spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said the panel, set up last October to examine U.S. oil import needs, would make its report soon, probably within the next few weeks.     He said National Security Adviser Frank Carlucci \"will wait until that report is in and then see if there is any special action needed to be taken in the national security area to implement it.\"  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabia has lifted the condition it imposed on the sale of oil to Brazil and will accept Banco do Brasil\'s credit guarantees, state-oil company Petrobras said in a statement.     Petrobras cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from the Saudis yesterday, after they refused to accept a letter of credit from the Bank of Brazil, demanding guarantees from leading international banks.     It advised the Saudis the company would negotiate oil purchases elsewhere unless they changed their mind by Monday.     The 2.2 mln barrels shipment will be made by the Saudis on March 24 as scheduled, the statement said.     Under a 125,000 bpd contract signed in February the Saudis agreed to supply oil to Brazil until June.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer reiterated the kingdom\'s commitment to last December\'s OPEC accord to boost world oil prices and stabilize the market, the official Saudi Press Agency SPA said.     Asked by the agency about the recent fall in free market oil prices, Nazer said Saudi Arabia \"is fully adhering by the ... accord and it will never sell its oil at prices below the pronounced prices under any circumstance.\"     Saudi Arabia was a main architect of December pact under which OPEC agreed to cut its total oil output ceiling by 7.25 pct and return to fixed prices of around 18 dollars a barrel.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer reiterated the kingdom\'s commitment to last December\'s OPEC accord to boost world oil prices and stabilise the market, the official Saudi Press Agency SPA said.     Asked by the agency about the recent fall in free market oil prices, Nazer said Saudi Arabia \"is fully adhering by the ... Accord and it will never sell its oil at prices below the pronounced prices under any circumstance.\"     Nazer, quoted by SPA, said recent pressure on free market prices \"may be because of the end of the (northern hemisphere) winter season and the glut in the market.\"     Saudi Arabia was a main architect of the December accord, under which OPEC agreed to lower its total output ceiling by 7.25 pct to 15.8 mln barrels per day (bpd) and return to fixed prices of around 18 dlrs a barrel.     The agreement followed a year of turmoil on oil markets, which saw prices slump briefly to under 10 dlrs a barrel in mid-1986 from about 30 dlrs in late 1985. Free market prices are currently just over 16 dlrs.     Nazer was quoted by the SPA as saying Saudi Arabia\'s adherence to the accord was shown clearly in the oil market.     He said contacts among members of OPEC showed they all wanted to stick to the accord.     In Jamaica, OPEC President Rilwanu Lukman, who is also Nigerian Oil Minister, said the group planned to stick with the pricing agreement.     \"We are aware of the negative forces trying to manipulate the operations of the market, but we are satisfied that the fundamentals exist for stable market conditions,\" he said.     Kuwait\'s Oil Minister, Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah, said in remarks published in the emirate\'s daily Al-Qabas there were no plans for an emergency OPEC meeting to review prices.     Traders and analysts in international oil markets estimate OPEC is producing up to one mln bpd above the 15.8 mln ceiling.     They named Kuwait and the United Arab Emirates, along with the much smaller producer Ecuador, among those producing above quota. Sheikh Ali denied that Kuwait was over-producing.  \n',crude
'King Fahd said today Saudi Arabia wants oil price stability and he called on non-OPEC producers to avoid harmful competition with the 13 nation group.     His plea, in an interview withs and the television news agency Visnews, came ahead of a state visit he will make to Britain later this month.     King Fahd was asked whether Saudi Arabia would be prepared to reduce its oil output below its OPEC quota of 4.133 mln barrels per day (bpd) to defend the 18 dlr benchmark price agreed to by OPEC last December.     The King replied: \"Saudi Arabia doesn\'t decide prices by itself but certainly desires price stability.\"     Non-OPEC countries \"must help us in a framework of common interest so that there is no type of competition which could prove harmful to everyone,\" he said.     Asked if he saw the 18 dlr per barrel benchmark as a first step towards higher world oil prices, King Fahd said it was not for Saudi Arabia but for all OPEC countries to determine such issues. Iran and Algeria have already called for a higher benchmark.     In recent weeks the 18 dlr level has come under pressure, due partly to quota violations by some OPEC members. King Fahd said Saudi Arabia, the world\'s largest oil exporter, was adhering to decisions made at OPEC\'s December conference which set a 15.8 mln bpd output ceiling for the first half of 1987.     A major non-OPEC producer, Britain has so far resisted the group\'s pleas to curb its North Sea oil output.     The King also urged the world community to help the Palestinians return to their homeland and called for a peaceful end to the Iran-Iraq war. The 6-1/2-year-old war could not be resolved on the battlefield, he said.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabian business leaders assembled for a conference aimed at thrashing out problems facing the private sector of the kingdom\'s oil-dependent economy.     The meeting of some 500 top businessmen from across Saudi Arabia comes at a time of guarded optimism in industry and commerce following the OPEC pact to boost world oil prices.     The four-day conference in this resort town, high in the mountains above the Tihamah plain stretching to the Red Sea, has been organised by Saudi Arabia\'s chambers of commerce.     Finance Minister Mohammed Ali Abal-Khail and Commerce Minister Suleiman Abdulaziz al-Salim will attend the first day.     Bankers and businessmen said the conference will air problems facing commerce and industry after last year\'s slide in oil prices and examine ways to promote higher investment in a private sector sorely short of finance.     Government planners have long recognised that Saudi Arabia, the world\'s largest crude exporter, needs to foster private enterprise to diversify its oil-based economy.     The fledgling private sector was hard hit by the Middle East recession as early as 1983 and several big manufacturing and trading companies ran into problems repaying loans.     Renewed optimism this year stems largely from the accord reached by OPEC last December to curb oil output and boost prices to a benchmark level of 18 dlrs per barrel.     With oil prices recovering, Saudi Arabia went ahead at the turn of the year with long-delayed budget plans incorporating a 52.7 billion riyal deficit to be bridged by drawing down foreign reserves.     The simple act of publishing a budget restored a measure of confidence to the business community.     Some share prices have risen by more than 35 pct since last November, while banks are generally reporting a slowdown in the number of new non-performing loans.     But not all bankers are convinced. One senior corporate finance manager in Riyadh said: \"Banks are still reluctant to lend ... There is certainly more optimism in the air, but I am not sure if it is firmly based.\"     Some businessmen and bankers point out that government spending is still under tight control and the non-oil economy may still be contracting.     Capital expenditure on large projects has been cut sharply. A U.S. Embassy report on Saudi Arabia published just before the budget said: \"While industrialisation has continued to be one of the government\'s highest priorities, the recession, the payments problem and the lack of financing have reduced Saudi and foreign investor interest in industry.\"     It is the lack of fresh investment that is expected to be a major issue among the businessmen gathered here.     Official figures show the number of new licences for industrial ventures fell 24 pct in the six months to March 1986, compared with the same period in 1985.     Lending by the Saudi Industrial Development Fund, a major source of industry backing, has fallen steadily since 1983.     Trading companies have also been hit, some caught with huge inventories of construction equipment as recession bit.     Some firms laid off workers and cut bloated inventories. Others have effectively been liquidated. A few have reached agreement with bankers to extend debt repayments.     The latest rescheduling is for the shipping-to-hotels conglomerate REDEC. Its negotiators have just initialled a draft accord to restructure payments on 1.3 billion riyals of bank debt.     Bankers and businessmen said the conference was also likely to discuss the apparent reluctance of U.S. And British firms to step up investment in the kingdom.     A British government delegation has just left Riyadh after holding preliminary talks on ways of offsetting the huge Saudi outlay on a defence contract to supply 132 fighter aircraft worth five billion stg.  \n',crude
'Saudi crude oil output last month fell to an average of 3.5 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 3.8 mln bpd in January, Gulf oil sources said.     They said exports from the Ras Tanurah and Ju\'aymah terminals in the Gulf fell to an average 1.9 mln bpd last month from 2.2 mln in January because of lower liftings by some customers.     But the drop was much smaller than expected after Gulf exports rallied in the fourth week of February to 2.5 mln bpd from 1.2 mln in the third week, the sources said.     The production figures include neutral zone output but not sales from floating storage, which are generally considered part of a country\'s output for Opec purposes.     Saudi Arabia has an Opec quota of 4.133 mln bpd under a production restraint scheme approved by the 13-nation group last December to back new official oil prices averaging 18 dlrs a barrel.     The sources said the two-fold jump in exports last week appeared to be the result of buyers rushing to lift February entitlements before the month-end.     Last week\'s high export levels appeared to show continued support for official Opec prices from Saudi Arabia\'s main crude customers, the four ex-partners of Aramco, the sources said.     The four -- Exxon Corp XON, Mobil Corp MOB, Texaco Inc TX and Chevron Corp CHV -- signed a long-term agreement last month to buy Saudi crude for 17.52 dlrs a barrel.     However the sources said the real test of Saudi Arabia\'s ability to sell crude at official prices in a weak market will come this month, when demand for petroleum products traditionally tapers off. Spot prices have fallen in recent weeks to more than one dlr below Opec levels.     Saudi Arabian oil minister Hisham Nazer yesterday reiterated the kingdom\'s commitment to the December OPEC accord and said it would never sell below official prices.     The sources said total Saudi refinery throughput fell slightly in February to an average 1.1 mln bpd from 1.2 mln in January because of cuts at the Yanbu and Jubail export refineries.     They put crude oil exports through Yanbu at 100,000 bpd last month, compared to zero in January, while throughput at Bahrain\'s refinery and neutral zone production remained steady at around 200,000 bpd each.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer said OPEC\'s December agreement to stabilise oil prices at 18 dlrs a barrel was being implemented satisfactorily and there was no immediate need to change it.     Nazer, in an interview withs and the television news agency Visnews, said Saudi Arabia was producing around three mln barrels per day (bpd) of crude oil, well below its OPEC quota.     Saudi Arabia, the world\'s largest oil exporter, will continue to restrain production as long as other OPEC members adhere to the pact, Nazer said.     The 13-nation OPEC agreed in December to cut its production ceiling by 7.25 pct to 15.8 mln bpd and abide by fixed prices averaging 18 dlrs a barrel from February 1.     Nazer, in his first interview since succeeding Ahmed Zaki Yamani last October, said: \"I do not foresee any need for new measures before the 25th of June when our (next OPEC) meeting will take place as scheduled.\"     Nazer said OPEC was producing below 15.8 mln bpd and all members were abiding by its agreements.     \"We\'ve heard news every now and then of violations but they were not at all verified,\" he said.     OPEC production curbs have boosted world oil prices from a 13-year low of around eight dlrs a barrel last August to near 18 dlrs after announcement of the December pact.     Spot market prices slipped some two dlrs in February but have firmed in the past two weeks to near OPEC levels as traders gained confidence in OPEC price and output discipline.     Nazer said Saudi Arabia would continue to produce below its 4.133 mln bpd quota if necessary to defend the 18 dlr price.     \"As long as all the OPEC members adhere to the program as devised in December, Saudi Arabia will continue to adhere to the agreement,\" he said.     Current production of three mln bpd includes oil from the Neutral Zone shared with Kuwait, but not sales from floating storage, Nazer said.     King Fahd of Saudi Arabia, in an interview withs and Visnews on March 11, said the kingdom wanted oil price stability and called on non-OPEC producers to avoid harmful competition with OPEC.     \"Saudi Arabia doesn\'t decide prices by itself but certainly desires price stability,\" he said.     Nazer said the output level did not mean the kingdom had returned to a role of \"swing producer\" within OPEC.     Saudi Arabia allowed its output to sink as low as two mln bpd in August 1985 to compensate for slack demand and over-production by some OPEC states.     \"Saudi Arabia is not playing that role. It is being played by OPEC membership as a whole because the reduction in the 15.8 mln bpd share of OPEC in the market is being shared by other members of OPEC,\" Nazer said.     Nazer said OPEC estimated demand for its oil during third quarter this year would be around 16.6 mln bpd.     But he said if circumstances changed \"I am sure then the OPEC members will consult with each other and take the necessary measures.\"     Oil analysts say the OPEC pact could come under strain when demand for petroleum products generally falls in the northern hemisphere spring and summer.     Nazer said he was satisfied with the extent of cooperation from non-OPEC producers. Norway, Egypt and the Soviet Union agreed to help OPEC by restraining production or exports after he visited them on OPEC\'s behalf earlier this year.     \"We did not ask any country to do anything. These were programmes they thought were necessary to stabilise market conditions and to help themselves attain better pricing conditions,\" Nazer said.     He said it was up to countries that declined to cooperate -- such as Britain -- to come up with their own proposals if they saw fit.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabian Oil Minister Hisham Nazer said OPEC\'s December agreement to stabilize oil prices at 18 dlrs a barrel was being implemented satisfactorily and there was no immediate need to change it.     Nazer, in an interview withs and the television news agency Visnews, said Saudi Arabia was producing around three mln barrels per day (bpd) of crude oil, well below its OPEC quota.     Saudi Arabia, the world\'s largest oil exporter, will continue to restrain production as long as other OPEC members adhere to the pact, Nazer said.     The 13-nation OPEC agreed in December to cut its production ceiling by 7.25 pct to 15.8 mln bpd and abide by fixed prices averaging 18 dlrs a barrel from February 1.     Nazer, in his first interview since succeeding Ahmed Zaki Yamani last October, said: \"I do not foresee any need for new measures before the 25th of June when our (next OPEC) meeting will take place as scheduled.\"     Nazer said OPEC was producing below 15.8 mln bpd and all members were abiding by its agreements.     \"We\'ve heard news every now and then of violations but they were not at all verified,\" he said.     OPEC production curbs have boosted world oil prices from a 13-year low of around eight dlrs a barrel last August to near 18 dlrs after announcement of the December pact.     Spot market prices slipped some two dlrs in February but have firmed in the past two weeks to near OPEC levels as traders gained confidence in OPEC price and output discipline.     Nazer said Saudi Arabia would continue to produce below its 4.133 mln bpd quota if necessary to defend the 18 dlr price.     \"As long as all the OPEC members adhere to the program as devised in December, Saudi Arabia will continue to adhere to the agreement,\" he said.     Current production of three mln bpd includes oil from the Neutral Zone shared with Kuwait, but not sales from floating storage, Nazer said.     King Fahd of Saudi Arabia, in an interview withs and Visnews on March 11, said the kingdom wanted oil price stability and called on non-OPEC producers to avoid harmful competition with OPEC.     \"Saudi Arabia doesn\'t decide prices by itself but certainly desires price stability,\" he said.     Nazer said the output level did not mean the kingdom had returned to a role of \"swing producer\" within OPEC.     Saudi Arabia allowed its output to sink as low as two mln bpd in August 1985 to compensate for slack demand and over-production by some OPEC states.     \"Saudi Arabia is not playing that role. It is being played by OPEC membership as a whole because the reduction in the 15.8 mln bpd share of OPEC in the market is being shared by other members of OPEC,\" Nazer said.     Nazer said OPEC estimated demand for its oil during third quarter this year would be around 16.6 mln bpd.     But he said if circumstances changed \"I am sure then the OPEC members will consult with each other and take the necessary measures.\"     Oil analysts say the OPEC pact could come under strain when demand for petroleum products generally falls in the northern hemisphere spring and summer.     Nazer said he was satisfied with the extent of cooperation from non-OPEC producers. Norway, Egypt and the Soviet Union agreed to help OPEC by restraining production or exports after he visited them on OPEC\'s behalf earlier this year.     \"We did not ask any country to do anything. These were programmes they thought were necessary to stabilise market conditions and to help themselves attain better pricing conditions,\" Nazer said.     He said it was up to countries that declined to cooperate -- such as Britain -- to come up with their own proposals if they saw fit. \n',crude
'Saudi Arabian oil output has fallen to its lowest level in more than a year, giving fresh evidence of the kingdom\'s determination to keep oil prices at 18 dlrs a barrel, as agreed by Opec last December, oil industry sources said.     They said Saudi output in the first eight days of March averaged 2.6 mln barrels per day (bpd) including oil from the neutral zone shared with Kuwait, compared to a February average of 3.5 mln bpd.     They said Saudi Arabia was also selling oil from its crude oil stocks in tankers around the world, which OPEC says must be counted towards a member\'s production quota. Saudi Arabia\'s quota is 4.133 mln bpd.     The lower production levels indicated Saudi Arabia, the world\"s largest oil exporter, was insisting on getting Opec official prices, even at the cost of lower production, the sources said.     King Fahd reiterated yesterday, in an interview withs and the television news agency Visnews, the Saudi commitment to OPEC\'s December pact to boost oil prices to an average 18 dlrs.     \"Saudi Arabia is completely sticking to OPEC decisions,\" he said.     The sources said the kingdom\'s exports from Gulf ports averaged one mln bpd during the eight days ending last Sunday, down from a February average of 1.9 mln bpd.     They said Saudi Arabia was allowing production to fluctuate with lifting nominations and was not trying to maintain artificially high levels by putting oil into storage.     The kingdom\'s main buyers, the four U.S. Oil firms with past stakes in the national oil company Aramco -- Mobil, Exxon, Texaco and Chevron -- enjoy considerable flexibility in the timing and volume of their liftings but are bound to pay official prices, the sources said.     Spot market prices have firmed in the past two weeks but still remain below OPEC levels and major buyers have delayed liftings in the hope they would improve, the sources said.     They expected low early March output to pick up towards the end of the month as buyers sought to fulfill their contractual obligations.  \n',crude
'Saudi riyal interbank deposits were steady at yesterday\'s higher levels in a quiet market.     Traders said they were reluctant to take out new positions amidst uncertainty over whether OPEC will succeed in halting the current decline in oil prices.     Oil industry sources said yesterday several Gulf Arab producers had had difficulty selling oil at official OPEC prices but Kuwait has said there are no plans for an emergency meeting of the 13-member organisation.     A traditional Sunday lull in trading due to the European weekend also contributed to the lack of market activity.     Spot-next and one-week rates were put at 6-1/4, 5-3/4 pct after quotes ranging between seven, six yesterday.     One, three, and six-month deposits were quoted unchanged at 6-5/8, 3/8, 7-1/8, 6-7/8 and 7-3/8, 1/8 pct respectively.     The spot riyal was quietly firmer at 3.7495/98 to the dollar after quotes of 3.7500/03 yesterday.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabia will succeed in pressuring other members of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries to stay within their production quotas, said Morgan Stanley Group managing director John Wellemeyer.     Wellemeyer, speaking to reporters at an offshore oil engineering conference, also said he expected OPEC nations to attempt to hold prices under 20 dlrs a barrel for several years to keep industrial demand for residual fuel oil strong.     \"Over the next few weeks I think you\'ll see a concerted effort by the Saudis to get production down,\" Wellemeyer said.     \"The Saudis are committed to that price level (of 18 dlrs a barrel) and are willing to make it happen again,\" he said.     In recent weeks, oil prices fell to the 16 to 17 dlrs a barrel level on market reports of some OPE members producing above their quota, pushing total OPEC production to 15.8 mln barrels per day. But prices rebounded today, with April U.S. crude prices up about one dlr to over 17 dlrs a barrel on a belief Saudi Arabia is attempting to curb OPEC output.     Wellemeyer said that sharp declines in U.S. oil production could push demand for OPEC oil above 20 mln barrels per day as early as 1989 and up to 24 mln barrels per day by 1993.     Although the projected increases in demand for OPEC oil should strengthen world prices, Wellemeyer said he believed the organization would hold its official price below 20 dlrs a barrel for some time to prevent residual fuel users from switching to natural gas supplies. The interfuel swing market accounts for about eight mln barrels a day, or 18 pct of the world demand for oil.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabia has dropped its condition that Brazil secure international bank guarantees before Saudia Arabia would ship it oil, state-oil company Petrobras said in a statement.     Petrobras said the Saudis will accept Banco do Brasil credit guarantees.     Petrobras cancelled a 40 mln dlr crude oil purchase from the Saudis yesterday after they refused to accept a letter of credit from the official Bank of Brazil. The Saudis had demanded that Brazil get credit guarantees from leading international banks.     Petrobras said the Saudis had been advised that if they did not change their mind by Monday, Petrobras would negotiate the purchase of oil with other producers.     The Petrobras statement said the shipment of 2.2 mln barrels will be made by the Saudis on March 24 as scheduled.     The shipment was part of a contract signed in February for the Saudis to supply Brazil with 125,000 barrels per day until June.  \n',crude
'The Senate budget committee sits down tomorrow to start drafting a fiscal 1988 budget, with the budget writers expected to look at several proposals for fuel taxes and other tax options to cut the budget.     In a briefing book for the drafting sessions, a number of revenue raising tax options are proposed, including a five dlrs a barrel fee on domestic and imported oil, a fee just on imported oil, and a broad based tax on domestic energy consumption based on five pct of value.     Other proposals include various excise taxes and combinations of import surcharges or tariffs, including a 10 pct import across the board import surcharge that would raise 22 billion dlrs next year alone, more in later years.     The committee, however, will only include revenue numbers in its proposed budget with the actual revenue decisions left to the House and Senate tax-writing committees.      The committee will draft a budget which its chairman, Sen Lawton Chiles, a Florida Democrat, said he hopes would raise at least 18 billion dlrs in revenues, or about half the minimum 36 billion dlr deficit reduction he has in mind.     The House Budget Committee also plans to start drafting a separate budget plan later this week, which would have to be reconciled with the Senate version. The final budget would be the fiscal 1988 spending and revenue blueprint.   \n',crude
'Sen. Pete Domenici, a main sponsor of legislation to set an oil import fee, said the administration\'s energy security report was based on flawed economic assumptions.     The New Mexico Republican said the report did not take into account the last few weeks\' drop in domestic oil production in its statement that an oil fee would raise prices for consumers. The report said a decline in economic growth as a result of the fee would reduce tax revenues. \"A five dlr (per barrel) oil import fee will provide the stimulus to create jobs and investment, \" and raise revenues, he said.  \n',crude
'Analyst Sanford Margoshes of Shearson Lehman Brothers said he recommended a number of oil stocks today now that it is apparent that OPEC has succeeded in holding to its prescribed production quotas.     \"It is clear that OPEC, through jawboning and quota restraint, will boost the price of oil,\" Margoshes said.     Prices of oil stocks rose sharply today in response to higher oil prices and optimism about OPEC quotas. Margoshes said he recommends Imperial Oil IMO.A, up 1/2 to 49-1/8, Standard Oil Co SRD, 7/8 to 62-3/4, Exxon XON one to 83-1/8, and Chevron CHV 1-1/8 to 54-7/8.     In addition, Margoshes said he recommended Atlantic Richfield ARC on a short-term basis, though he said he is still suspect about its debt situation. Atlantic Richfield rose 1-3/4 to 77.     He said \"the market could come down to test the 16 dlr a barrel level again, but the main thrust of investing in oil is positive right now. Before the year is out we will see higher oil prices.\"     He noted that belief that the government is interested in raising the strategic reserves is factored into the rise in oil stocks today.  \n',crude
'Shell Canada Ltd, 72 pct owned by Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD ST, scheduled its annual maintenance refinery shutdowns during the next two months, company spokeswoman Judy Wish said.     Wish said refineries will stockpile production before the shutdowns to maintain normal supply while maintenance is carried out.     Production at Shell\'s major refinery at Strathcona Alberta, will be closed for about one month, Wish said.     There will be no layoffs associated with the refinery maintenance, she added.  \n',crude
'A/S Norske Shell, Royal Dutch/Shell Group\'s RD.AS Norwegian subsidiary, said it has nearly concluded a 10 billion crown development scheme for Norway\'s Draugen oil field and will declare the field commercial in the near future.     Pending government approval of the scheme, the field could come on stream in 1992, making it Norway\'s northermost field development and the first such project on the Haltenbanken tract off central Norway.     Work on the project could begin as early as January 1988, a Shell spokesman said.     Shell has not released projected output levels for the field, where water depth is 240-270 meters.     The spokesman said the field\'s partners have agreed to develop Draugen with a 300-meter, single-leg concrete gravity-base platform.     The scheme also proposes using remote subsea production wells to tap the field\'s reservoir, estimated to contain 375 mln barrels of oil, and an offshore buoy-loading system to transport oil from the field by ship.     Partners on Draugen are Shell, the operator, with a 30 pct stake, British Petroleum Co Plc BP.L unit BP Petroleum Development (Norway) Ltd (20 pct) and state-owned Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap A/S STAT.OL (Statoil) (50 pct).  \n',crude
'South Africa\'s state-owned energy firm Soekor said it would continue tests after striking oil some 120 kms (75 miles) south-southwest of Mossel Bay.     During production tests, about 5,000 barrels of oil and five mln cubic feet of gas per day were produced, it said.     \"This oil discovery will be followed-up as soon as possible by further seismic surveys and drilling. Should further drilling and tests in the area yield positive results oil production from a floating platform could be considered.\"     Director General of Mineral and Energy Affairs Louw Alberts announced the strike earlier but said it was uneconomic.  \n',crude
'A study group said the United States should increase its strategic petroleum reserve to one mln barrels as one way to deal with the present and future impact of low oil prices on the domestic oil industry.     U.S. policy now is to raise the strategic reserve to 750 mln barrels, from its present 500 mln, to help protect the economy from an overseas embargo or a sharp price rise.     The Aspen Institute for Humanistic Studies, a private group, also called for new research for oil exploration and development techniques.     It predicted prices would remain at about 15-18 dlrs a barrel for several years and then rise to the mid 20s, with imports at about 30 pct of U.S. consumption.     The study cited two basic policy paths for the nation: to protect the U.S. industry through an import fee or other such device or to accept the full economic benefits of cheap oil.     But the group did not strongly back either option, saying there were benefits and drawbacks to both.     It said instead that such moves as increasing oil reserves and more exploration and development research would help to guard against or mitigate the risks of increased imports.  \n',crude
'A government study has concluded the U.S. Will be dependent on oil from the middle east into the next century and must take steps to reduce its vulnerability, the New York Times said.     The newspaper said the inter-agency government study found a serious oil-dependency problem due to steadily falling domestic production and rising demand for imported oil.     The study concluded that by 1995 the U.S. Will be relying on foreign countries for 50 pct of its oil, more than the peak of 48 pct reached in 1977 and far above the 33 pct rate during the 1973-74 Arab oil embargo.     The U.S. Now imports about 38 pct of its oil needs, up from 27 pct a year ago, the New York Times said.     It said recommendations sent to the White House by Energy Secretary John Harrington include financial incentives to raise domestic oil production by one mln barrels a day from the current 8.4 mln barrels.     The newspaper said the administration has placed increased emphasis on stockpiling oil reserves. It said the view now held is that the Strategic Petroleum Reserve to be tapped in times of shortages, should be increased by 100,000 barrels a day, rather than 35,000 as called for in the 1988 budget.    The newspaper said Harrington may propose restoring the depletion allowance to major producers.     \"The administration also plans to renew its efforts to ...Repeal the windfall profits tax, remove bars to drilling on the outer continental shelf and repeal the law that limits the use of natural gas in industrial and utility boilers,\" it added.     The New York Times quoted Senator Don Nickles of Oklahoma as saying the study greatly underestimated potential U.S. Demand for imported oil in the next decade and overestimated the amount of domestic oil which would be produced.  \n',crude
'The sharp drop in world oil prices the past year triggered a 60 pct increase in bankruptcies in the country\'s oil states, according to a study released by the American Petroleum Institute (API).     API said the Dunn and Bradstreet study found that business failures rose nationally by 6.9 pct in 1986 over 1985, but in the \"oil patch\" of the Southwest the increase was 59.9 pct.     It said bankruptcies in Texas were up 57.4 pct, Oklahoma, 55.9 pct, Colorado, 55.8 pct and Louisiana, 46.6 pct.     In Alaska, failures rose by 66.2 per cent, it said.     API also said that three of the states with the highest number of bank failures last year were large oil and gas producers - Texas, Oklahoma and Kansas.  \n',crude
'Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said he sees the oil market continuing bullish, with underlying demand expected to rise later in the year.     He told a press conference in Jakarta at the end of a two-day meeting of South-East Asian Energy Ministers that he saw prices stabilizing around 18 dlrs a barrel.     \"The sentiment in the market is bullish and I think it will continue that way as demand will go up in the third or fourth quarters,\" Subroto said.     Asked about the prospect for oil prices, he said: \"I think they will stabilise around 18 dlrs, although there is a little turbulence ...\"     \"Of course the spot price will fluctuate, but the official price will remain at 18 dlrs,\" he added.  \n',crude
'Petroleum futures rallied today in a market that was expecting declines in domestic supplies and became further unsettled by escalated Mideast fighting.     Crude oil, gasoline and heating oil all posted gains on the New York Mercantile Exchange, with crude oil prices matching life-of-contract highs. Crude for delivery in May closed 17 cents higher at 18.84 dlrs a barrel.     \"Crude futures could jump above 19 dlrs a barrel but will not remain there long if products are not strong,\" Robert Murphy, account executive at E.F. Hutton, said.     Traders said prices were supported by anticipation that the American Petroleum Institute would report a decline in domestic inventories of petroleum products in a weekly report.     Traders said prices also were supported by an escalation in the Iran-Iraq war, with the Iranians reportedly launching a new offensive against Iraqi positions, and Iraq attacking offshore oil fields and an oil export depot.     Buying by speculators continued to prompt gains in gold and silver futures on the Commodity Exchange in New York.     Gold prices retreated at midday, but rallied before the close with support from the silver market, which was approaching two-year highs, traders said.     Soybean futures posted strong gains on the Chicago Board of Trade, while corn and wheat were mostly higher.     Traders said cash sales have been slow in the country, and the soybean harvest in Brazil has been delayed by rain, which is limiting supplies.     In addition, the Agriculture Department last week projected a substantial drop in soybean acreage this year.     Monday\'s report that the USDA inspected 46 mln bushels of corn for export last week was unexpectedly high and, coupled with a lack of farm sales, provided support for the corn market, traders said.     Live hogs and frozen pork bellies rallied on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, while cattle ended lower.     Live hogs pushed ahead on a lack of supplies because many farmers are turning their attention to spring planting rather than marketing livestock, traders said, noting that cash sales have been lighter than expected this week.     The lack of marketing also has supported pork bellies, but prices drifted lower for moderate losses in nearby months as speculators sold contracts to take profits, traders said.     Cattle prices closed lower but continued to show strength related to tight supplies.     Prices pushed ahead to new contract highs, extending gains past three-year peaks set Monday, as tight supplies forced meat packers to bid aggressively for available animals.     However, some traders sold contracts to take profits after the extended rally, which has seen the April delivery contract soar to 69.90 cents a pound from 56 cents a pound at the start of the year.     New York coffee futures closed higher on trade talk Brazil would not be an aggressive seller near term, analysts said.  \n',crude
'Texas Railroad Commissioner James Nugent, saying that the ailing oilpatch cannot wait for Congress to act, today urged Texas state lawmakers to adopt incentives to find new oil reserves and to exempt severance taxes on oil produced from stripper wells.     Nugent said in a speech to the Texas house of representatives that the state must take the initiative in molding U.S. energy policy and finding new ways to assist troubled oil producers.     His proposal to revitalize Texas\' oil industry would exempt stripper wells that produce 10 barrels of oil or less each day from the state\'s 4.6 pct severance tax. He said that the majority of Texas\' oil wells fall within the stripper well category and a price swing of two to three dlrs a barrel can be crucial in determining if the well remains in production.     Nugent also called for state lawmakers to exempt new wildcat wells from the state severance tax for up to five years as a financial incentive to explore for new oil reserves.     Secondary and tertiary oil production, expensive methods of production that inject water or gas into the ground to recover oil, should also be exempted from the severance tax, Nugent said. His plan would exempt existing secondary and tertiary wells that produce at a rate of less than three barrels a day for three years, or until the price of oil reaches $25 a barrel.     \"We\'ve been sitting back and waiting on two federal administrations to develop a coherent energy policy for the nation to follow. I say we have waited long enough,\" Nugent said. \"In other words, let\'s tell Washington to either lead, follow, or get out of the way.\"     Nugent said that the financial losses to the state treasury by exempting marginal oil production from state severance taxes would be more than made up by stimulating new business for the oil supply and service industry.  \n',crude
'Texas Petroleum Corp said it issued 14.4 mln shares of restricted common stock in exchange for oil and gas properties and joint ventures located in the U.S. and overseas.     The properties were acquired from North American Oil and Gas Corp and Texas Petroleum Corp in Canada, the company said. It added the acquisitions were the first step toward creating an oil and gas exploration and development enterprise.  \n',crude
'British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher denied in an interview published in Saudi Arabia today that her government\'s oil policy contributed to weakness in world oil prices.     She said the government was determined not to intervene to influence production decisions by oil companies operating in the North Sea.     \"We believe these must be a matter for the commercial judgment of the oil companies,\" she told the Arabic language daily al-Sharq al-Awsat in an interview coinciding with a visit to London by King Fahd of Saudi Arabia.     Thatcher said this policy had not contributed to the fall in oil prices as North Sea production was now about the same as in 1984 when prices were close to 30 dlrs a barrel.     British production was on a plateau and was unlikely to increase in the future, she said.     \"We naturally share the concern of Saudi Arabia and other OPEC members about the harmful effects of oil market volatility for both producer and consumer countries,\" Thatcher said.     \"On our part, we are careful to avoid any actions which might add to such volatility.\"  \n',crude
'Treasury Secretary James Baker told the House Appropriations Committee that he believes the president remains opposed to an oil import fee.     He said Reagan last year rejected the idea and he added:     \"In my personal view he is not likely to change his thinking on that.\"     He said Reagan last year opposed the idea because the energy industry was divided on the issue, a tax would require a new bureacracy to administer and the resulting higher energy prices would harm U.S. competitiveness.  \n',crude
'The U.K. Offshore oil industry has suffered from last year\'s collapse in oil prices but should not sustain any permament damage, Minister of State for Energy Alick Buchanan-Smith said.     The drilling, diving and supply vessels sectors had been most affected, Buchanan Snith told the House of Commons energy committee. He noted, however, that oil companies were still spending six mln stg a day to maintain North Sea production.     He added that a report by the manpower services committee which said 14,000 jobs were lost in the industry in 1986 should be seen in the context of a total workforce of 300,000.     Prices of North Sea Brent-grade crude dipped to a low of 8.50 dlrs a barrel last July from a peak of over 30 dlrs the previous November.     They recovered to around 18 dlrs a barrel after last December\'s OPEC meeting and Brent traded today around 17.15 dlrs.     Buchanan-Smith said the U.K. Has no intention of adopting OPEC style quotas, noting that Britian is an oil-consuming as well as an oil-producing nation.  \n',crude
'Energy Secretary John Herrington said he will propose tax incentives to increase domestic oil and natural gas exploration and production to the Reagan Administration for consideration.     \"These options boost production, while avoiding the huge costs associated with proposals like an oil import fee,\" Herrington told a House Energy subcommittee hearing. \"It is my intention to submit these proposals to the domestic policy council and the cabinet for consideration and review.\"     He said proposals, including an increase in the oil depletion allowance and repeal of the windfall profits tax, should be revenue neutral and promote domestic production at the least cost to the economy and the taxpayers.     \"The goal of the Administration policies is to increase domestic production. I would like to shoot for one mln barrels a year.\"     The proposals were based on a DOE study released yesterday warning the United States was threatened by a growing dependence on oil imports.     \"We project free world dependence on Persian Gulf oil at 65 pct by 1995,\" Herrington said.     He said it was too soon to say what the Administration policy on oil tax incentives would be and indicated there would be opposition to tax changes.     \"Of course, to move forward with these kinds of options would require reopening tax issues settled last year (in the tax reform bill) -- an approach which has not, in general, been favored by the administration. I think what we need is to debate this within the Administration,\" he said.     He said the proposals might raise gasoline prices.     Herrington did not specifically confirm a report in today\'s Washington Post that he had written to President Reagan urging an increase in the oil depletion allowance.     Asked about the report by subcommittee members, Herrington said various proposals were under consideration and would be debated within the Administration to determine which would have the most benefits at the least cost.  \n',crude
'an eventual oil import fee in the united states will make no difference to champlin petroleum corp\'s joint venture agreement signed today with petroleos de venezuela (pdvsa), champlin chairman william adams said.     \"this was an aspect which was discussed at length during the negotiations, but we can say our contract covers all eventualities in this regard,\" he tolds during the signing ceremony here.     Venezuela\'s energy and mines minister arturo hernandez grisanti earlier described the agreement, under which pdvsa buys 50 pct of champlin\'s corpus christi refinery, as \"one more step in the maturation and presence of our oil industry in world markets.\"    union pacific chairman william cook said the agreement will be beneficial to both sides, combining a secure source of supply with a modern refinery and access to markets.     \"we are looking to a long-term relationship, and at a time of protectionist tendencies in the U.S. Congress there are clear benefits to both sides,\" he said.     Adams said pdvsa crude would remain competitive even with an oil import fee because champlin had invested heavily over the years in adapingthe texas refinery to process venezuelan heavy crudes with coking and hydro-treating facilities and obtain a competitive product yield.     \"therefore while the danger of an oil import fee has been a consideration in the negotiations, and it remains to be seen what such a fee would represent, we do not foresee any impact on today\'s agreement,\" adams said.     He said the refinery could run crude as heavy as venezuela\'s bolivar coastal field (bcf) 17 api without any difficultiesand would probably move over time to a heavier diet to take advantage of bigger margins.     The refinery has a capacity to process up to 110,000 bpd of venezuelan high sulphur content heavy crude, with an 80-85 pct yield of white products.  \n',crude
'A unanimous Supreme Court ruled that oil and gas exploration can proceed on two tracts off the Alaska coast which were leased by the federal government to eight major oil companies.     The ruling was an important victory for the oil companies and the Reagan administration\'s controversial off-shore leasing program and a setback for two small Alaskan villages that challenged the leases by claiming damage to the environment.     The administration said that the court-ordered halt in drilling had created uncertainty over the 4.2 billion dlrs paid for 621 leases off the shores of Alaska since December 1980.     A federal appeals court ordered the oil companies to halt all exploration and remove all drilling rigs from two tracts in the Bering Sea off Alaska because of possible harm to the subsistence needs and culture of native Eskimos.     But the Supreme Court said the appeals court was wrong in issuing an injunction halting exploration.     \"Here, injury to subsistence resources from exploration was not at all probable,\" Justice Byron White wrote for the court. \"And on the other side of the balance of harms was the fact that the oil companies had committed approximately 70 mln dlrs to exploration to be conducted during the summer of 1985 which they would have lost without chance of recovery had exploration been enjoined,\" he said.     The oil companies, Amoco Corp AN, ARCO, Exxon Corp XON, Mobil Corp MOB, Sohio, Shell, Texaco Inc TX and Union Oil, had said that voiding previously granted leases would result in staggering financial losses.     The first lease sale in 1983 involved 2.4 mln acres and generated 318 mln dlrs while the second lease sale in 1984 covered 37 mln acres and produced 516 mln dlrs.     Administration officials, saying the lease sales were preceded by an intense environmental impact study, denied that the oil and gas exploration would hurt subsistence resources.     The Alaskan villages of Gambell and Stebbins, along with an organization of Eskimo natives on the Yukon Delta, argued that the drilling would hurt native hunting and fishing.  \n',crude
'Tonight\'s American Petroleum Institute weekly inventory report is expected to show moderate drawdowns in distillates and gasoline stocks for the week ended March 27, analysts and traders said.     They said they expect gasoline stocks to fall three mln barrels or less and heating oil inventories to drop between 1.3 and four mln barrels.     Some analysts see crude stocks falling by as much as six mln barrels, while others think they could go up as much as 3.5 mln barrels. Crude oil runs are expected to be unchanged from the previous week or slightly higher or lower.     For the week ended March 20, the API said gasoline stocks fell 2.7 mln barrels. Mosts analysts expect a modest draw for the week ended March 27. They said stocks could fall between 700,000 and three mln barrels. Some said there is also a chance gasoline stocks will be unchanged.     API said distillate stocks dropped four mln barrels for the week ended March 20. Analysts and traders generally predict a similar or smaller depletion for last week. They said stock levels could drop 1.3 to four mln barrels.     The analysts attribute product stockdraws to seasonal factors but they said crude direction is harder to call.     Crude inventories rose 8.5 mln barrels in the week ended March 20, API said. Analysts are looking for build of between 3.5 mln barrels to a six mln barrel draw for the week ended March 27.     API reported the amount of refinery capacity utilized up three pct for the week ended March 20. Analysts said utilization could have remained unchanged, or rose or fell by less than one pct for the week ended March 27.     Moderate product stockdraws would strengthen the market slightly, analysts said. But bullish expectations are already partially reflected in today\'s gains, they added.  \n',crude
'Energy Secretary John Herrington said his proposed option to raise the oil depletion allowance to 27.5 pct was probably the most economically promising way to spur domestic production.     The White House has said it would consider the option although it was generally opposed to any revisions in the new tax code.     Herrington told a meeting of the Mid-Continent Oil and Gas Association that the higher depletion allowance on new oil and enhanced oil recovery would cost taxpayers about 200 mln dlrs a year.     The option was one of many contained in a report on oil and the national security the Energy Department sent to the White House on Tuesday.     Herrington said of the increased depletion allowance option: \"that is one that could significantly increase production at a very low cost to the American taxpayer.\"     He again rejected an oil import fee as far too costly to the overall U.S. economy.  \n',crude
'The U.S. oil and gas industry is in better health than it was a year ago, according to testimony given to the Texas Railroad Commission at its annual state of the industry hearing today.      The Commission, which regulates the state\'s oil and gas industry, heard testimony from a number of high-level company executives reflecting a belief that the recent industry downturn had bottomed out.      \"The attitude expressed here today so far is a great deal more optimistic (than last year),\" Commissioner James E. (Jim) Nugent tolds.      \"It reflects their (the executives) belief that they are seeing the bottom of the economic cycle,\" he added, \"and with just a few reasonable breaks this industry can begin to move again.\"      The energy industry was hard hit by the sharp drop in oil prices, which fell from around 30 dlrs a barrel in late 1985 to as low as 10 dlrs in mid-1986. Prices have since steadied to around 18 dlrs a barrel.      At the same time, a number of company executives testified that the nation\'s domestic exploration and production segment was still hurting and in need of government help.      Production costs are considerably higher in the United States than in such areas as the Middle East and as prices fell many domestic producers were forced to shut down their operations. Currently, there are only about 760 oil rigs operating in the United States compared with an average of nearly 2,000 in 1985.      Citing a study released yesterday by the Department of Energy, many said the falling production of domestic oil coupled with increasing U.S. demand, was leading to a growing dependency on imports, particularly from the politically volatile Middle East.      \"In the U.S., 1986 petroleum production responded to lower prices, increasing about 2.5 pct, or 400,000 barrels per day (bpd),\" said J.S. Simon, General Manager of the Supply Department at Exxon Corp XON, the nation\'s largest oil company.      At the same time, Simon said \"U.S. oil production declined by 300,000 bpd, the first decline in several years,\" and \"net petroleum imports were up 25 pct to 5.3 mln bpd.\"      Noting that while oil prices were expected to remain between 13 and 20 dlrs a barrel, depending on OPEC\'s ability to control production, Simon said demand is expected to remain at 1986 levels, leading to \"a significant amount of spare worldwide production capacity, in excess of 10 mln bpd.\"      He said the surplus capacity would lead to continued volatility and called for \"governmental and regulatory policies in support of the domestic petroleum industry.\"      Citing the costs recently imposed by the federal government through the 1986 tax code changes and \"Superfund\" legislation, Simon called for the repeal of the windfall profits tax, total decontrol of natural gas and improved access to federal lands for oil and gas exploration.      Simon did not mention an oil import fee, which many in the industry have called for as a way of building up the nation\'s domestic operations before imports reach such a level that national security might be compromised.      In yesterday\'s report, the Energy Department said imports could make up 50 pct of U.S. demand by 1995, adding that Persian Gulf producers will provide as much as 65 pct of the free world\'s total oil consumption by that date.      Arguing that \"oil is a political tool in every nation on earth,\" Frank Pitts, chairman of Pitts Oil Co, today called for a variable oil import fee, among other measures, \"before the treacherous foothold of the Middle East is irreversible and our national security is compromised.\"      Royce Wisenbaker, Chairman of Wisenbaker Production Co, agreed, saying that like many federal government programs that were set up with good intentions, it would probably turn into a \"shambles.\"      Wisenbaker added that he was optimistic for the future. \"For those of us who have managed to hold on, the worst is over,\" he said.      Roger Hemminghaus, President of Diamond Shamrock Refining and Marketing Co, said he was \"enthusiastic about the future,\" adding that he expected \"an increase in profitability by midyear.\"  \n',crude
'U.S. Department of Energy Secretary John Herrington said he was \"optimistic\" about the chances of providing a more generous depletion allowance for oil and gas producers, but added that the plan faces strong opposition from some members of the Reagan administration.     Herrington, speaking to Houston oil executives at a breakfast meeting, said administration debate over his plan for a 27.5 pct annual depletion allowance was \"heavy and strong\" largely because of some fears that the U.S. oil industry could eventually become as dependent on federal subsidies as the agriculture industry.     Herrington\'s proposed tax incentives for the oil industry were issued last week after the Department of Energy released a comprehensive report finding U.S. national security could be jeopardized by rising oil imports.     In response to a question from Mitchell Energy and Development Corp MND chairman, George Mitchell, Herrington said the report did not definitively rule out an oil import tarrif. \"We intend to keep that debate open,\" Herrington said.     However, following his speech, Herrington tolds that the new report shows an oil import fee \"is not economical.\"     Herrington said, for example, a 10 dlr per barrel tariff on oil imports would cause the nation\'s gross national product to drop by as much as 32 billion dlrs.     Herrington also said he believed President Reagan, who requested the comprehensive national security study, was committed to some action to help the ailing U.S. oil industry.     \"I\'m quite confident he understands the problems and is prepared to do something about it,\" Herrington said.  \n',crude
'The U.S. Has offered warships to escort Kuwaiti tankers in the Gulf past Iranian anti-ship missile batteries, Defence Department officials said.     The officials tolds yesterday the offer was made last week by Navy Admiral William Crowe, chairman of the Pentagon Joint Chiefs of Staff, during a Middle East visit.     Reagan administration officials said later that Washington did not seek military confrontation with Tehran, but would not let Iran use Chinese-made \"Silkworm\" anti-ship missiles, capable of covering the narrow entrance to the Gulf, to choke oil shipments to the West.     Defence officials said Kuwait had asked if protection for up to a dozen vessels, most of them tankers, could be provided by three U.S. Navy destroyers and two frigates now in the southern Gulf and the Gulf of Oman.     In addition to a half dozen ships in the U.S. Navy\'s small Mideast Task Force near the Straits of Hormuz, the Pentagon has moved 18 warships, including the aircraft carrier Kitty Hawk, into the northern Arabian Sea in the past month.     White House and defence officials said that massing the fleet was routine and had nothing to do with the Iran-Iraq war or Iran\'s stationing of missiles near the mouth of the Gulf.     The State Department said on Friday that Iran has been told about U.S. Concern over the threat to oil shipments in the Gulf. The communication was sent through Switzerland, which represents U.S. Interests in Iran.     Iran denied as baseless reports that it intended to threaten shipping in the Gulf and said any U.S. Interference in the region would meet a strong response, Tehran Radio said on Sunday.     Several hundred vessels have been confirmed hit in the Gulf by Iran and Iraq since early 1984 in the so-called tanker war, an offshoot of their 6-1/2-year-old ground conflict.  \n',crude
'Treasury Secretary James Baker and Office of Management and Budget chief James Miller defended an administration plan to sell the U.S. Naval Petroleum Reserves.     In response to hostile questioning from a member of the House Appropriations Committee, the officials said the plan was justified to help bring the fiscal 1988 budget deficit and to get the government out of the oil business.     Miller acknowleged the estimated sale proceeds at 3.3 billion dlrs would actually bring down the deficit by about 2.2 billion dlrs because of the loss of revenues from the sale of oil from the reserves.     Miller said the sale price may end up higher.     \"We\'d sell it to the highest bidder,\" Miller said.     \"If we can get more we\'ll take it.\"  \n',crude
'The White House said a proposal for a tax break for the oil industry would undergo review.     Spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said President Reagan had no position on recommendations submitted by Energy Secretary John Herrington to encourage investment in the hard hit domestic oil industry.     But Fitzwater noted that Reagan did have a fundamental objection to tax rises and special tax breaks.     He said that even though Herrington\'s recommendation did not agree with existing policy, \"We\'ll take a look at it.\"     The review will be undertaken by the president\'s Domestic Policy Council.     Herrington\'s proposal was reported by the Washington Post to have been made in a letter to Reagan submitting a study that found the United States would be importing half of its oil by the 1990s, threatening U.S. national security.  \n',crude
'The United States has offered Navy warships to escort Kuwaiti oil tankers into and out of the  Gulf where they could be threatened by new Iranian anti-ship missiles, U.S. defense officials said today.     \"We believe the Kuwaitis have also approached the Soviet Union about the possibility of using Soviet tankers\" to ship their oil, one of the officials tolds. \"But if there is superpower protection, we would rather it come from us,\" the official said.     The officials, who asked not to be identified, said Kuwait had asked about possible protection for a dozen vessels, most of them oil tankers, which could be supplied by three U.S. Navy guided missile destroyers and two guided missile frigates now in the southern part of the Gulf.     \"We told them we would give them help and we are waiting to hear the Kuwaiti response to our offer,\" one official said.     In addition to a half dozen ships in the U.S. Navy\'s small Mideast Task Force near the Straits of Hormuz, the Pentagon has moved 18 warships -- including the Aircraft Carrier Kitty Hawk -- into the northern Indian Ocean in the past month.     White House and defense officials said today that massing of the fleet was routine and had nothing to do with the Iran-Iraq war or Iran\'s recent stationing of Chinese-made  anti-ship missiles near the mouth of the Gulf.     The land-based missiles have increased concern in Kuwait and other Middle East countries that their oil shipments might be affected. Several hundred vessels have been confirmed hit in the  Gulf by Iran and Iraq since early 1984. White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater told reporters today that it was in the U.S. strategic interest to keep the free flow of oil in the gulf and through the Straits of Hormuz.     But he said U.S. ships in the region were on routine maneuvers.     Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger on Sunday declined to discuss specifics, but said the United States would do whatever was necessary to keep the Gulf shipping open in the face of new Iranian anti-ship missiles in the region.     \"We are fully prepared to do what\'s necessary to keep the shipping going and keep the freedom of navigation available in that very vital waterway of the world,\" he said on NBC television\'s \"Meet the Press.\"     The State Department said Friday Iran has been informed about U.S. concern over the threat to oil shipments in the Gulf. The communciation was sent through Switzerland, which represents American interests in Iran.      Iran on Sunday denied as baseless reports that it intended to threaten shipping in the gulf and warned the United States that any interference in the region would meet a strong response from Tehran, Tehran Radio said.     An Iranian Foreign Ministry spokesman, quoted in a broadcast monitored by the BBC in London, said reports that Iran intends to threaten shipping in the Gulf were baseless.     \"In conjunction with this misleading propaganda, America has already paved the ground to achieve its expansionist and hegemonistic intentions, aiming to build up its military presence in the region,\" he was quoted as saying.  \n',crude
'Prices of wholesale finished energy goods in the U.S. rose 4.0 pct in February after a 9.8 pct rise in January, the Labor Department said.     The Producer Price Index for finished energy goods fell by 20.9 pct in the past 12 months.     Heating oil prices rose 3.0 pct in February after a 18.0 pct rise in January, the department said.     Gasoline prices rose by 5.5 pct last month after a 15.7 pct January rise, the department said. Natural gas prices rose 1.8 pct after a 4.2 pct rise in January.     Crude oil prices rose 4.4 pct in February, after a 19.7 pct January rise and were off 21.3 pct from the year ago level.  \n',crude
'The number of seismic crews searching for oil and gas in the United States dropped by nine to a total of 151 crews, a decrease of six pct from January, the Society of Exploration Geophysicists said.     The February total represented a 49 pct decrease from February 1986.     Worldwide, the association\'s monthly survey showed that seismic exploration for oil and gas increased to 395 in February, up three from the month before. Africa added three seismic crews, the Middle East increased by two and the Far East added one while reductions were reported in Central and South America, Europe and the United States.  \n',crude
'The U.S. should reassess its Mideast policy in light of its rising dependence on imported oil, according to Charles Ebinger of the Center for Strategic and International Studies.      \"The prospect of rising dependence on oil imports from the Gulf, and the recent revelations of the Tower Commission report, mandate more than ever before the need for a fundamental reassessment of U.S. interests in the Middle East,\" Ebinger said.      He remarks were made in an address to the National Petroleum Refiners Association meeting.      \"Although in the short run it is difficult to see a direct link between Arab anger and threats to oil supplies, in the current environment it will be increasingly difficult for moderate Arab leaders to be seen as friendly to U.S. interests,\" Ebinger said.      Oil traders said threats to oil supplies has kept crude oil prices strong recently although some believe prices will be weaker if demand falls in the spring.     But William Randol, analyst at First Boston Corp, said crude oil prices will hold  near current levels this spring.     There will be no spring downturn, said Randol, speaking at the annual refiner meeting. He said there is a 40 pct chance that crude oil prices could move higher in the second half of the year, following an OPEC meeting scheduled for late June.     He said he expects OPEC will extend its current agreement to restrict production.     OPEC will renew its production pricing agreement in June because the value of the oil exports of the OPEC producers  has declined along with the U.S. dollar, Randol said.     OPEC oil exports are priced in U.S. dollars, and the dollar has fallen about 30 pct in the last 18 months.     Randol said U.S. crude oil imports will increase 3.5 to four mln barrels per day by 1990 as consumption rises 1.5 to two mln bpd, and supplies decline two mln bpd.  \n',crude
'The United States said it was doing what it could to ease tension in the Aegean as Greek and Turkish warships headed for a possible clash over oil drilling rights on the sea\'s continental shelf.     State Department spokesman Charles Redman told reporters, \"We have urged both sides to exercise restraint and avoid any actions which might exacerbate the situation.\"     \"In the light of the most recent developments, we are consulting with the parties and with other interested allies on means to reduce tensions,\" he added.     Redman declined to elaborate on what Washington was doing, but he said an emergency meeting of NATO ambassadors in Brussels on the subject was only one path it was pursuing.     He also refused to say which side was to blame for the renewed confrontation, saying Washington was still trying to ascertain all the facts, as Prime minister Andreas Papanderou said Greece was prepared to tackle any aggressor.     \"The crucial point here is that these are two friends and allies. We don\'t want to see tension rise and we are doing what we can to see if we can help here,\" Redman said.  \n',crude
'A White House-ordered report said  that growing U.S. reliance on foreign oil into the year 2000 could have potentially damaging implications for national security.     The Energy Department study discusses several options to curb reliance on foreign oil, but makes no recommendations.     President Reagan and most Congressmen have previously ruled out a tax on foreign oil as a way to curb imports and to help the depressed domestic oil industry.     Energy Secretary John Herrington said in a statement that \"although we have made gains in energy security in the last six years, this report shows that there is justification for national concern both over declining competitiveness of our domestic oil and gas industry and over rising oil imports.\"     The report said imports last year were 33 pct of U.S. consumption and by the mid-1990s could rise to 50 pct.     Among the report\'s options to ease U.S. reliance on foreign oil are several already advocated by the Reagan Administration.     President Reagan ordered the study last September, citing a determination that the country never again become captive to a foreign oil cartel, referring to the OPEC-led oil shortages and sharp prices increases of the 1970s.     The report said an import fee would raise prices and help make it economical for U.S. oil firms to find and produce new oil, as well as to cut imports, but on the whole the tax would depress the nation\'s economy.     The study was outlined in a New York Times report today.  \n',crude
'The \"cross field allowance\" relief on Petroleum Revenue Tax (PRT) announced by U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson this week will favour smaller non-PRT paying fields, according to stockbrokers Wood Mackenzie and Co.     The cross field allowance offsets up to 10 pct of qualifying spending on a new oil field against PRT liability of other fields. It is restricted to new offshore developments outside the southern basin and yet to gain Annex B approval.     A report by the stockbrokers said that on a new field not paying PRT due to its small size, the relief would directly benefit in PRT saving on an existing field.     \"The cross field allowance will mainly benefit participators in those fields which have no PRT liability,\" the report said, adding that the timing of development of such fields may be advanced.     The government would in effect be subsidising these developments at 7.5 pct of capital expenditure before corporation tax, the report said.     On fields likely to pay PRT in the future, the benefit is of timing. Although liabilities on other existing fields will be reduced immediately, liabilities on larger new fields will rise in the future due to the loss of offsets, it said.     In a study on probable fields, the report said that when the rates of return are examined, the rise for a PRT-paying field such as Miller, the largest undeveloped oil field in the U.K. North Sea, is from 18.7 to 19 pct, while the rise for a small non-PRT paying field such as Kittiwake is 15.9 to 17.9 pct.     The report added that in fields which pay PRT, there will be a cost in being able to have this early relief. Not only will these costs be unavailable for offset against the field\'s future profits, but uplift of some 35 pct on these costs will be lost.     Thus, a saving of PRT of 100 when field development starts will have to be matched by a rise in PRT of 135 at a later time.  \n',crude
'Petroleos de Venezuela S.A will announce within two weeks the name of a foreign consortium it has chosen to help exploit the coal deposits at Guasare in western Zulia state, PDVSA president Juan Chacin Guzman said.     Chacin told reporters the foreign partner will provide capital as well as technical and marketing expertise to the Carbozulia project, which the state oil company will manage.     PDVSA officials said that among those who bid for the partnership is a consortium between Agip Carbone, a subsidiary of Italy\'s Ente Nazionale Idrocarburi (ENI), and Atlantic Richfield ARC of the United States.     Minister of Energy and Mines Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said discussions are currently taking place to finalize the terms of the contract with the foreign partner.     PDVSA vice-president Pablo Reimpell said last week the first shipment of coal from the Carbozulia project should be made during the final quarter of 1987, and would measure between 100-150,000 metric tons.     Plans call for production to eventually reach 500,000 mt annually. Reimpell said the original investment in the project will be approximately 8 billion bolivars.  \n',crude
'Venezuela will lend Ecuador 50,000 barrels per day of crude oil over the next few months to help it meet its export commitments, Energy and Mines Minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said today.     He said that under the terms of this loan, agreed during a visit here this week by Ecuador\'s Deputy Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite, Ecuador will begin repaying the loan in August.     Hernandez Grisanti said the loan will go part way to offsetting the loss of Ecuador\'s 140,000 in exports caused by earthquake damage to 25 miles of pipeline last week.     Ecuador was forced to suspend exports after the pipeline connecting its jungle oil fields with the pacific port of Balao was put out of action.     Venezuela has an output quota of 1.495 bpd, while Ecuador\'s is 210,000 bpd. Santos Alvite said Ecuador will ask OPEC to allow it to produce 100,000 bpd above its quota when the pipeline is repaired to offset present production losses.     Hernandez Grisanti said also a first 300,000 barrels shipment of Venezuelan crude oil will leave for Ecuador this weekend to help meet domestic consumption needs.     The oil, part of a five mln additional crude oil loan by Venezuela, will be processed at Guayaquil refineries.     \"If we had not supplied oil to Ecuador the life of this country would have ground to a halt,\" he said.  \n',crude
'venezuela will supply ecuador with an as yet undetermined amount of crude oil to help it meet export commitments, seriously affected by last week\'s earthquake, energy and mines minister arturo hernandez grisanti said.     He gave few details about the deal, but said a crude oil loan agreement will be made between state oil companies petroleos de venezuela (pdvsa) and ecuador\'s cepe.     Ecuador was forced to suspend oil exports for an expected four months after an earthquake damaged a pipeline. Oil accounts for 60 per cent of its export income.      Hernandez was speaking to reporters at miraflores palace on the results of talks with ecuador\'s deputy energy minister fernando santos alvite, who arrived here last night.     \"the volume lent to ecuador would be discounted from its opec quota and would not affect venezuela\'s,\" he said. \"we would from august on produce our own quota and sell the additional amounts that ecuador would be repaying us,\" he said.     He did not elaborate on the quota arrangements but did say ecuador would notify opec by telex that venezuela would be lending it a certain amount over so many days.     Venezuela\'s opec output quota is currently 1.495 million barrels a day, and ecuador\'s has been set at 210,000 bpd.  \n',crude
'Venezuela will lend Ecuador up to 12.5 mln barrels of crude oil to help it meet its export commitments and its domestic energy demand, Ecuadorean Energy and Mines Minister Javier Espinosa said today in a statement.     Ecuador was forced to suspend exports after the pipeline connecting its jungle oil fields with the Pacific Ocean port of Balao was damaged last week by an earthquake.     Venezuela would lend 50,000 barrels per day of crude for a total of up to to 7.5 mln barrels to help Ecuador meet export commitments, Espinosa said. Also, Venezuela will sell the crude and provide the foreign exchange earnings to Ecuador, he said.      Ecuador would repay Venezuela in crude once it resumed its exports after repairing its pipeline to Balao, a task that would take an estimated five  months.     Venezuela is lending Ecuador five mln barrels of crude for refining in this country to meet domestic demand. Ecuador would repay that loan with crude once the oil pipeline is repaired.     Both countries are the only Latin American members of the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC).     Ecuador was exporting about 140,000 bpd before the earthquake, Energy Ministry officials said. Its total output was around 260,000 bpd.  \n',crude
'Venezuela\'s state oil company Petroleos de Venezuela S.A. wants to raise its worldwide refining capacity by 150,000 barrels of per day, a company official attending the National Petroleum Refiners Association meeting here said.     He declined to be identified but said PdVSA has the capacity to refine about 650,000 bpd of crude oil from refining centers in Venezuela, Sweden, West Germany, Belgium, and the United States. The company recently purchased a 50 pct stake in the Corpus Christi, Texas refinery of Champlin Petroleum Co, a subsidiary of Union Pacific Corp UNP.     Earlier it bought a similar stake in the Lake Charles, La refinery owned by Citgo Petroleum Corp, a unit of Southland Corp SLC.      According to the official, Venezuela is searching worldwide for the additional refining capacity but he did not mention where the company was looking.      Refineries abroad, he said, guarantee a refining outlet for Venezuelan crude oil while ensuring stability of supply to refiners.     He said Venezuela currently  produces about 1.4 mln bpd of crude oil, which is in line with its 1.495 bpd OPEC ceiling.  \n',crude
'Venezuela has still to work out final details of its plan to supply Ecuador with 50,000 barrels per day of crude oil to compensate that country for lost exports caused by earthquake damage, a senior Petroleos de Venezuela (PDVSA) official said.     \"We have yet to finalize details on how the compensation will be carried out and how OPEC production quotas will be affected,\" he said during the signing of a joint venture deal with Union Pacific Corp today.     He said an agreement was initialled on a visit last week by Ecuador\'s deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite.     He pointed out that there are some contractual points to be considered. Venezuela, possibly unique among oil exporters, requires its clients to sign final destination clauses to ensure its oil is not resold on the spot market.     Ecuador\'s oil minister Javier Espinosa was quoted today as saying Venezuela will export the oil on Ecuador\'s account and remit the revenues to Quito. Ecuador would pay back the oil at a rate of 35,000 bpd.     He said Venezuela\'s oil would be traded through Ecuadorean state oil company Cepe, but the PDVSA official said the company never allows third parties to trade its oil.  \n',crude
'Strong winds and high seas forced the closure of Egypt\'s main port of Alexandria and a nearby oil terminal, port officials said.     Tanker loading at the Suez-Mediterranean Arab Petroleum Pipelines Co in Sedi Kerir, southwest of here, stopped and officials said five tankers were at anchorage awaiting improved weather.  \n',crude
'The National Wildlife Federation  rejected an Interior Department draft plan to open wilderness lands in Northern Alaska to oil and gas exploration.     The federation, the nation\'s largest conservation group, said further study was needed to assess any possible damage that development might have on the wildlife in the area, the coastal plain of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge.     Jay Hair, the federation\'s executive vice president, called the Interior\'s research into the effects of development \"so fundamentally flawed that it provides little or no basis on which to make a public policy decision.\"     Hair called the department\'s proposal a \"reflection of a largely political decision,\" adding \"we have no confidence in Interior to represent the broad public interest in this area.\"     Interior wants to open the 1.5 million acre coastal plain to oil and gas exploration, but it said only with tough  safeguards to protect the area\'s caribou and musk-oxen.     It said a preliminary survey showed the region could hold billions of barrels of oil and gas, and that its potential as an energy resource would never be known without exploration.     Interior said oil on the coastal plain could match the 10 billion barrels found at Prudhoe Bay, just west of the plain.     Under existing law, Congress must agree to oil and gas exploration, and if it does not act, the land will remain a wildlife refuge protected from commercial development.     Hair said Interior\'s report failed to stress the probability that finding recoverable oil is only 19 pct.     He said Interior\'s study also failed to weigh oil, gas, fish and wildlife information the State of Alaska had gathered nor had the department consulted the Environmental Protection Agency on the possible effects of exploration.     The federation, in letters to Congressmen, proposed that a nine-member commission be set up to study all aspects of the issue and report back to Congress in about two years.     Hair said the federation was not opposed to the possible exploration of oil, only that Interior\'s study was inadquate to make a sound judgement.     Congressional observers said that at present there was little sentiment in Congress to open the wildlife area for commercial exploitation dispite increasing concern that the United States is becoming overly dependent on foreign oil.  \n',crude
'World Bank president Barber Conable pledged the Bank\'s support to help Indonesia adjust to lower world oil prices, but said further deregulation of its protected economy was needed.     Speaking to reporters after talks with President Suharto, he said he expected Jakarta to do more to liberalise the economy and deregulate trade policy.     Indonesia, hurt by the fall in oil prices last year which cut the value of its crude exports in half, is the Third World\'s sixth largest debtor. It has received 10.7 billion dlrs from the World Bank in the past 20 years.     Conable said the World Bank, which granted Indonesia a 300 mln dlr loan last month to help its balance of payments, was prepared to back Jakarta in taking the right steps to adjust to lower oil and primary commodity prices.     \"We are prepared to support those steps which we believe are consistent with the development of the Indonesian economy,\" he said.     He said Jakarta\'s willingness to move quickly after last year\'s collapse in oil price saved Indonesia from some of the difficulties now faced by other countries.     Indonesia devalued its currency by 31 pct against the dollar in September to avoid a balance of payments crisis, and has announced a series of measures since May intended to stimulate exports, encourage foreign investment and revitalise the economy.     However, key monopolies in areas like steel and plastics and high tariff barriers remain in place.     Conable arrived in Indonesia on Saturday and has since met 14 Indonesian cabinet ministers to review the country\'s borrowing needs and the impact of falling oil prices on the country.  \n',crude
'World Bank President Barber Conable is expected to press Indonesia, the Third World\'s sixth largest debtor, to maintain the momentum of economic policy changes to tackle the slump in its oil revenues, western diplomats said.     Conable, who flew to Indonesia yesterday from Tokyo, will meet with President Suharto and senior economic ministers.     He said on arrival that the economy of South-East Asia\'s largest nation was being managed well, but the slump in world oil prices called for major policy adjustments.     Today the World Bank chief will visit Bank-funded projects in the eastern section of Java, Indonesia\'s most populous island. He will see Suharto on Tuesday after a day of detailed discussions with ministers tomorrow.     Indonesia, the only Asian member of OPEC, has been severely hit by last year\'s crash in oil prices, which cut its oil and gas revenues in half.     Japan\'s state Export-Import Bank last month agreed to provide around 900 mln dlrs in untied credits to help Indonesia pay for its share of 21 World Bank development projects.     Indonesia, a country of 168 mln people, has responded to the oil slump by cutting spending, devaluing its currency by 31 pct, and trying to boost exports, while using foreign loans to bridge its deficit.     Diplomats said that Conable was expected to press Suharto and leading economic ministers to maintain the pace of policy change, particularly in dismantling Indonesia\'s high-cost protected economy.     \"Oil prices, the debt crisis, the world recession, all call for major policy adjustments and external support,\" Conable said in his arrival statement.     But with Indonesia facing parliamentary elections next month, he is likely to avoid anything which would imply that the Bank is demanding specific changes.     \"We believe there has been wise leadership here and the economy is being very well managed,\" Conable told reporters at Jakarta airport.     Indonesia has official and private overseas debts totalling 37 billion dlrs, according to the Bank, which makes it the Third World\'s sixth biggest debtor. It has received 10.7 billion dlrs from the World Bank since 1968.     Conable did not spell out what further changes he would like to see. Last month the Bank endorsed economic changes already introduced by Indonesia, but implied it wanted more.     Giving a 300 mln dlr loan in balance of payments support, the Bank said it will monitor progress on implementation of the government\'s trade reform measures, and supported its determination to promote efficiency and longer-term growth.     Indonesia has introduced a series of measures since last May to boost non-oil exports, liberalise trade and encourage outside investment.     Suharto has also ordered a government committee to look into which of Indonesia\'s 215 state-run companies could be sold.     But in a report last month, the U.S. Embassy said the government appeared divided over how far to take its reforms.     Western analysts say that in particular the government is unsure how far to go with dismantling Indonesia\'s high-cost monopolies, which control core areas of the economy.     Central bank governor Arifin Siregar said this week that Indonesia faced very limited economic choices.     It could not spend its way out of trouble because this would increase the balance of payments deficit and domestic inflation.      He said the main objective was to raise exports outside the oil and natural gas sector.     Indonesia\'s current account deficit is projected by the government to fall to 2.64 billion dlrs in the coming financial year which starts on April 1, from an estimated 4.1 billion in 1986/87.  \n',crude
'The world\'s dependency on the Mideast as the source for its petroleum is growing and nothing is going to stop it, Donald K. McIvor, an Exxon Corp XON Director and senior vice president tolds in an interview.     \"Non-OPEC production will begin to decline and the gap between demand and supply will widen so that the trend to increasing dependence on OPEC and the Middle East is inevitable,\" McIvor said.     Decreased supplies will firm prices for crude oil but are not likely to change a growing dependence, McIvor said.     McIvor, Exxon\'s senior vice president responsible for oil and gas exploration and production said that dependence would result from the Mideast\'s large spare capacity at a time when the rest of the world consumes more oil than it was finding.     \"Since 1970 we\'ve been consuming oil at rates of 20-25 billion barrels per year while making new discoveries of only about 10-15 bilion barrels per year,\" McIvor said.     \"The bulk of the inventory and more than half of the remaining proved reserves lies in the middle east which is producing at much less than current capacity,\" he added.     McIvor said that of the some 30,000 oil fields discovered so far only 37 \"one-one thousandth of the total number contained about 35 pct of all the oil ever discovered.\"     McIvor said, in response to a question, that he did not believe there were any more \"super giants\", or oil fields with reserves greater than five billion barrels, to be found which would change the conclusion of the world\'s growing dependency.     \"Of those 37 super giants only 11 lie outside the Middle East. Only five of the 37 have been discovered in the past 20 years and only two of these lie outside the middle east (Cantarell in Mexico and Alaska\'s North Slope).\" McIvor said.     McIvor said that many of the large fields outside the U.S. like Alaska\'s Prudhoe Bay and the North Sea were reaching a peak and would soon begin to decline.     But the Exxon executive said that there were still plenty of opportunities to be explored and developed outside of the Middle east, particulartly in Canada, the North Sea, and Australia and Africa.     McIvor said that decisions to explore and drill in those areas would be depedent upon both the expectations of a higher price of oil as well as the legal regime affecting the companies.     \"The ideal regime is a stable one not one where there is a constant change in policies,\" McIvor said.     McIvor said he opposed import subsidies or tariffs used to increase exploration as these only benefit one part of the economy at the expense of other parts of the economy.     Asked about the options offered this week by U.S. Energy Secretary Herrington to increase U.S. production McIvor said he could not comment on subjects like the oil depletion allowance now but \"the thrust of his (Herrington) report is valid. It has highlighted the growing dependency on the Middle east and the need to increase U.S. production.\"     McIvor also said that he expected natural gas to play a greater role in the future in meeting energy needs.     \"Natural gas will have the opportunity to become an increasingly important part of the worlkd\'s energy supply,\" McIvor said.     \"Crude oil will be used more and more as a transportation fuel and natural gas will be used more to generate heat, as an industrial fuel,\" he added.  \n',crude
'Distillate fuel stocks held in primary storage rose by 628,000 barrels in the week ended April three to 106.96 mln barrels from a revised 106.33 mln the previous week, the American Petroleum Institute said.     In its weekly statistical bulletin, the oil industry trade group said gasoline stocks rose 2.29 mln barrels to 247.91 mln barrels from a revised 245.62 mln, and crude oil stocks were up 8.52 mln barrels to 337.73 mln from a revised 329.21 mln.     It said residual fuel stocks rose 28,000 barrels to 38.25 mln from a revised 37.98 mln barrels.     API said refinery runs in the week rose to 12.54 mln barrels per day from 12.21 mln and refinery use of operating capacity was 80.4 pct, up from 78.3 pct.     Crude oil imports in the week fell to 3.40 mln bpd from a revised 3.60 mln, API added.  \n',gas
'U.S. Senate Republican leader Robert Dole (R-Kan.) said he and a group of Republican lawmakers are considering introducing legislation to extend the ethanol tax exemption through the year 2000.     Dole, addressing the National Corn Growers Association board, said the proposal was under consideration by a rural task force of Republican members of Congress and governors.     Gasoline containing at least 10 pct ethanol now receives a six cents per gallon exemption from a nine cent federal excise tax. The exemption is to expire the end of 1992.     Ethanol is produced primarily by a few large agribusiness firms including Archer Daniels Midland (ADM) and A.E. Staley. The tax exemption has helped bolster ethanol production despite a sharp drop in the prices of competing crude oil.  \n',gas
'The European Community (EC) agreed tough new rules to cut diesel exhaust emissions from trucks and buses in an attempt to reduce air pollution threatening vast stretches of the region\'s forests.     Diplomats said EC environment ministers meeting here agreed member states would have to reduce by 20 pct over the next few years the emission of nitrogen oxide, widely seen as the main source of acid rain endangering forests and lakes.     The reduction would be compulsory for heavy vehicles, with tougher standards imposed for new models from April 1988 and for all new vehicles from October 1990.     The EC\'s executive Commission says the emission level of nitrogen oxide was expected to drop to 2.4 mln tonnes a year from three mln tonnes within the 12-nation Community if all heavy vehicles applied to the new standards.     There are an estimated nine mln lorries and buses in use in the EC, according to Commission figures.     The ministers also gave West Germany a go-ahead to move towards a ban on the sale of leaded regular petrol, after Bonn requested permission to do so to encourage the use of low-pollution cars, diplomats said.     West Germany will still need ministers\' final approval for such a plan. Diplomats said this was expected when EC environment ministers meet next on May 21.     But the ministers added that the go-ahead for West Germany did not mean there would automatically follow a Community-wide ban on the sale of regular leaded petrol.     Bonn intends to keep leaded premium petrol pumps, diplomats said. They added that, of the 97 mln cars in the EC, only 20 mln now ran on regular leaded petrol and these would risk no damage if they switched over to premium leaded petrol.     Under EC law, ministers have to give member states special permission if they wish to be exempt from Community competition laws. This would be the case if West Germany were to implement a ban on the sale of leaded regular petrol.  \n',gas
'The European Community (EC) agreed on new rules to cut diesel exhaust emissions from trucks and buses in an attempt to reduce air pollution threatening vast stretches of the region\'s forests.     Diplomats said EC environment ministers meeting here agreed member states would have to reduce by 20 pct over the next few years the emission of nitrogen oxide, widely seen as the main source of acid rain endangering forests and lakes.     The reduction would be compulsory for heavy vehicles, with tougher standards imposed for new models from April 1988 and for all new vehicles from October 1990.     The EC\'s executive Commission says the emission level of nitrogen oxide was expected to drop to 2.4 mln tonnes a year from three mln tonnes within the 12-nation Community if all heavy vehicles met the new standards.     There are an estimated nine mln trucks and buses in use in the EC, according to Commission figures.     The ministers also gave West Germany a go-ahead to move towards a ban on the sale of leaded regular petrol, after Bonn requested permission to do so to encourage the use of low-pollution cars, diplomats said.  \n',gas
'The EC Executive Commission has backed a plan to allow member countries to ban regular leaded gasoline in a move designed to encourage use of unleaded fuel.     It said in a statement it backed a proposal to allow EC states to ban sales of regular grade gasoline containing lead at six months notice. The proposal, which needs approval by EC ministers, would not force any member state to impose the ban. \"It\'s an option, not an obligation,\" a spokesman said.     But the Commission said imposing the ban would encourage the use of unleaded fuel, as well as making it easier for gas stations by cutting the number of types of gasoline they had to stock.  \n',gas
'The Federal Trade Commission said its staff has urged the governor of Georgia to veto a bill that would prohibit petroleum refiners from owning and operating retail gasoline stations.     The proposed legislation is aimed at preventing large oil refiners and marketers from using predatory or monopolistic practices against franchised dealers.     But the FTC said fears of refiner-owned stations as part of a scheme of predatory or monopolistic practices are unfounded. It called the bill anticompetitive and warned that it would force higher gasoline prices for Georgia motorists.  \n',gas
'A new grade of unleaded gasoline now being test marketed will increase refining costs when refiners can least afford it, according to officials attending the National Petroleum Refiners Association conference here.     The new grade of unleaded gasoline has an octane level of 89 compared with over 90 for super unleaded and 87 for regular unleaded gasoline.      Amoco Corp AN has test-marketed the new mid-grade gasoline and hopes to sell it on a regular basis in the South, East and Midwest by the beginning of June, according to Paul Collier, executive vice president of marketing.     Phillips Petroleum P expects to begin marketing the new 89 octane unleaded gasoline in May, sources said.     Converting current refinery operations to produce the 89 octane unleaded gsoline could cost hundreds of millions of dollars per refinery but that depends on the present capacity and intensity of the refinery, said Amoco\'s Collier.     But not all oil company\'s welcome the introduction of another grade of unleaded gasoline.     \"Three grades are not warranted,\" said Henry Rosenberg, chairman of Crown Central Petroleum CNP. \"Refiners will have to upgrade again,\" he added.     \"An investment will have to be made,\" said Archie Dunham, executive vice president of petroleum products at Conoco, an operating subsidiary of DuPont Corp DD in order to upgrade refinery operations.  \n',gas
'U.S. oil demand as measured by products supplied rose 1.9 pct in the four weeks ended March six to 16.39 mln barrels per day from 16.08 mln in the same period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.     In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy Department agency said distillate demand was down 2.2 pct in the period to 3.33 mln bpd from 3.40 mln a year earlier.     Gasoline demand averaged 6.75 mln bpd, up 3.3 pct from 6.53 mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.40 mln bpd, off 2.7 pct from 1.43 mln, the EIA said.     Domestic crude oil production was estimated at 8.38 mln bpd, down 8.5 pct from 9.15 mln a year ago, and gross daily crude imports (excluding those for the SPR) averaged 3.67 mln bpd, up 23 pct from 2.97 mln, the EIA said.     Refinery crude runs in the four weeks were 12.05 mln bpd, up 1.5 pct from 11.87 mln a year earlier, it said.     Year-to-date figures will not become available until March 26 when EIA\'s Petroleum Supply Monthly data for January 1987 becomes available, the agency said.  \n',gas
'Spain\'s state refiner Empresa Nacional de Petroleo S.A. (EMP) plans to build its second unit for production of methyl tertiary butyl ether (MTBE), a gasoline additive replacing lead, company sources said.     The Coruna-based plant, with an annual capacity of 27,000 tonnes, and a 55,000-tonnes-per-year facility that EMP will start up in Tarragona next year, will make the state refiner Spain\'s biggest producer of MTBE.     Petroleos del Norte S.A. (Petronor) runs a 45,000 tonne a year plant in Bilbao and Cia Espanola de Petroleos S.A. (Cepsa) plans to put a similar unit onstream next year in Algeciras.  \n',gas
'Energy Secretary John Herrington said he would rule out a tax on gasoline as one option to help avert what his departmet has called the threat of increased reliance on foreign oil in the coming years.     He said at a news conference that any recommendation he would make would have to increase domestic production, not cause widespread economic hardship and have a minimal cost to the U.S. taxpayer.     On the grounds of increasing production, he said, \"I would rule out a gasoline tax.\"     Herrington also repeated he would rule out an oil import fee because of the widespread dislocation it would cause -- the loss of about 400,000 jobs nationwide due to higher oil prices and a drop in the gross national product by about 32 billion dlrs.     He said an increased depletion allowance, to 27.5 pct, on new and enhanced production of oil and natural gas would be a cheap way to spur domestic production.     He estimated this cost at about 200 mln dlrs a year.     Herrington proposed the increased depletion allowance to the White House Tuesday but the White House reaction was cool.     The White House said it would study the proposal, but was generally oppposed to altering the national tax code, just passed last year.     Herrington, asked his reaction to the White House reaction, said, \"If I were the White House, I would be cool, too.\"  \n',gas
'House Speaker Jim Wright said a gasoline tax is one option to finding a way to reduce the deficit, but told reporters in response to a question he will not try to dictate a solution to the debt problem.     Wright has made suggestions for raising taxes about 20 billion dlrs as part of a budget plan to reduce the deficit. Tax proposals are being given consideration by members of the House Budget Committee, but the details of any tax increase would be made by the tax writing House ways and Means Committee.  \n',gas
'LASMO Exploration (Canada) Ltd, a subsidiary of London &amp; Scottish Marine Oil Plc LSML.L, is merging with Onyx Petroleum Exploration Co Ltd, LASMO said.     The merger is to be made by Onyx buying LASMO Exploration, in a share swap. A new company, LASMO Canada Inc, will be formed. LASMO will control 70 pct of the equity, worth some 76 mln Canadian dlrs based on the current Onyx share price.     The new company will have proven reserves of 9.5 mln barrels of oil and 20.9 billion cubic feet of gas, LASMO said.  \n',acq
'Minnesota Governor Rudy Perpich is considering calling a special legislative session to consider amendments to the state\'s anti-takeover statute, according to the governor\'s office.     A spokesman for the governor said nothing will be decided today, but said the governor will evaluate later whether to call a special session in the next few days.    The governor\'s office said the possible action was triggered by a proposal by Dayton-Hudson Corp DH, which has been the subject of takeover rumors. A spokesman for the governor said the company proposed several amendments to Perpich designed to make any takeover attempt in the state more difficult.             Dayton-Hudson suggested amendments be passed and instituted by next Friday, the spokesperson said.     Press reports in Minneapolis newspapers this morning quoted several legislators as saying they were inclined to support legislation that would help Dayton-Hudson, according to a governor\'s spokesperson.    Senate Majority Leader Roger Moe was quoted as saying he would be inclined to support any action that would help the company, the spokesperson said.    Robert Vanasek, the House speaker designate, was quoted in the Minneapolis Star and Tribune as saying, \"We are taking their (Dayton-Hudson) concerns very seriously and we are going to do what we can to help.\"  \n',acq
'A 3.22 billion dlr offer for Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP.MO by TransCanada Pipelines Ltd TRP.TO may short-circuit Dome\'s restructuring plan and open the door for more takeover bids, oil analysts said.     Dome is trying to get approval for a plan to refinance debt of more than 4.5 billion dlrs by July 1, 1987, when an interim debt plan that allowed the Canadian oil and gas firm to defer substantial payments to creditors will expire.     Analysts said TransCanada\'s bid signals Dome\'s debtholders that an alternative exists to Dome\'s debt plan.     Dome announced its plan to 56 major creditors as well as public noteholders in March after several months of delicate negotiations.     TransCanada\'s proposal \"amounts to a quasi debt restructuring,\" oil analyst Doug Gowland of Brown Baldwin Nisker Ltd said from Toronto.     Calgary-based Dome\'s restructuring plan would allow creditors to convert debt to common shares under a formula yet to be negotiated. Payments on remaining debt would be linked to cash flow generated by assets pledged against the debt.     \"The weakness of the whole debt-refinancing proposal is that even with approval of creditors, there is no assurance that Dome will in fact be able to repay all of its debt obligations,\" said Wilf Gobert, an oil analyst for Peters and Co Ltd in Calgary.     TransCanada\'s announcement came as a surprise since Dome was waiting for responses from creditors on its proposed refinancing packages, Gobert said.     The TransCanada proposal could open the bidding for Dome since other potential buyers were probably waiting for lenders to agree to a restructuring, he added.     \"I would think that the debtholders would want to entertain any and all offers (for Dome),\" Gobert said.     Dome spokesman David Annesley said in New York that TransCanada\'s announcement could be seen as an attempt to fix the bidding price for Dome and an effort to preclude other possible buyers from making an offer. \"By drawing attention to us in our discussions, it means that others may be a little reluctant to come forward,\" he said.     Dome does not consider TransCanada\'s proposal a formal offer because the pipeline utility\'s announcement breached a confidential agreement between the two companies, he said.     Dome responded to the statement by suspending discussions with TransCanada in order to pursue talks with other unidentified parties. However, Dome said its management and financial advisers would evaluate all proposals, including TransCanada\'s.     Gowland said TransCanada\'s offer is probably a fair price for the company\'s 36.1 mln acres of oil and gas land holdings.     However, he said not enough financial details are known about Dome\'s debt restructuring to compare the value of TransCanada\'s proposed offer.  \n',acq
'Sweden\'s Sandvik AB SVIK.ST and Diamant Boart SA of Belgium, in which Societe Generale de Belgique BELB.BR holds an indirect 52 pct stake, have finalised negotiations on merging oil and gas drilling tool activities, officials of both companies said.     Staffan Paues, President of the new Brussels-based joint venture company Diamant Boart Stratabit SA (DBS), told a news conference that the merged firm would be able to offer products for all types of drilling operations.     He said there were already signs that a slow recovery from recession was under way in the oil and gas industries.     \"Stability in oil prices should lead to renewed investment\" Paues said.     DBS, which Paues said began operations today, brings together Sandvik\'s wholly-owned U.S. Subsidiary Strata Bit Corp of Houston and Diamant Boart\'s petroleum activities in Europe, North America, the Middle and Far East and Africa.     Paues said the merger was a direct result of the sharp fall in oil prices 18 months ago which led oil firms to cut back exploration activities. Officials said the complementary character of the two firms\' operations was a further reason.  \n',acq
'Standard Oil Co SRD said in a brief announcement issued after a meeting of its board of directors that British Petroleum Co PLC BP.L (BP) has extended its 70 dlr per share tender offer until midnight May 4.     The offer for the 45 pct of Standard shares not owned by BP had been due to expire midnight April 28.     Standard Oil said discussions with BP concerning the tender were continuing but provided no further details.     \"So long as those discussions continue, no recommendation will be made to Standard Oil shareholders regarding the offer,\" Standard said.     Standard directors met at the company\'s Cleveland headquarters on Thursday in a regularly scheduled meeting. The spokesman was unable to say if the meeting would continue on Friday.     A committee of independent directors previously obtained an opinion from First Boston Corp that the Standard shares were worth 85 dlrs each, 15 dlrs more than the BP offer.  \n',acq
'A senior Abu Dhabi oil official said in remarks published today the emirate, largest producer in the United Arab Emirates (UAE), was succeeding in marketing its crude oil without breaching OPEC accords.     Khalaf al-Oteiba, Marketing Director at the Abu Dhabi National Oil Co (ADNOC), told the company\'s Petroleum Community magazine ADNOC was also keen to keep good customer relations. \"The company will maintain its dialogue with and care for its customers in accordance with market conditions...And take necessary steps to guarantee marketing its production,\" he said.    \"The present oil marketing policy of ADNOC is based on adherence to OPEC decisions of December 1986 to control production and establish a new pricing system in an attempt to stabilize the market,\" he added.     OPEC agreed last December to limit production to 15.8 mln bpd and return to fixed prices averaging 18 dlrs a barrel.     Oteiba said stabilization of the oil market in the future depended on how much discipline OPEC showed.     Oteiba said last year, when world oil prices dropped, was ADNOC\'s most difficult ever but \"a practical and flexible pricing policy was implemented to relate to the changed market environment.\"     He said crude oil sales last year jumped to an average 609,000 bpd of which 73 pct was exported. Refined product sales totalled eight mln metric tonnes, of which 67 pct was exported.     In 1985, ADNOC marketed a total of 476,000 bpd of crude oil and 7.2 mln tonnes of refined products.  \n',crude
'Ample supplies of OPEC crude weighing on world markets helped limit and then reverse oil price gains that followed the U.S. Strike on an Iranian oil platform in the Gulf earlier on Monday, analysts said.     December loading rose to 19.65 dlrs, up 45 cents before falling to around 19.05/15 later, unchanged from last Friday.     \"Fundamentals are awful,\" said Philip Lambert, analyst with stockbrokers Kleinwort Grieveson, adding that total OPEC production in the first week of October could be above 18.5 mln bpd, little changed from September levels.     Peter Nicol, analyst at Chase Manhattan Bank, said OPEC production could be about 18.5-19.0 mln in October. and International Energy Agency (IEA) estimates put OPEC September production at 18.5 mln bpd.     The U.S. Attack was in retaliation of last Friday\'s hit of a Kuwaiti oil products tanker flying the U.S. Flag, the Sea Isle City. It was struck by a missile, believed to be Iranian, in Kuwaiti waters, and was the first hit on a U.S. Flag commercial vessel in the seven year Iran/Iraq war.     The U.S. Owned Liberian flag tanker Sungari was hit in the area on Thursday, also believed struck by an Iranian missile.     Refiners were not significant purchasers of physical oil on Monday as a result increased Gulf tension following the U.S. Attack, analysts said.     They said a closure of the Strait of Hormuz, through which around eight mln bpd passes, isnlikely because it is not in the interests of the U.S. Or Iran, they said.     Any threat to oil supplies would stem from an increase in the number of tanker attacks as part of a widening of Gulf hostilities, analysts said.     But they saw the U.S. Strike as a limited reply to Iranian missile attacks, with some describing it as responsible.     Geoffrey Pyne, analyst at stockbrokers Phillips and Drew, said he was impressed by the sensible U.S. Response.     \"The U.S. Has thought carefully about what would correspond to Iranian agression. They have proved to the Iranians that any further action will be met with a like-for-like response. Today\'s action by the U.S. Was not escalatory,\" Pyne said.     Kleinwort Grieveson\'s Lambert said the U.S. Strike was \"a responsible retaliation,\" with the U.S. Apparently indicating to Iran that it could increase the severity of its attacksf Iran chose to raise the level of conflict.     Chase Manhattan\'s Nicol took a different view, however.     He said he was unable to see what the U.S. Had achieved as Arab states such as Kuwait and Saudi Arabia, whose interests the U.S. Is supposedly defending, will feel less secure as a result of the U.S. Attack and fear some sort of Iranian retaliation.     The initial upward market move this morning reflected a strong speculative reaction to rumours of a U.S. Attack which was thought at one stage to have been against Iranian missile launchers on the Faw Peninsula, close to Kuwait, analysts said.     The later downtrend followed confirmation of a U.S. Navy attack on an Iranian oil platform by the U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinburger.     Market operators were able to evaluate the situation in the Gulf on the basis of confirmed fact, and finding it less serious than first thought, took profits, taking prices lower, analysts and traders said.  \n',crude
'Aramco Corp has accepted Japanese nominations to lift a higher proportion of Arab Heavy crude oil under term contracts in July, oil industry sources said.     Japanese companies requested a ratio of 80 pct Arab Heavy to 20 pct Arab Light under a term contract agreement with Aramco for 100,000 barrels per day, the sources said. The contractual ratio is 30 pct heavy crude to 70 pct light.     Japanese demand for heavy crude oil has increased substantially since the All Japan Seaman\'s Union ceased sailing into the northern Mideast gulf last month, causing problems with liftings of heavy Kuwait and Khafji crudes.  \n',crude
'Artillery shells from an exchange of fire between Iran and Iraq fell on Kuwait\'s northern border on Tuesday but caused no casualties, the Kuwait News Agency KUNA said, quoting a Defense Ministry official.     There were rumors in world oil markets on Tuesday that Iran had fired shells at an oil camp in northern Kuwait in retaliation for U.S. Attacks on Iranian oil platforms in the Gulf on Monday. \"Several shells fell in a random manner on the northern border of the country,\" the official told KUNA. \"It seems these shells arose from an exchange of fire between Iran and Iraq... No one was wounded and there were no losses.\"     Diplomats said shells from the nearby Iran-Iraq warfront had in the past fallen in the northern Kuwaiti desert.     A senior Kuwait Petroleum Corporation official had earlier tolds he was unaware of any attack against Kuwaiti oil installations.  \n',crude
'Australian crude oil and condensate output fell 7.6 pct to 23,480 megalitres, or about 147 mln barrels, in the first nine months of fiscal 1986/87 ending June 30, the Department of Resources and Energy said.     The decline in production in the nine months to end-March reflected mainly a sharp dip early in the fiscal year, when low oil prices and high marginal excise rates led to a reduction of output from Bass Strait, department figures in its Major Energy Statistics publication show.     A megalitre is 6,290 barrels.  \n',crude
'British Foreign Secretary Sir Geoffrey Howe backed the United States\' attack on an Iranian oil platform on Monday and said it should not worsen the Gulf crisis.     \"The United States is fully entitled to take military action in exercise of rights of self-defense, in the face of the imminent threat of further attacks,\" Howe said in a statement issued in London.     The United States said its forces destroyed the platform on Monday in retaliation for an Iranian missile attack on a U.S.- flagged Kuwaiti ship last Friday.     Referring to that attack, Howe added, \"I trust the Iranians will fully understand that continued attacks of this kind will only enhance justification for firm action in self-defense.\"     At a press conferenced in Luxembourg during a meeting of European Community (EC) ministers, Howe was asked about statements from a senior Iranian official who said America was now involved in a full-scale war.     \"It would be profoundly undesirable and quite unjustified for Iran to react in that way,\" he said.  \n',crude
'A North Sea oil find announced by Chevron Corp\'s CHV Chevron Exploration North Sea Ltd may indicate a new field with recoverable crude oil reserves of 300 mln barrels, industry analysts said.     Chevron said a sidetrack well on block 16/26 on the U.K. Continental shelf tested 9,000 barrels per day (bpd) of 20 API crude oil from the tertiary \"Alba\" sand through a three-inch surface choke.     \"The estimated amount of oil at the Alba field is around 320 mln barrels,\" Paul Spedding of stockbroker Kleinwort Grieveson and Co tolds.     He said industry estimates put the total reserves at the field at over one billion barrels, but given the low gravity of oil, the recovery rate would be expected to be around 20-25 pct.     Analysts said the results were encouraging, but the potential difficulty of operating and recovering oil in the field was shown by the fact that the first well had to be plugged and a sidetrack drilled.     \"The field seems to be shallow and widespread, which will require a multi-platform development in recovery, pushing costs up,\" Christopher Osborne of stockbroker Hoare Govett said.     Most analysts said that although the low gravity of the oil found would require additional costs in recovery, the test well showed that it flows well.     \"Although the gravity of oil at the field seems to be low, it seems to flow quite well and around 300 mln barrels could be recovered,\" Carol Bell of Phillips and Drew tolds.     However, Chevron officials declined to comment on the analysts\' reserve estimates. They said that without further research and drilling in the area this summer, they would not disclose any reserve figures.     Analysts said that if the field were declared commercial and developed, there would be a ready local market for the heavy crude it produced.     \"Most refineries are now upgraded to refine heavy oils and the price differentials between heavy and light crudes are a lot narrower today,\" Osborne said.     Chevron operates the block on behalf of 16 companies which include British Petroleum Development Ltd, DSM Hydrocarbons (UK) Ltd, Enterprise Oil (TNS) Ltd, Marathon Int. Pet. (GB) Ltd and Phillips Petroleum Co U.K. Ltd.  \n',crude
'A Colombian group announced the suspension of its bombings of oil pipelines pending the government\'s levy of a social tax on foreign petroleum companies and an 800 mln dlrs fine on the Occidental Petroleum Corp OXY.     There was no indication the government would meet the conditions demanded by the leftist National Liberation Army (ELN).     According to the state oil firm, ECOPETROL, the ELN carried out 72 attacks on petroleum pipelines between 1984 and 1986.     The assaults, the most recent launched two months ago, have caused an estimated total of 50 mln dlrs in damage.     In a communique, the ELN said it would demand a tax of one dollar per barrel of crude oil pumped by foreign firms as a condition for maintaining its suspension of the assaults.     Foreign oil firms pump an average of 225,083 barrels per day in Colombia. Colombian tax authorities are investigating Occidental, a U.S.-owned firm, for alleged tax evasion.     If the charges are proven, the firm could face a fine of up to 800 mln dlrs. The ELN demands the government charge the penalty.  \n',crude
'Norway is expected to seek a compromise solution to defuse a row between Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap A/S STAT.OL (Statoil) and Conoco Norge A/S over which firm will operate the Heidrun oil field, government sources said.     The sources, who asked not to be named, said the government will likely recommend that Conoco be allowed to continue as the field\'s operator through the development phase, with Statoil taking over only after production starts in the early 1990s.     Oil Minister Arne Oeien tolds the government had today discused the Heidrun matter but that no final decision had been taken and several questions remained unresolved.     It was unlikely the government would announce its decision on Heidrun operatorship until after Thursday\'s cabinet meeting and after discussing a proposed solution with both companies, the sources added.     This spring Norway\'s state-owned oil company Statoil exercised an option in the Heidrun field exploration license that, if approved by the government, would allow it to relieve Conoco as Heidrun operator, a move sharply criticised by Conoco.     Heidrun is often cited by the government and industry as the most likely candidate for the first field development project on the Haltenbanken exploration tract off central Norway.  \n',crude
'Rep. Mike Synar said today that while President Reagan is ready to use military force to protect Kuwait tankers in the Gulf, the United States is ill-prepared at home to deal with a new energy crisis.     Synar, Democrat of Oklahoma, made his remarks in comments on a study by the General Accounting Office (GAO) on the U.S. participation in the 1985 test of the emergency oil sharing program of the International Energy Agency.     The IEA, an alliance of 21 oil consuming countries, was formed after the 1973-74 Arab oil embargo to find ways to deal with any future oil cutoff.     Synar said, \"the president is prepared to take military action to protect Kuwaiti oil tankers but has been unwilling to take less dangerous, equally-important action to prepare our nation for the next energy crisis.\"     Reagan said the U.S. military would protect Kuwaiti oilers to assure the West of a continuing supply of Middle East oil, increasingly being threatened by the Iranian-Iraqi war. Synar, who asked for the GAO report after criticism of U.S. action in a previous IEA test, said the United States successfully advocated a test limited to training participants in oil sharing procedures and the system\'s mechanical aspects.  \n',crude
'Crude oil netback values in complex refineries rose sharply in Europe and firmed in the U.S. last Friday from the previous week but fell sharply in Singapore, according to calculations bys Pipeline.     The firmer tone to refining margins in Europe and the U.S. relected higher prices for petroleum products, particularly gasoline, and support from crude oil prices.     Netback values for crude oil refined in Northern Europe rose substantially following strong gains in gasoline prices there. Brent is valued at 19.45 dlrs, up 56 cts a barrel or three pct from the previous week.     In the U.S. Gulf, sweet crudes rose in value by 14 cts to 19.33 dlrs for West Texas Intermediate, up about 0.7 pct.     Sour grades in the U.S. Gulf showed an increase of 33 cts a barrel for Alaska North Slope, up 1.7 pct.     But netbacks for crude oil refined in Singapore fell sharply, down 15 cts to as much as 68 cts a barrel as ample distillate supplies weighed on petroleum product prices.     Attaka in Singapore is valued at 18.55 dlrs, a decline of 68 cts a barrel or 3.5 pct from the previous week.     For refineries in the Mediterranean, netback values were mostly lower, with declines of seven to 14 cts. The value of Kuwait crude fell 14 cts to 18.37 dlrs, while Iranian Light fell 11 cts to 19.14 dlrs.     On the U.S. West Coast, netback values for ANS CIF L.A. also jumped sharply, up 40 cts a barrel or 2.2 pct to 18.82 dlrs on higher gasoline prices.  \n',crude
'A U.S. attack on an Iranian oil platform in the Gulf on Monday appeared to be a tit-for-tat raid carefully orchestrated not to be too provocative or upset Arab allies, Western diplomats in the region said.     U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger said Monday that U.S. Warships destroyed the oil platform in the southern Gulf in response to a missile strike on the American-registered Kuwaiti tanker Sea Isle City in Kuwaiti waters on Friday.     \"We consider the matter closed,\" he said, a signal the U.S. administration did not want the Gulf crisis to escalate.     Iran had warned the United States earlier in the day against exacerbating the Gulf crisis, saying military action would endanger American interests.     Following the raid, a okesman for Tehran\'s War Information Headquarters vowed to avenge the attack with a \"crushing blow.\"     \"The United States has entered a swamp from which it can in no way get out safely,\" Tehran Radio quoted him as saying.     Diplomats noted, however, Iran was also seeking to avoid ostracism by Arab states due to meet at a summit in Amman on November 8 and discuss the Iran-Iraq war.     Iranian Prime Minister Mir-Hossein Mousavi is currently in Damascus, and diplomats said he would seek Syrian help in preventing a total Arab breach with Tehran.     Further escalation of the war threatening the Gulf Arab states could work against Tehran at the Amman gathering, they said.     \"The ball is in Iran\'s court now. It\'s up to Tehran to respond one way or the other,\" a diplomat said.     President Ronald Reagan warned Iran of stronger American countermeasures if the military escalation continued.     Western diplomats and military sources in the area said shelling the platform appeared to be the least provocative act the United States could have taken once it had decided to retaliate for the tanker attack, blamed by both the Americans and Kuwaitis on Iran.     \"It\'s interesting that they chose something in international waters because it doesn\'t implicate any other nation,\" one diplomat said. \"This was better for U.S. Relations with the Gulf Arab states, particularly Kuwait.\"     Commented another diplomat: \"Kuwait must be happy that the U.S. Has done something, but relieved that Faw was not attacked on its doorstep.\"     One source said of the attack on the oil platform: \"They managed to warn off the crew and hit something that was the least nuisance to everybody.\"     A diplomat commented: \"They were very clever in the place they chose. It gets attention, but it hasn\'t devastated anything because it wasn\'t working in the first place.\"     A senior Arab banker in the area said after the news broke: \"This was a good, measured response without risking a flare-up ... It is a face-saving response (for the Americans).\"  \n',crude
'The Energy Department said it reached proposed oil pricing settlements totaling 680,150 dlrs with the operator and four working interest owners of A.D. LeBlanc No. 1 well, Vermillion Parish, La.     Trigon Exploration Co., Inc operated the well from June 1979 to January 1981 for D. Bryan Ferguson, C. William Rogers, Omni Drilling Partnership No 1978-2 and Entex Inc.     DOE alleged Trigon caused overcharges of 624,208 dlrs by improperly classifying its oil as \"newly discovered crude,\" a classification that allowed charging higher prices during a period of price controls.     It said the proposed settlements would resolve disputes over possible violations by the five parties. DOE added that in agreeing to the settlements, the five did not admit any violations or non-compliance with its regulations.     It said it would receive written comments on the settlements before making it final.  \n',crude
'Conoco Inc, a subsidiary of duPont deNemours DD, said it raised the contract price it will pay for all grades of crude oil 50 cts a barrel, effective yesterday.     The increase brings Conoco\'s posted price for West Texas Intermediate to 19.00 dlrs a barrel. The West Texas Sour grade, at 34 API, now stands at 18.10 dlrs a barrel. Light Louisiana was also raised 50 cts to 19.35 dlrs barrel.     Conoco last changed its crude postings on May 21.  \n',crude
'The European Community (EC) should watch very carefully for any developments in the Gulf War and their consequences on the oil market, EC Energy Commissioner Nicolas Mosar said today.     Speaking two weeks after a U.S. warship was attacked in the Gulf, Mosar warned, \"An escalation in the Gulf would increase tensions in the oil market.\"     \"But I do not want to be alarmist,\" he told a news conference after an EC energy ministers meeting in Luxembourg.     He said the volume of EC oil imports from the Gulf had declined to around 31 pct of total oil imports in the first three months of 1987 against 35 pct in the same period last year. \"There are also other potential sources of supplies in the world,\" he added.     The issue of Gulf oil imports was not discussed at the ministers\' meeting, he added.     A EC committee of national experts in the so-called oil supply group would discuss Gulf oil supplies at their bi-annual meeting on June 19, he said.     But any major decisions would have to be reserved for EC foreign ministers, diplomats said.     West European nations have so far shown little enthusiasm for backing a U.S. plan to give military protection to merchant ships in the Gulf which could help insure the safety of oil supplies.  \n',crude
'Ecuador is due to resume limited crude oil output on May 8 when a new 43 km pipeline to neighbouring Colombia should be finished, an energy ministry spokesman said.     Oil output was halted on March 5 by an earthquake which damaged 50 km of the main pipeline linking jungle oilfields at Lago Agrio to the Ecuadorean port of Balao on the Pacific.     About 13 km of the new link, capable of carrying some 50,000 barrels per day (bpd), has been built, he said.     Ecuador pumped 245,000 to 250,000 bpd before the earthquake.     The new link will connect Lago Agrio to Puerto Colon in Colombia, the starting point of Columbia\'s pipeline to the Pacific ocean port of Temuco.     The government estimates it will take about four more months to repair the Lago Agrio to Balao pipeline and return output to normal levels, the spokesman said.  \n',crude
'Ecuador will resume limited crude output next week to fill up storage tanks as a first step to pump oil to a Colombian pipeline on May one, the state Ecuadorean Petroleum Corp (CEPE) said.     CEPE manager Carlos Romoleroux told reporters that Ecuador would begin pumping an unspecified amount of crude in northeastern jungle oilfields at the end of next week in preparation to send the oil through a new pipeline link-up to neighbouring Colombia.     Oil production in Ecuador was halted on March five when an earthquake damaged the country\'s main pipeline from Lago Agrio, at the heart of the Ecuadorean jungle oilfields, to the pacific port of Balao.     It will take at least until the end of July to repair the pipeline and return output to normal levels. The country was pumping between 245,000 bpd and 250,000 bpd before the tremor.     To resume limited output in the meantime, Ecuador is constructing a 26 mile pipeline linkup, capable of carrying 55,000 bpd, from Lago Agrio to Puerto Colon, the starting point of Colombia\'s pipeline to the Pacific port of Tumaco.     The original target date to resume limited crude output was May eight, the scheduled date for the inauguration of the Lago Agrio to Puerto Colon pipeline, an energy ministry spokesman said.  \n',crude
'Ecuador will produce crude oil in excess of its 221,000-bpd OPEC quota during the second half of this year, Energy Minister Fernando Santos Alvite told a news conference.     Ecuador plans to produce 280,000 bpd in August, rising to 320,000 bpd next January, the minister said.     \"We will be producing more than the quota to pay off the crude and products we have been lent by Venezuela, Nigeria and Kuwait and to compensate for the crude we have been unable to produce during the past few months,\" he said.     Earthquake damage to a pipeline sharply cut Ecuadorean production from March to May this year.     Santos said the move had been explained to fellow OPEC members during last week\'s meeting in Vienna, when an increase in Ecuador\'s quota to 221,000 bpd from 210,000 was approved.     \"They understood our position and we believe we remain within the spirit of the (quota) agreement,\" he said.     Immediately before the March quake Ecuadorean production was 250,000-260,000 bpd, with 144,000 bpd exported.     While its production was down, Venezuela, Nigeria and Kuwait loaned Ecuador a total 12 mln barrels of crude and four mln barrels of products, Santos said.  \n',crude
'Ecuador will use a new pipeline link with Colombia to export crude oil for the next five years, Colombian mines and energy minister Guillermo Perry said.     The link will be inaugurated on May 8. It was built to allow Ecuador to resume exports of crude oil halted on March 5 by earthquake damage to its Lago Agrio to Balao pipeline,     Once that pipeline is repaired, Ecuador will exceed its OPEC quota in order to offset lost income and pay debts contracted with Venezuela and Nigeria since the quake, Ecuador mines and energy minister Javier Espinosa said.     The two ministers were speaking at a news conference after signing an agreement for joint oil exploration and exploitation of the jungle border zone between the two nations. Drilling will begin in September.     \"The agreement to transport Ecuadorean crude oil is not only for this emergency period but for the next five years, with possibility of an extension. Between 20,000 and 50,000 barrels per day (bpd) will be pumped along it,\" Perry said.     Espinosa said Ecuador planned to pump 35 mln barrels through the link in the next five years, at a cost of 75 cents per barrel during the first year.     The 43-km link, with a maximum capacity of 50,000 bpd, will run from Lago Agrio, the centre of of Ecuador\'s jungle oilfields, to an existing Colombian pipeline that runs to the Pacific port of Tumaco.     Espinosa said the 32-km stretch of the link built on the Ecuadorean side cost 10.5 mln dlrs. Perry gave no figures for Colombia\'s 11 km segment but said it was \"insignificant compared with what we are going to earn.\"     OPEC member Ecuador was pumping around 250,000 bpd before the quake. Lost exports of 185,000 bpd are costing it 90 mln dlrs per month, Espinosa said.  \n',crude
'Energy Secretary Donald Hodel said he expects oil prices to rise significantly by the year 2000, probably to around 33 dlrs a barrel in current dollars.     \"I do anticipate a significant increase (by 2000). Thirty-three dlrs a barrel is not unreasonable,\" Hodel told the Senate Energy Committee.     Hodel said the loss of some domestic oil production through the shutdown of stripper (10 barrels a day or less) wells because of low prices was probably permanent. He said he was also concerned by the decline in domestic oil exploration.     Hodel urged Congress to approve oil exploration in section 1002 of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge in Alaska. He said geologic condtions in the area were favorable for the discovery of oil fields equal to those in nearby Prudhoe Bay.     \"The area could contain potentially recoverable oil resources of more than 9.2 billion barrels, an amount nearly equal to the Prudhoe Bay oil field, which currently provides almost one-fifth of U.S. domestic production,\" Hodel said.     He said production from the new section could begin about the time Prudhoe Bay production begins to decline in 2000 without endangering caribou or other wildlife in the area.  \n',crude
'Following are extracts from the communique issued at the conclusion of the OPEC conference here.     \"The conference expressed satisfaction about the positive results of the agreement signed in December, 1986, by which OPEC re-established the system of fixed price at a level of 18 dlrs per barrel supported by OPEC production ceilings distributed into national production levels.     \"The conference noted that all market indicators, including spot prices in the market and netback values of all OPEC crudes, have been firming up significantly, thus consolidating the OPEC price structure as defined by the agreement.\"     \"The conference examined the supply/demand outlook for the second half of the year and decided that in order to secure continued firm prices in the market, OPEC production during the fourth quarter of 1987 will be equal to that of the third quarter, I.E. 16.6 mln barrels per day (bpd), distributed into the same national production levels as were defined by the above-mentioned agreement for that quarter.\"     \"Furthermore, the conference decided to establish a committee of five heads of delegation to monitor the price evolution in the market in relation to the OPEC official prices in order to secure price stability around the opec price structure.     \"Should there be any significant change in market prices, the committee would immediately call for an extraordinary meeting of the conference with a view to deciding on the necessary OPEC production levels during the second half of the year, which would secure the desired market stability.\"     \"The conference reiterated the necessity of member countries\' strict adherence to the agreement signed in December 1986, both in terms of official price, and national production, levels.     \"For this purpose, the conference decided to establish a committee of three heads of delegation to undertake visits to member countries in order to motivate them to comply with the terms of the agreement.\"      \"Moreover, the conference stressed the necessity of the cooperation of the oil-producing exporting countries outside OPEC as an essential prerequisite for a lasting market stability.     The conference, therefore, decided to reinstate the group of five heads of delegation established by the 77th (extraordinary) meeting of the conference in April, 1986 to undertake the necessary contacts with those countries.     \"The conference observed the continued fall in the value of the U.S. Dollar and agreed that the matter should be studied and reported to the next meeting of the conference.\"      \"The conference discussed the appointment of the secretary general and decided to discuss the matter again in its next ordinary meeting.     \"The conference extended the term of office of Fadhil al-Chalabi as deputy secretary general for a period of one year from October 7, 1987.     \"The next ordinary meeting of the conference will be convened in Vienna on December 9, 1987.\"   \n',crude
'OPEC\'s agreement to limit output to 16.6 mln barrels per day (bpd) for the rest of the year should boost spot prices and enable the group to raise its official reference price to 20 dlrs a barrel in January from the current 18 dlrs, Far East oil industry sources said.     \"Fundamentally, the market situation is bullish and the official price will be 20 dlrs in January,\" a Japanese refiner said.     The sources said that in spite of over-production by OPEC members such as Iraq, the United Arab Emirates, Kuwait and Qatar, demand should exceed supply by the fourth quarter.     Spot oil prices surged on Friday in late U.S. Trading as the market anticipated an OPEC agreement on second-half 1987 output. In early Tokyo trade, levels were firm at 17.30 dlrs for Mideast Dubai cargoes loading next month and 19.00 dlrs for U.K. Brent, traders said.     They said they expect more foreign crudes to be sucked into the U.S. Market as the benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate (WTI) trades at around 20.30 dlrs.     \"With WTI at 20, 21 or 22 dlrs, U.S. Refiners will import Mideast and Far East crudes and this will strengthen those grades further,\" said a Japanese oil trader.     Some Tokyo traders were cautious about whether thU spot market has further upward potential in the short term, having risen strongly on the OPEC news on Friday.     \"You could certainly argue that if New York rose on that basis, there\'s no reason for prices to go up again today,\" said one international oil trader in Tokyo.     \"But I think if there\'s any sign of a dip, it will be bought back up again pretty quickly,\" he added.     One oil industry analyst concurred, \"There is no reason to expect a weak market from now on.\" He said he expected OPEC to raise prices to 20 dlrs when it meets on December 9.     Oil sources said spot prices are unlikely to surge strongly in the next few months due to cheating by some OPEC members and the likelihood that Saudi Arabia will act as swing producer to maintain steady prices.     Iraq is currently producing around two mln barrels per day compared to its second-half quota of 1.54 mln, they said. Its export capability will rise to 2.5 mln bpd when a new pipeline through Turkey, comes onstream in or around September.     Qatar is said to be achieving sales of around 350,000 bpd, against its OPEC-assigned quota of 299,000, by discounting up to 20 cents a barrel from official prices, the sources said.     Iran, the United Arab Emirates and Kuwait are also cheating on the OPEC agreement with over-production and effective price discounts through counter-purchases, industry sources said. But they mostly agreed that Saudi Arabia will unofficially act as swing producer, cutting production to compensate for higher output by other members or boosting output if spot prices rise too high too fast.     Saudi Arabia has a floating oil stockpile of 40 to 50 mln barrels. \"Saudi Arabia wants oil price stability so the stockpile may be utilized to cool down the market if it rises too much,\" an oil industry analyst said.  \n',crude
'France voiced its comprehension for a U.S. Attack on an Iranian target while calling for a swift halt to the Gulf War to avoid further escalation.     \"The French authorities reaffirm their attachment to the freedom and security of navigation and to the right of all states to take action under international law and the United Nations charter to halt attacks such as that of October 16,\" the Foreign Ministry spokesman said in a statement.     The United States said its forces destroyed an Iranian oil platform in the Gulf and struck at a second on Monday in retaliation for a recent Iranian missile attack on a U.S.-flagged Kuwaiti ship.     Washington said the platforms were used to monitor shipping and to launch small-boat attacks on shipping. The French statement described the target as \"an Iranian military platform.\"     But the French statement added that \"everything must be done now to avoid that these military developments lead to a new escalation of the conflict.\"  \n',crude
'Ghana will import 15,000 tonnes of crude oil annually from Iran under an agreement reached in Tehran today, the Iranian news agency IRNA reported.     The agency, received in London, said the accord was reached between Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh and a visiting Ghanaian delegation headed by Foreign Minister Obed Asamoah.     IRNA said that under the agreement, Iran will also provide technical and scientific assistance in manpower training and oil exploitation, production and refining.  \n',crude
'Huge oil platforms dot the Gulf like beacons -- usually lit up like Christmas trees at night.     One of them, sitting astride the Rostam offshore oilfield, was all but blown out of the water by U.S. Warships on Monday.     The Iranian platform, an unsightly mass of steel and concrete, was a three-tier structure rising 200 feet (60 metres) above the warm waters of the Gulf until four U.S. Destroyers pumped some 1,000 shells into it.     The U.S. Defense Department said just 10 pct of one section of the structure remained.     U.S. helicopters destroyed three Iranian gunboats after an American helicopter came under fire earlier this month and U.S. forces attacked, seized, and sank an Iranian ship they said had been caught laying mines.     But Iran was not deterred, according to U.S. defense officials, who said Iranian forces used Chinese-made Silkworm missiles to hit a U.S.-owned Liberian-flagged ship on Thursday and the Sea Isle City on Friday.     Both ships were hit in the territorial waters of Kuwait, a key backer of Iraq in its war with Iran.     Henry Schuler, a former U.S. diplomat in the Middle East now with CSIS said Washington had agreed to escort Kuwaiti tankers in order to deter Iranian attacks on shipping.     But he said the deterrence policy had failed and the level of violence and threats to shipping had increased as a result of U.S. intervention and Iran\'s response.     The attack on the oil platform was the latest example of a U.S. \"tit-for-tat\" policy that gave Iran the initiative, said Harlan Ullman, an ex-career naval officer now with CSIS.     He said with this appraoch America would suffer \"the death of one thousand cuts.\"     But for the United States to grab the initiative militarily, it must take warlike steps such as mining Iran\'s harbors or blockading the mouth of the Gulf through which its shipping must pass, Schuler said.     He was among those advocating mining as a means of bringing Iran to the neogtiating table. If vital supplies were cut off, Tehran could not continue the war with Iraq.     Ullman said Washington should join Moscow in a diplomatic initiative to end the war and the superpowers should impose an arms embargo against Tehran if it refused to negotiate.     He said the United States should also threaten to mine and blockade Iran if it continued fighting and must press Iraq to acknowledge responsibility for starting the war as part of a settlement.     Iranian and Western diplomats say Iraq started the war by invading Iran\'s territory in 1980. Iraq blames Iran for the outbreak of hostilities, which have entailed World War I-style infantry attacks resulting in horrific casualties.     Each side has attacked the others\' shipping.  \n',crude
'India\'s state-owned Oil and Natural Gas Commission (ONGC) plans to drill more wells in the Bombay offshore area, where a well spudded in February this year gave both oil and gas, an ONGC spokesman said.     The exploratory well, spudded at a depth of 2,140 metres, yielded 2,000 barrels of oil and 180,000 cubic metres of gas per day, he said.     \"The well, one of the four structures drilled in the area 80 km north-west of Bombay, indicates good prospects of both oil and gas. We\'ve decided to drill at least three more wells in there before starting production on a commercial scale.\"     Production of Bombay High, part of the Bombay offshore field, has stabilised at around 500,000 barrels per day for the last two years.     ONGC produced 27.85 mln tonnes of crude in 1986/87 ending March, up from 27.51 the previous year. Bombay High accounted for 20.61 mln tonnes, marginally up from 20.10 the year before. India\'s total oil output is around 30 mln tonnes.     ONGC has been exploring the Bombay offshore area, developed since the late 1970s, for more oil as production from Bombay High has reached a plateau.  \n',crude
'Indonesia\'s state oil company, Pertamina, has informed its affiliated Japanese companies that crude oil supplies will be 40 pct less than contractual volumes in July, a spokesman for an affiliated company said.     He said the allocations were in line with Indonesia\'s production ceiling under its current OPEC quota, so they might be increased if OPEC ratifies a production rise next week.     Allocations of Indonesia\'s main traded crude, Minas, had been cut by 50 pct and Duri by 38 pct, he said.     Last month contractual volumes were cut by 30 pct.     Contractual volumes assume no production ceiling.     Oil traders said Indonesian grades were already trading above their official selling prices (osp) on the spot market due to strong demand from Japan and the U.S. And tight supplies.     A cargo of Duri loading in July was reportedly traded yesterday at 70 cents over its osp of 15.60 dlrs per barrel and Minas is trading about 20 cents higher, they said.  \n',crude
'The Indonesian state-owned oil company Pertamina has found new offshore oil and gas resources in East Aceh, on the western tip of northern Sumatra, a company spokesman said.     The spokesman said the discovery was made at the GOS IA-1 offshore exploratory well about 38 kms east of Langsa in Aceh.     \"Oil and gas are found in sand layers at the depth of 2,300 metres within the Baong formation,\" he said.     He said preliminary tests showed that the well could flow oil at the rate of 1,320 barrels a day with 50 degrees API at 20 degrees centigrade through a 5/8 inch choke.     \"The well also flows natural gas at the rate of 12 mln standard cubic feet a day,\" he added.     GOS IA-1 well, located at a water depth of 41 metres, was drilled under a production sharing contract between Pertamina and Japex North Sumatra Ltd, each having 50 pct shares.     \"Petroleum operations are to be carried out by Pertamina as operator through a joint operating body established by the two companies,\" the Pertamina spokesman stated.     The contract covers the Gebang block contract area. The two companies have previously completed the drilling of GOS IIA-1 exploratory well, around 14 kms south of GOS IA-1.  \n',crude
'Indonesia told the oil industry on Tuesday it will extend contracts on producing blocks and improve the investment climate, but wants to see increased expenditure on exploration in return.     President Suharto, in an opening speech to the Indonesian Petroleum Association, said Indonesia was ready to extend contracts held by foreign oil companies on producing areas.     \"In order to boost investment in the petroleum industry, the government of Indonesia has basically approved of extending production sharing contracts under the present laws,\" Suharto said.     \"Apart from that, the government will keep improving the investment climate in order to accelerate the development of the petroleum industry,\" he said.     Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto told the Association he was aware that the oil industry needed to be assured that contracts on blocks expiring within the next 10 years would be renewed before they would invest in further exploration.     \"As we all have heard this morning, the President is fully aware of this situation,\" Subroto said.     \"The government has already made the political decision to entertain this time problem by inviting the existing producers to continue their activities in Indonesia, albeit on a selective basis.\"     Indonesia, one of the 13 members of OPEC, must find new oil reserves if it is to remain an exporter in the next decade, oil industry sources say.     Subroto said the government was also working to ease other problems, including granting easier terms for remote areas or deep water conditions.     But Subroto said relations with oil companies were two-way and that they should step up expenditure on oil exploration now that the oil price had recovered.     President Suharto said he wanted to see greater transfer of technology to Indonesian companies, and more help from the oil industry for the regions in which companies operated.     Abdul Rachman Ramly, the President of state oil company Pertamina, has said that budgeted exploration and production expenditure for all oil companies in Indonesia was forecast to fall to 3.1 billion dlrs in calendar 1987 from 3.4 billion in 1986.     Pertamina has 69 production-sharing or joint operation contracts with foreign oil companies.     Subroto said speeding up necessary approvals for field operations was a government priority. There had been misunderstandings between the government and the oil industry in certain areas, such as when a field is designated commercial, and a thorough evaluation was being made.     He said the government wanted to finalise contract extensions as soon as practical, and urged the industry in the meantime to maintain its exploration drive.     Subroto said Indonesia needed the companies to maintain exploration efforts, even if their contract was due to expire within 10 years. \"This need in itself is some sort of guarantee that we will soon have to come up with an extension agreement.\"     Eleven major contract areas are due to come up for renewal between 1991 and 2001, industry sources said.     Extension of the contracts on the blocks has involved detailed negotiations but so far no extension has been granted.     Subroto told reporters afterwards that contract extensions would be selective, based on how much capital would be invested.  \n',crude
'International LPG prices were little changed in the past week, barely affected by the excitement on the advent of OPEC\'s mid-year meeting, traders and industry sources said.     \"If the OPEC decides to increase crude oil production,\" a traders said, \"LPG supplies will be up without corresponding rise in demand.\"     Petrochemical buyers were sidelined, after their foray in the market early in june, they said.     An industry meeting in Dublin this week also drew many market participants away from the trading desk, they added.     Algeria has moved at least two cargoes of propane to the U.S. Gulf, keeping Mediterranean prices steady, traders said.     In the Mideast Gulf, propane appeared easing slightly, after a major U.S. oil company bought propane on formula which netted back about 123 dlrs, cif Mideast Gulf, which was two dlrs below Saudi Arabia\'s government selling price (gsp), industry sources said.     Delivered propane to Japan was quoted at gsp plus 19 dlrs and butane at gsp plus 25 dlrs, the traders said.  \n',crude
'Iran\'s top war spokesman Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani on Tuesday called the U.S. Attacks on two of its Gulf oil platforms an escalation and promised retaliation.     \"God willing, we will carry out our duty in the coming days and make them sorry,\" said Rafsanjani in a speech to Parliament later broadcast by Tehran Radio.     The Tehran leadership have been quick to threaten vengeance after the U.S. Raids on the rigs, one of which was destroyed.     President Ali Khamenei, Prime Minister Mir-Hossein Mousavi and now Rafsanjani within 24 hours of the U.S. Action have all vowed retaliation.     Rafsanjani, the parliamentary speaker, said, \"It is not a threat or an attempt at intimidation when we say we will respond to aggression -- it is a reality and we have proved it in practice.\" He added that the American attack \"squares neither with its superpower image nor its claim of concern with security, nor reason and wisdom.\"     U.S. Warships shelled an Iranian offshore oil platform and American special forces boarded another, destroying equipment.     The U.S. Government said the attack was a measured response to an Iranian missile attack on the American-flagged Kuwaiti tanker Sea Isle City in Kuwaiti waters last Friday.  \n',crude
'Iran is preparing lawsuits to file for compensation from the U.S. Over the American raid on its Gulf oil platforms, Tehran radio quoted Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh as saying.     The lawsuits would be filed with competent international bodies once the exact damage was calculated, he was quoted telling a news conference in Tehran. He earlier estimated the damage from the U.S. Raid at about 500 mln dlrs.     The rigs, one of which was heavily shelled by four American destroyers on Monday, were still burning almost 24 hours after the attack, he said.     Aqazadeh said the half-billion-dollar damage estimate was preliminary. Washington has said the attack was in response to a missile strike against the American-flag tanker the Sea Isle City in Kuwaiti waters on Friday.     He denied that there was any military hardware on the rigs \"except a 23 mm machinegun for air defence.\" Reacting to Weinberger\'s remark that Washington considered the case closed, Aqazadeh said: \"Iran will also consider the case closed after its retaliatory measure.\" Iranian officials have said their response would not be limited to the Gulf and U.S. Interests around the world might come under attack.     Aqazadeh said the U.S. Military presence in the Gulf aggravated the regional crisis and made access to the region\'s oil more difficult, but he did not see the U.S. Attack significantly affecting oil prices.     IRNA said he gave no explicit reply when asked if the attack would prompt Iran to block the Hormuz Strait at the entrance to the Gulf.     \"If Iran cannot use the Hormuz Strait, no other country can either, and this would be to everyone\'s harm,\" the radio quoted him as saying.  \n',crude
'U.S. Attacks on two Iranian oil platforms in the Gulf -- both of which were still blazing -- caused damage estimated at 500 mln dlrs, Tehran Radio quoted Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh as saying.     The rigs, one of which was heavily shelled by four American destroyers on Monday, were still burning almost 24 hours after the attack and could cause widespread pollution in the Gulf, the minister told a news conference in Tehran. He said the Reshadat rigs, 120 miles (200 km) east of Bahrain in international waters, were in the final stages of reconstruction after an attack by Iraqi jets last year.  \n',crude
'Iran said several people were injured in Monday\'s U.S. Attack on an Iranian offshore oil site and vowed retaliation, Tehran radio reported.     It quoted President Ali Khamenei as saying, \"We will definitely retaliate and will not leave this American move unanswered.\"     A broadcast monitored in Nicosia said several civilian personnel on the Rashadat oil platforms in the Gulf east of Qatar were injured when U.S. Warships bombarded them this afternoon. It described damage as \"severe.\"     Washington said four American frigates shelled and destroyed two Iranian platforms at the Rashadat (formerly Rostam) field at 1100 GMT on Monday in response to Friday\'s missile attack on a U.S.-flag ship in Kuwaiti waters.     The U.S. Said Iranians used the platforms for military pruposes and had fired on an American helicopter from the rigs earlier this month.     Khamenei denied that the platforms had military gear or personnel and said the U.S. Attack lacked miltary value.     \"With this move Mr. Reagan has committed a big mistake and has definitely increased his problems...  \n',crude
'The Soviet Union has agreed to supply Iran with refined oil products in exchange for 100,000 barrels per day of crude, Iran\'s national news agency, IRNA, said.     IRNA, monitored in Nicosia, quoted Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh as saying on his return to Tehran from Moscow that the agreement was part of a protocol on economic cooperation signed during his visit. The amount of crude delivered to the Soviet Union might double to 200,000 bpd later, he said.     Aqazadeh said the two sides agreed to conduct feasibility studies for a pipeline to take Iranian crude from fields in southern Iran to the Black Sea through the Soviet Union.     Iran is pursuing the pipeline project to protect part of its oil exports from Iraqi air attacks in the Gulf.     Irna made no mention of natural gas exports to the Soviet Union, which Aqazadeh had said would be discussed before he left for Moscow.     Iran lost most of its refining capacity early in the Gulf war and now imports several hundred thousand bpd of refined products.     Aqazadeh said Soviet refined products would be delivered at the Caspian Sea ports of Anzali and Nowshahr, at Neka, near the Caspian, and at Jolfa in north-west Iran.  \n',crude
'Iran and the Soviet Union have provisionally agreed to hold talks on a possible exchange of Iranian crude oil for finished Soviet oil products, an official spokesman said Tuesday.     Gennady Gerasimov, chief of the Soviet Foreign Ministry\'s Information Directorate, told reporters the agreement had been reached during a visit to Moscow last week by Iran\'s Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh.     Gerasimov said no date had been set for the talks, which would also study the possibility of Soviet technical assistance for Iran\'s oil industry.  \n',crude
'Iraq has rejected its new OPEC production quota set in Vienna for the second half of this year, the official Iraqi news agency INA reported.     It quoted Oil Minister Issam Abdul-Rahim al-Chalabi, who returned Sunday, as saying \"Iraq will continue to adhere to its position considering itself as not included in the agreement.\"      Last December, Iraq rejected its assigned first half 1987 quota of 1.466 mln bpd and demanded a share equal to the 2.255 mln bpd quota set for Iran, its enemy in the nearly seven-year-old Gulf war.     The accord reached by OPEC ministers in Vienna Saturday set an output ceiling of 16.6 mln bpd for the group\'s 13 members from July to December, raising Iraq\'s share to 1.54 mln bpd and Iran\'s to 2.369 mln.  \n',crude
'Iraq said today its troops were pushing Iranian forces out of positions they had initially occupied when they launched a new offensive near the southern port of Basra early yesterday.     A High Command communique said Iraqi troops had won a significant victory and were continuing to advance.     Iraq said it had foiled a three-pronged thrust some 10 km (six miles) from Basra, but admitted the Iranians had occupied ground held by the Mohammed al-Qassem unit, one of three divisions attacked.     The communique said Iranian Revolutionary Guards were under assault from warplanes, helicopter gunships, heavy artillery and tanks.     \"Our forces are continuing their advance until they purge the last foothold\" occupied by the Iranians, it said.     (Iran said its troops had killed or wounded more than 4,000 Iraqis and were stabilising their new positions.)     The Baghdad communique said Iraqi planes also destroyed oil installations at Iran\'s southwestern Ahvaz field during a raid today. It denied an Iranian report that an Iraqi jet was shot down.     Iraq also reported a naval battle at the northern tip of the Gulf. Iraqi naval units and forces defending an offshore terminal sank six Iranian out of 28 Iranian boats attempting to attack an offshore terminal, the communique said.      \n',crude
'Deregulation of Japan\'s oil industry could mean hardship for smaller firms and lead to their merging into bigger refining and marketing groups, industry sources said.     They said the relaxation of controls was now under review by the Petroleum Council, an advisory panel to the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI).     A spokesman for a major firm said, \"Deregulation would bring about a reorganization. If it\'s a by-product of freer competition, we have no choice but to accept it.\"     The Council is due to close its discussions on June 12.     The sources said the Council was likely to tell MITI it should end its 50 year-old protection of the industry. It should cut capacity to 3.8 mln barrels per day, about 75 pct of current capacity. Quotas should end for crude throughput and gasoline output, and oil tariffs should be abolished.     They said deregulation was vital to promote more competition and efficiency, and most saw it as inevitable.     \"Deregulation is taking place everywhere. Now it\'s our turn to see if we can survive cut-throat competition,\" said a source at one major Japanese oil company.     A spokesman for a smaller refiner said, \"We\'ll have a hard time surviving, but that\'s something we must go through.\"     \"In addition to our streamlining and efficiency programs for the oil division, we will exert efforts towards branching out further into other lines such as real estate and travel agencies,\" he said.     Larger companies are also streamlining. Nippon Oil Co Ltd which had the largest share of refined products sales in the Japanese market in fiscal 1985, cut nine pct of its refining capacity in fiscal 1986.     Cosmo Oil Co Ltd, the third largest seller of oil products in 1985, cut its workforce by some 20 pct last year, a spokesman for the company said.     Between 1984 and 1986, on the recommendation of the Council, 13 oil companies were integrated into 11 companies within seven refining and marketing groups to improve the efficiency of the industry.     Oil industry sources said this structure was now likely to be streamlined further into five refining groups.     \"MITI means business. It will urge the major seven groups to merge into five to build up their muscles,\" a source said.     A MITI official tolds he did not rule out the possibility of further mergers within the Japanese oil industry in the event of the relaxation of oil controls.     He declined to officially confirm or deny that the Petroleum Council had recommended deregulatory measures but said that in principal MITI would encourage a move towards deregulation.  \n',crude
'Japan said it understood why the U.S. Attacked an Iranian oil platform on Monday.     \"Japan, deeply concerned over the increasing threat to the ships navigating in the Gulf, understands the circumstances that have led the United States government to take these measures,\" the Foreign Ministry said in a statement.     The statement added that the threat to free and safe navigation had increased after the missile attack on a U.S.-flagged tanker in Kuwaiti territorial waters last Friday.  \n',crude
'OPEC output for the second half of 1987, including that of Iraq, will be above the official 16.6 mln barrels per day (bpd) output ceiling agreed by OPEC Saturday, Kuwait oil minister Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah, said.     Iraq refused to sign the pact, by which OPEC maintained its ceiling at 16.6 mln bpd for both the third and fourth quarters of 1987. In December, OPEC set a provisional fourth quarter level of 18.3 mln bpd, now cut back to the third quarter target.     Ali told a news conference that including Iraq, \"OPEC third quarter output will be between 17.5 and 17.7 mln bpd while fourth quarter output will be nearly 18 mln bpd\"     Ali did not detail what effect he thought these production levels would have on prices.     Iraq has an official first half quota of 1.466 mln bpd, rising to 1.54 mln in the second half, but has refused to adhere to it and has recently been producing around two mln barrels per day, exporting it through pipelines to Saudi Arabia and Turkey. Iraq\'s export capacity will be further boosted when a 500,000 bpd oil pipeline via Turkey comes on stream in about September.     Iraq has been insisting on a quota equal to its Gulf War enemy Iran, which has a quota of 2.255 mln bpd, rising to 2.369 mln in the second half.     Ali said the position of the 400,000 bpd production from the Neutral Zone between Saudi Arabia and Kuwait, which has been supplied to Iraq as war relief crude, was fixed. \"We will not discuss it. There will not be any change,\" he said.     Ali said the conference, which began Thursday and ended Saturday evening, had been too short for all necessary problems to be adressed. \"We are overdoing it in holding too short a meeting. We sweep a lot under the carpet,\" he said.     Ali said the problem of price differentials between the prices of various OPEC crudes had not been dealt with properly at the meeting.      Ali said \"The problem of differentials is a real one. I would hate to be producing today a light crude and that problem has not been dealt with properly. Light crudes are overpriced relative to heavy crudes.\"     Asked if the issue of differentials would be raised at the next OPEC meeting to be held in Vienna on December 9, Ali said \"If my crudes are affected I will raise the issue, I will not do the work of another minister.\"     Kuwait\'s own crudes range from medium to heavy grades.     OPEC reintroduced fixed prices on February 1, with a spread of 2.65 dlrs a barrel between its lightest and heaviest crudes.          \n',crude
'OPEC\'s credibility faces fresh scrutiny in coming weeks amid signs of a significant rise in supplies of oil to international oil markets, the Kuwait daily al-Qabas said.     In an article headlined \"Gulf oil sources say Middle East production up 1.4 mln bpd\" and \"Markets witness new surplus amid whispers of return to cheating days,\" it warned OPEC\'s official prices could face fresh pressure from international oil companies seeking cheaper supplies.     It did not say whether only OPEC or Opec and other producers were behind the reported rise in Mideast output. Nor did it specify if the sources were official or other contacts.    \"The sources said the credibility of OPEC would come under fresh scrutiny from Monday, with activity in the European and American markets,\" it said.     The sources were quoted as saying that after Opec had in March demonstrated its commitment to quota agreements, some members had raised output last week. It gave no details.     \"Dealers in oil markets were now waiting to see if Opec was able to control production, or whether the days of cheating and producing over quotas has begun anew,\" it reported.    \"The sources warned that maybe the (price of a) barrel of oil will fall below 18, perhaps 17.80 dlrs this week or next if there is no control on supplies.     \"The sources believed a return of oil below 18 dlrs a barrel may open the doors for international oil companies to pressure Opec over contract prices, similar to the struggle last March,\" it said, apparently referring to resistance by buyers to lift from Qatar unless it gave price discounts.     \"More than one official has warned Opec would find its solidarity under scrutiny by the end of April or start of May,\" it said, noting demand usually fell with the onset of summer.   \n',crude
'Military experts say the United States faces a dilemma in the Gulf following U.S. destruction of an Iranian oil platform in retaliation for an attack on a U.S.-flagged tanker.     The experts tolds Tehran holds the initiative and is likely to control the tempo and direction of the conflict as long as America simply reacts to Iranian attacks by launching limited retaliatory strikes.     But if Washington seizes the initiative with bolder steps -- such as mining Iran\'s harbors, blockading its shipping, or destroying key bases -- it could find itself in a major war.     \"Iran is in the driver\'s seat in an absolute sense as the cycle of attack and retaliation continues,\" said Fred Axelgard, a Gulf War expert with the private Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS).     \"It\'s like a Greek tragedy,\" said retired Adm. Eugene Carroll of Washington\'s private Center for Defense Information (CDI) think tank.     Some Middle East experts say the only way out is for Washington to join forces with Moscow in pressing for an end to the war between Iran and Iraq.     They say it is not feasible for America to withdraw its 30-ship force from the Gulf area, where the Navy began escorting U.S.-flagged Kuwaiti tankers in July. Withdrawal  would give the appearance of being chased away by Iran, which President Reagan could never accept.     U.S. Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger told a Pentagon news conference the destroyers Kidd, Young, Leftwich and Hoel fired about 1,000 rounds of five-inch shells at Iran\'s Rostam oil rig 120 miles east of Bahrain beginning at about 1400 Gulf time (0700 EDT) on Monday.     Weinberger said the platform had been used as a military base by Iran and that the attack responded to an Iranian Silkworm missile strike on the U.S.-flagged Kuwaiti tanker Sea Isle City on Friday.     Iranians manning the platform were warned in advance and allowed to escape.     \"We do not seek further confrontation with Iran, but we will be prepared to meet any escalation of military action by Iran with stronger countermeasures,\" Weinberger said.     \"We consider this matter closed,\" he said.     Analysts ranging from the liberal CDI to conservatives agreed the U.S. reaction was measured, reasonable and did not escalate the conflict unduly. But they said the question was whether Iran would consider the matter closed. It had not taken this view after earlier clashes.  \n',crude
'The current crude oil price of between 18 and 20 dlrs a barrel will remain stable over the next couple of years, rising only one to two dlrs a barrel per annum to keep up with inflation, OPEC President Rilwanu Lukman said.     Lukman, who was speaking during talks with Swedish trade officials, said the stable price depended upon output restraint by both OPEC and non-OPEC oil producers, Swedish government officials said.     They said Lukman, who is also Nigerian oil minister, made the remarks whilst talking about the connection between Third World debt and industrialised nations.     Crude oil output controls did not necessarily mean higher energy bills for the world\'s industrial nations, Lukman said.     Although very low oil prices, such as those seen around the beginning of the year, may appear beneficial for the industrial countries that depend on imported energy, they would only lead to wastage and overdependence on the fuel in the long term, he said.     This in turn would bring a swing back to extremely high prices, he added.     Sweden, heavily dependent on imported oil, suffered a major crisis in the mid-1970s, when oil prices spiralled.  \n',crude
'Flooding in the Red River on the Texas/Oklahoma border has shut down the Basin Pipeline, a 24-inch pipeline that transports as much as 300,000 barrels per day of sweet and sour crudes from Texas to Cushing, Okla, a Texaco Pipeline Co spokesman confirmed.     \"The water is rushing by so fast that we can\'t get any divers down to assess the damage but there is some possibility that the pipeline could be up by the end of the week,\" a company source said.     The pipeline transmits roughly two-thirds sour crude and one-third sweet crude oil from the Midland, Texas region.     Texaco sources said that if the pipeline service is restored by Friday there would be little problem in restoring oil which has been lost to the flood.     \"But if the pipeline is down more than 10 days it will be difficult to make up without prorationing and we would not like to proration this pipeline, if we don\'t have to.\"     The Basin Pipeline is jointly owned by Atlantic Richfield Corp ARC, Shell Oil Co, a subsidiary of the Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD and Texaco Inc TX, which is the pipeline\'s operator.      Peter Beutel, analyst at Elders Futures Inc, said crude oil futures contracts on New York Mercantile Exchange rose to new highs this afternoon following news of the pipeline break.     July crude futures of West Texas Intermediate traded up to 19.60 dlrs a barrel, a rise of more than 20 cts.     Cash market prices also firmed on the news with sellers of WTI raising offers to 19.60 dlrs a barrel.     Sour crudes, which would be most affected by the pipeline shutdown, however, were slow to react to the news with West Texas Sour and Alaska North Slope holding 50 cts to one dlr a barrel below WTI, respectively.     Dan Stevens, manager of public and government affairs at Texaco, said the company hopes to fix the pipeline in five days but that will depend on when the water level of the Red River recedes. There is already evidence that the water level is dropping and it appears the rain has stopped in the area affecting the pipeline, Stevens said.     He said the segment of the pipeline that was damaged was underground and at a distance from the Red River that flooded. The pipeline runs over the Red River and under the subsoil nearby, according to Stevens. He said some of this subsoil was apparently washed away.         The potential for environmental damage is being downplayed at this time despite the volume of oil that runs through this line.     Texaco\'s Stevens said that aerial surveillance has not found any crude on the water in the river or in Lake Texoma, which is nearby.  \n',crude
'The operator of a major U.S. crude oil pipeline, shutdown because of flood damage, said it may be several days before repairs are made and the system is functioning again.     Dan Stevens, manager of public and government affairs at Texaco Inc TX, operator of the pipeline through its subsidiary Texaco Pipeline Co, said the company hopes repairs will begin in about five days and expects it to take several more days to complete.     \"At this point we are lining up what we know we need, to get the job done,\" Stevens said, adding that the timing for repairs will depend on the damage to the pipeline which is difficult to assess because of flooding on the Red River.     The pipeline was shipping roughly 225,000 barrels of crude oil per day, or about 55 pct of its capacity during the 30 days preceding its shutdown on Saturday, Stevens said.     The pipeline was shut down from Cushing, Okla, to Witchita Falls, Kan, on Saturday due to an undetermined leak at the Red River crossing, near the Oklahoma/Texas border, because of severe rains, a spokesman for Texaco said.     Stevens said it was reasonable to suggest the pipeline could operate at full capacity when it reopens in order to make up for the shortfull but cautioned they will talk with customers to determine their requirements.     Oil analysts and traders said they were not sure if the  shutdown will continue to raise U.S. oil prices.     Monday, after Texaco confirmed that the pipeline had been closed, West Texas Intermediate crude in the spot market and on New York Mercantile Exchange\'s energy futures complex rose 20 cts a barrel.     Stevens said it was reasonable to suggest the pipeline could operate at full capacity when it reopens in order to make up for the shortfull but cautioned they will talk with customers to determine their requirements.     Oil analysts and traders said they were not sure if the  shutdown will continue to raise U.S. oil prices.     Monday, after Texaco confirmed that the pipeline had been closed, West Texas Intermediate crude in the spot market and on New York Mercantile Exchange\'s energy futures complex rose 20 cts a barrel.  \n',crude
'Malaysia\'s national oil company, Petronas, has advised the government to raise crude oil output to 540,000 barrels a day (bpd) in 1988 from a current 500,000 bpd, a senior company official said.     \"We have the capacity to produce the amount,\" Rastam Hadi, Petronas\'s Vice-President for Upstream Sector said.     The government will announce its decision on Friday when it unveils the country\'s budget. Malaysia raised output this month to current levels from 420,000 bpd after reviewing the world oil market. In May, Malaysia cut output to 420,000 bpd from 459,000 in response to a call by OPEC to boost prices.  \n',crude
'Oman has granted term crude oil customers retroactive discounts from official prices of 30 to 38 cents per barrel on liftings made during February, March and April, the weekly newsletter Middle East Economic Survey (MEES) said.      MEES said the price adjustments, arrived at through negotiations between the Omani oil ministry and companies concerned, are designed to compensate for the difference between market-related prices and the official price of 17.63 dlrs per barrel adopted by non-OPEC Oman since February.  \n',crude
'U.S. television networks said on Monday that U.S. forces launched a retaliatory strike against Iran late Sunday, apparently attacking two Iranian offshore oil drilling platforms.     NBC News said it understood six Iranians had been pulled from the sea.     It said cautiously that U.S. forces attacked late Sunday and that two Iranian oil platforms east of Bahrain were ablaze as a result, but CBS News and other networks said flatly that U.S. forces attacked the Iranian oil platforms.     U.S. officials had been meeting on a response since Friday when an attack on a Kuwaiti port severely damaged a U.S.-flagged ship.     President Reagan said on Sunday he had already made a decision on the U.S. response to Friday\'s Iran attack but would not say what the decision was.     Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger said on Saturday the attack on a U.S.-flagged ship in Kuwaiti waters on Friday was almost certainly by an Iran Silkworm missile.  \n',crude
'Norway\'s September oil output rose by 22.2 pct to 1.07 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 830,492 bpd in August, according to a survey of firms operating here.     Operators said the sharp rise reflected higher output at several of Norway\'s biggest fields and resumed production at fields shut down for 27 days in August for the Ekofisk field rescue project.     Industry analysts said the increase did not exceed Norway\'s voluntary move to curb by 7.5 pct planned growth in its oil output, a move designed to back OPEC-led efforts to stabilise oil prices by limiting supplies to world crude markets.     Norway, not an OPEC member, decided in June to extend the production restraints, enforced since February 1 1987, on all its North Sea fields for the rest of the year.     Oil Minister Arne Oeien said last month he expected Norway would extend into 1988 its policy of slowed production growth.     The biggest increase was seen on the Ekofisk field, which pumped 168,023 bpd in September against 48,195 bpd in August, field operator Phillips Petroleum Norway Inc said.     Ekofisk and the nearby Valhall and Ula fields, which use the Ekofisk pipeline, were shut down for most of August while Phillips raised Ekofisk platforms to counter seabed subsidence.     BP Petroleum Development Norway Ltd, operator of the Ula field, said September output rose to 86,727 bpd after dropping to 27,237 bpd in August because of the shutdown.     Valhall, operated by Amoco Norway A/S, flowed 74,694 bpd last month compared with 69,748 bpd in August, the company said.     September production was also sharply higher at the Statfjord field. Norway\'s 84 pct share of Statfjord, which extends into the British North Sea sector, was 611,138 bpd against 552,646 bpd in August, operator Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap A/S (Statoil) said.     Norway\'s 22.2 pct share of the Murchison field which, like Statfjord, extends into the British sector, yielded 15,388 bpd in September, a slight 920 bpd decrease from the previous month, Norwegian partners on the British-operated field said.     Statoil boosted output at its Gullfaks field to 109,670 bpd in September, compared with 100,188 in August.     Norsk Hydro, operator of the Oseberg field, said test output at the field from the mobile production ship Petro Jarl totalled 1,719 bpd last month, down sharply from 16,170 bpd in August.     Hydro said the drop was caused by failure to bring on stream a second well, cutting September production to just two days.  \n',crude
'Norway will extend its 7.5 pct cutback in planned North Sea oil output in support of OPEC from July 15 until the end of this year, Oil Ministry spokesman Egil Helle tolds.     \"We took a very positive view of the OPEC meeting in Vienna,\" he said. \"The accord reached there means stability in the oil market and we shall continue making our contribution.\"     The cuts, originally brought in from February 1, would probably be officially approved on July 10 by parliament, Helle said. The ministry had written to Norway\'s oil companies and would now discuss with them how best to implement the cuts.     OPEC agreed this weekend in Vienna on an output ceiling of 16.6 mln barrels per day (bpd) for the rest of 1987 and retained the fixed prices that were set in its December accord based on an 18 dlr per barrel reference point.     OPEC\'s first half 1987 output ceiling was 15.8 mln bpd, and it\'s December pact had provisionally set a third quarter ceiling of 16.6 mln bpd, rising to 18.3 mln in the fourth quarter.     Norway, which pumps around one mln bpd from its offshore fields, previously said it would continue its output curbs from planned production for the rest of the year if OPEC remained within its December accord on output and prices.     Norway\'s oil production rose 10 pct to an average of around 840,000 bpd in 1986. Since then it has risen to around one mln bpd, and is expected to reach about 1.5 mln bpd by 1995.     The 7.5 pct cut from planned production implemented since February reduced Norway\'s oil output by about 80,000 bpd.     Norway\'s Oil Minister Arne Oeien, currently in Iceland for a meeting of Nordic ministers, has made no official statement on the latest oil production cutbacks.     Over the past year several other leading non-OPEC producers, including the Soviet Union, Mexico, China, Malaysia and Egypt have also pledged support for OPEC\'s bid to keep prices stable.     Norway decided on the initial round of cuts following an OPEC agreement last December which boosted oil prices to around 18 dlrs per barrel from around 14 to 15 dlrs last December.     Norway relies on oil for about 40 pct of its total export earnings and was hit hard by the collapse in the oil price during the first half of 1986.     But firmer oil prices since then have brought some stability to the economy and helped narrow the foreign trade deficit.      Norway\'s North Sea neighbour Britain has consistently refused to cooperate with OPEC output cuts saying it is up to the producing oil companies to set the levels of production.  \n',crude
'OPEC has shown itself to be in control of the world oil situation with its speed in hammering out a pact to limit crude oil output to 16.6 mln barrels per day (bpd) for the rest of 1987, oil traders said.     They said market respect for the cartel has increased since it announced Saturday that it would cut fourth quarter output to 16.6 mln bpd from the 18.3 mln agreed in December.     \"There are light oversupplies now, but OPEC ... Has ensured there will be no oversupplies in the fourth quarter, and is in effect putting pressure on end-users,\" a European crude oil trader said.     In Tokyo, one oil analyst said, \"There\'s no reason to expect a weak market from now on.\"     A Japanese oil trader, also based in Tokyo, said, \"We thought OPEC would have difficulty agreeing on fourth quarter production so the market will react very bullishly.\"     Traders in Singapore said that while there has been only a slight increase so far in spot quotes for Dubai, a benchmark crude, they expect price increases over the next few days.     August Dubai was discussed in cautious early activity at around 17.35 dlrs, above Friday\'s 17.15-20 range, but still below the government selling price (GSP) of 17.42.     Even prices of light Mideast grades, such as Qatar and Abu Dhabi crudes, are expected to improve from recent weak positions, 15 to 20 cents below their GSP\'s. Singapore traders said sellers might now aim for GSP\'s at least.     They said that after initial jumps, they expect prices to stabilise and hover around GSPs for the next few months.     They said the Japanese oil market would be most affected and Japanese end-users would need to rebuild stocks for winter requirements before October.     Prices are most likely to rise in the fourth quarter on European and U.S. Stockbuilding for winter, they added.     \"There\'s no doubt consumption will be higher than production by the fourth quarter and stocks are not that high,\" said an international trader in Tokyo. Another Tokyo trader was less bullish, \"For sure there will be some shortage but it depends on how much they (OPEC members) cheat.\"     A Singapore trade source said, \"There is enough cheating and leakage in the OPEC sales system to convince traders there is no need to worry about shortages.\"     Other traders said the questionable Iraqi production level, after Iraq\'s rejection of its assigned quota, was a bearish factor to be considered.     Traders also said end-users now would buy as much as possible on term contracts and buy spot only when the market cooled from its initial reaction to the OPEC agreement.     Spot product prices in Singapore were little changed in thin early discussions, with naphtha and middle distillates quiet on minimal buying interest.     Fuel oil products were steady to firm on light demand and tight prompt supplies, dealers said.  \n',crude
'Some OPEC states are unhappy about the prices assigned to their crude oil but this should not pose great problems when the group reviews its six-month-old price and output pact in Vienna next week, oil analysts say.     They said Nigeria, which holds the OPEC conference presidency, and Qatar probably have the biggest grievances about price differentials making some of their crudes uncompetitive.     There has also been speculation by Japanese traders that OPEC might want to mark up prices of high-sulphur heavy crudes, to correspond with greater demand and higher fuel oil prices.     But most experts agree that a major overhaul of price differentials is unlikely, so as to avoid giving the market signals of a dent in OPEC\'s new unity.     \"All OPEC members can make a good case for changing differentials,\" said one analyst with a major oil company. \"But at the end of the day, the attitude is going to be \"leave well alone\' and little or nothing is likely to be altered.\"     Iran, Libya and Saudi Arabia are among those who also saw sales problems earlier this year, traders say. But diminished customer resistance to fixed prices and, in some cases, marketing incentives have helped their sales.     Some producers can sell uncompetitively priced crudes by means of discounts, processing deals or selling them alongside better priced grades in a \"package.\"     Many OPEC crudes are seen to be reasonably priced, at least for some part of the year. But many experts say OPEC should change prices quarterly or monthly to match seasonal demand for fuel oil-rich heavy crudes and gasoline-rich lighter grades. At its last meeting in December, OPEC agreed to reintroduce fixed prices from February 1 around an 18 dlr per barrel reference point. Official prices had been effectively dropped in 1985 when members offered discounts to attract customers.     OPEC also decided to limit first-half 1987 output to 15.8 mln bpd and proposed ceilings of 16.6 mln for the third quarter and 18.3 mln for the fourth. Analysts expect it will now extend or raise slightly the current ceiling for the coming months.     Spot market and netback values for some crudes do not mirror official prices, but OPEC will probably keep the 18 dlr target and at most make minimal changes to differentials, analysts say.     The 18 dlr figure is based on a basket of six OPEC and one non-OPEC crudes. OPEC assigned prices to its other key export crudes, with a 2.65 dlr gap between the heaviest and lightest. Extra heavy crudes were among those left out.     Industry estimates vary on the proportion of OPEC oil exports actually sold at official prices. Several experts say only one-quarter to one-third of the total in fact sells at official prices, with some of the rest included in processing or barter deals or sold in the form of refined products.     Problems with the new structure appeared earlier this year, when some producers\' output fell due to customer reluctance to pay the new prices.    Nigeria especially found its gasoline-rich Bonny Light crude -- now OPEC\'s highest priced grade at 18.92 dlrs a barrel -- was uncompetitive on the spot market against Britain\'s Brent.     In February and March, Nigeria\'s production shrank below its 1.238 mln bpd OPEC quota. Spot prices have since revived, due partly to seasonal demand for gasoline, and its output has risen.     Some experts feel Bonny Light is still overvalued and say its price should be cut by between 50 cts to one dlr a barrel.     But Mehdi Varzi, chief oil analyst with London\'s Kleinwort Grieveson Securities, doubts Nigeria will actively push the differentials question in Vienna.     \"It would not look good for OPEC unity if Nigeria, which holds the presidency, raised the issue,\" he said.  \n',crude
'OPEC conference president Rilwanu Lukman said he expects next week\'s ministerial meeting in Vienna to be brief and calm and that OPEC\'s current price and production agreement may only need a slight review.     \"I expect the meeting in Vienna to be short and calm,\" Lukman, who is also Nigerian oil minister, told reporters here ahead of his departure on Sunday for the conference, which starts June 25.     \"We already have an agreement which may need only a slight review,\" Lukman said.     The agreement reached at a long session of OPEC ministers in December last year pegged the group\'s crude oil output at 15.8 mln bpd for first half 1987 at fixed prices of around 18 dlrs a barrel.     Since then prices have risen from 15 dlrs in December to just above the official OPEC levels, with oil industry analysts firmly convinced the organisation will maintain the agreement to keep the market stable.     \"I myself believe that OPEC will tend to take a position to strengthen the gains we have made so far,\" Lukman said.     He declined to say if the current ceiling should be maintained or raised to 16.6 mln bpd for the third quarter and 18.3 mln for the fourth as provisionally agreed last December.     \"Whatever decision we arrive at will be guided by our collective will to keep the market strong,\" he said.     He said non-OPEC member Norway, which he visited two weeks ago, had pledged further cooperation with the group and this was significant for its members.     Lukman said heavy destocking by consumers early this year when OPEC\'s fixed price regime came into effect and a restocking now for the winter was responsible for current market strength.  \n',crude
'Outer Continental Shelf oil and gas lease sale number 97 in the Beaufort Sea, tentatively schedualed for January 1988 has been postponed, the U.S. Department of Interior said.     Alan Powers, chief of the Minerals Maanagement Service for the department, said the delay is to have more time to study the effects of drilling noise on whale migrations.     Powers said the state has asked for additional noise data for the sale area off Alaska\'s North Slope. A new date has not been set, but it will likely be no sooner than next March, Powers said.     Some 3,930 blocks encompassing about 21 mln acres are involved in the proposed sale. The area is between three and 160 miles off the northern coast of Alaska in the Artic Ocean between the Canadian border and 162 degrees west longitude.  \n',crude
'Crude oil prices could remain around 18 dlrs a barrel until the end of the year, but OPEC\'s decision on output at its next meeting would be the critical factor, an official of Mexico\'s state oil company, Petroleos Mexicanos (Pemex), told a group of Japanese businessmen.     Adrian Lajous, Pemex\' executive vice president of international trade, said current OPEC output already appeared to be very near the 16.6 mln barrel per day level it set itself for the third quarter. \"Production is surging ahead of what was originally planned, while demand is growing more slowly than envisaged a few months ago,\" he said.     He said OPEC had to look very carefully at what level of production in the third quarter would effectively sustain the 18 dlrs price, and that an increase to what had originally been envisaged might soften price levels.     The 13-member cartel is scheduled to meet on June 25 in Vienna to review its December accord on prices and output.     \"I hope OPEC will follow a very conservative attitude in terms of volume decisions,\" Lajous said.     A repetition of what happened last year, when OPEC boosted output and sent oil prices tumbling down below 10 dlrs, is always there as a possibility, he said.     \"I hope never again to go through the trauma of 1986. I expect other oil exporters have learned their lessons and discipline will be maintained,\" he said.     Lajous said there was still excess supply and as long as this remains there will be a tendency to instability in oil markets, but prices should remain around 18 to 19 dlrs during 1987 if output remains under control.     He said Saudi King Fahd\'s remarks last month, that increased production was not so important as long as incomes would not be affected by the output, were \"very relevant and welcome from such a powerful producer.\"  \n',crude
'U.S. oil demand as measured by products supplied fell 2.6 pct in the four weeks ended April three to 15.73 mln barrels per day (bpd) from 16.16 mln in the same period a year ago, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.     In its weekly petroleum status report, the Energy Department agency said distillate demand was off 7.9 pct in the period to 2.90 mln bpd from 3.15 mln a year earlier.     Gasoline demand averaged 6.76 mln bpd, off 3.1 pct from 6.98 mln last year, while residual fuel demand was 1.15 mln bpd, off 16.9 pct from 1.39 mln, the EIA said.     So far this year, distillate demand fell 2.3 pct to 3.20 mln bpd from 3.28 mln in 1986, gasoline demand was 6.63 mln bpd, off 0.3 pct from 6.65 mln, and residual fuel demand fell 4.9 pct to 1.35 mln bpd from 1.42 mln, the EIA said.     Year-to-date domestic crude output was estimated at 8.40 mln bpd, off 7.6 pct from 9.09 mln a year ago, while gross crude imports averaged 3.92 mln bpd, up 27.1 pct from 3.08 mln, it said.  \n',crude
'Santos Ltd STOS.S said it had made a significant oil discovery at its Mawson One well in the Moomba block of the Cooper Basin, South Australia.     It said the well flowed oil from sands at an average rate of 1,440 barrels per day from 2,131 to 2,135 metres through a 6mm choke.     Santos said the well was cased and suspended pending further evaluation. But it said the proximity of the discovery to existing production facilities at the Gidgealpa South field would allow Mawson One to be brought into production rapidly.     Santos has a 60 pct stake in the block, Delhi Petroleum Pty Ltd has 30 pct and South Australian Oil and Gas Corp Pty Ltd has 10 pct.  \n',crude
'Saudi Arabia\'s Oil Minister Hisham Nazer said Riyadh would not agree to a cut in oil prices and would not accept a \"mad\" increase that would drive consumers away.     He told al-Riyadh newspaper, \"Saudi Arabia follows a balanced petroleum policy. It does not approve of a decrease in prices from current levels and it also does not accept a mad increase that would drive consumers away and make them try and find alternative sources (for energy).\"     OPEC agreed last December to cut production after world prices hit new lows in 1986. They agreed on a pricing system aimed to stabilize the market around 18 dlrs a barrel.      OPEC is scheduled to meet in Vienna on June 25, where it will review its current oil price and production policy.     Saudi Arabia\'s King Fahd said last month that he wanted oil prices to remain stable for the next two years.     Saudi Arabia is the architect of the current pricing and production pact, which is backed by Kuwait and the UAE. The current pact set a production ceiling for first half 1987 of 15.8 mln bpd, and implemented fixed prices based on an 18 dlrs a barrel average.   \n',crude
'The acting governor of Saudi Arabia\'s state-owned oil company, Petromin, Jamal Hassan Jawa, has retired at his own request, oil industry sources said.     They said Ali Ibrahim Rubaishi, head of organisation planning in Petromin, would take over as acting governor.     Jawa held the post since his predecessor, Abdul-Hadi Taher, left in a major oil industry shake up last December.     The sources said Rubaishi had not been expected to hold the post permanently.     The government removed Taher and Oil Minister Ahmed Zaki Yamani from their posts late last year in a move which industry sources said was aimed at coming to grips with a buyers\' oil market.     The two men had run the Saudi oil industry for more than 20 years. Industry sources said that despite huge resources, Saudi Arabia had been unable to mould an oil marketing strategy tuned to the competitive realities of the 1980s glut.     Hisham Nazer, who replaced Yamani, successfully led an OPEC-engineered return to fixed oil prices of 18 dlrs a barrel last December.     Nazer is believed to be reviewing Saudi oil operations which could lead to a thorough overhaul in the way Saudi Arabia does business, the sources said.     The sources had said possible candidates for the governor\'s job include Prince Abdul Aziz Ibn Salman Ibn Abdul Aziz, who earlier ran a research center at Saudi Arabia\'s University of Petroleum and Minerals, and former Deputy Planning Minister Faisal Beshir. They also list Abdulla Bakr, President of the University of Petroleum and Minerals, economist Ali Jonahi, Ahmed Shinawi, and Zuheir Masoud, director of Jeddah Islamic Port.  \n',crude
'Proven oil and gas deposits in Saudi Arabia increased in 1986 despite higher oil output, according to the kingdom\'s main producing company, Aramco.     Recoverable oil reserves in Aramco fields rose to 167 billion barrels by the end the year from 166.5 billion in 1985, while gas reserves jumped by 7.7 pct to 135.8 trillion cu ft from 126.1 trillion, the company\'s annual report said.     Aramco, responsible for all Saudi production except about 200,000 barrels per day (bpd) in the Neutral Zone between Saudi Arabia and Kuwait, increased production to 4.69 mln barrels per day in 1986 from 3.04 mln barrels a year earlier.      Most of 1986 was a virtual free-for-all in production, as OPEC members abandoned restraint in an effort to recapture their share of the market. In the process, prices collapsed from about 28 dlrs a barrel to below nine dlrs, until the organisation decided to cut production again from last September onwards.     Saudi output in 1985 had been the lowest since the 1960s.     Production of natural gas liquids in 1986 declined slightly to 304,178 bpd from 316,310, said the report, carried on the official Saudi Press Agency.     The increase in reserves came despite a sharp cut in the number of wells Aramco drilled to 33 in 1986 from 103 in 1985.      Aramco\'s only refinery, at Ras Tannurah, processed 142.44 mln barrels (390,246 bpd) of crude last year. The plant was upgraded to a capacity of 530,000 bpd during the year, enabling it to supply 50 pct of local demand for oil products, the report said.     The country\'s other five, smaller refineries -- owned by another state-owned oil organisation, Petromin -- produced around 750,000 bpd last year.      Sulphur production rose to 1.23 mln tonnes in 1986 from 998,707 tonnes in 1985. During the year the company began operating a sulphur granule plant with capacity of 4,000 tonnes per day, the report said.     Aramco said it awarded 1,303 contracts last year worth 1.4 billion riyals -- about 370 mln dlrs.   \n',crude
'Saudi Arabia\'s renegotiation of its collective agreement with Aramco to purchase oil for the latter\'s ex-partners is moving along and should lead to a fundamental structural change in the contract, oil industry sources said.     Petroleum Intelligence Weekly, in this Monday\'s edition, said negotiations are moving along for adjustment of the 1.34 mln bpd joint long term agreement at official prices and volumes and other terms may be rearranged.     The agreement signed in January for the months from February to June is up for renegotiation.     Under the January contract Aramco was to purchase 1.34 mln bpd for the four partners allocated among them as Exxon Corp XON 440,000 bpd, Texaco Inc TX 350,000 bpd, Mobil Corp MOB and Chevron Corp CHV 550,000 bpd between them.     But an overlifting by Texaco Inc in the first quarter allowed other companies like Exxon Corp to underlift its obligations under the contract     PIW said that that one alternative under consideration is to revert to four individual contracts rather than a collective agrement.     John Lichtblau, director of the Petroleum Industry Research Foundation Inc said that renegotiation of the pact was more of a formality as the Saudis have each company on a separate schedule although separate agreements with the companies would favor one on one negotiations and ensure that contracted liftings occur .     \"The companies will probably follow the Saudi wants within limits as they do not want to antagonize them for the long haul,\" he said.     Lichtblau said that the renegotiations would most likely concentrate on volume rather than price.     Saudi displeasure with the agreement has long been noted and in April industry publications said that renegotiation were being sought, a fact later confirmed bys with Aramco.     Aramco Corp was formerly owned by Chevron Corp CHV, Exxon Corp XON, Mobil Corp MOB and Texaco Inc TX but is now owned by Saudi Arabia which bought its assets although the ex-partners have various agreements with Saudi Arabia.  \n',crude
'The U.N. Security Council was called to a private meeting on Monday for consultations  following the United States attack on an Iranian oil platform.     Meanwhile, a U.N. spokesman said that as far as he knew a report to the council and Secretary General Javier Perez de Cuellar on the action had not been received from the Americans.     In Washington, President Reagan said the United Nations was being informed of the attack under the provision of the U.N. Charter regarding notification of actions taken under the right of self-defense.     The U.N. spokesman, Francois Giuliani, said Perez de Cuellar had no comment on the attack, taken in response to Iranian action against an American-owned tanker last week, but was trying to find out \"what actually happened.\"     Calls to Iran\'s U.N. commission elicited no response.  \n',crude
'The U.S. Senate on Tuesday backed President Reagan\'s retaliatory strike against Iranian targets in the Gulf as it moved to take a greater role in making policy in the volatile region.     Senators voted 92-1 for a non-binding measure that endorsed Monday\'s U.S. attack on two Iranian oil platforms in retaliation for an Iranian attack last Friday on a Kuwaiti ship flying the American flag.     The measure said the attack was a firm indication of U.S. resolve that Iran \"cannot take military action against the United States with impunity.\"     Earlier, the Senate cut off Republican stalling tactics and set a vote on a measure that could give Congress a larger role in making Gulf policy. The measure, however, does not require Reagan to comply with the 1973 War Powers Act, which could lead to a pullout of U.S. forces from the Gulf.     While Democrats and Republicans praised the U.S. retaliatory strike, many voiced new fears about the growing U.S. involvement in the Gulf and some demanded that Reagan comply with the War Powers Act.  \n',crude
'South Korea has increased its duty on crude oil imports to 4.29 dlrs a barrel from 3.29 dlrs, effective today, the energy ministry said.     The duty, to raise funds for special energy projects, was adjusted after average crude import prices rose to 16.85 dlrs a barrel in April, from 16.65 dlrs in March and 13.08 dlrs in April 1986, ministry officials said.     A separate 24.5 pct import tax on crude oil is unchanged.  \n',crude
'The Soviet oil production target for 1988 has been set at 625 mln tonnes, a rise of eight mln tonnes over this year\'s planned output.     Oil Minister Vasily Dinkov announced the figure on Tuesday at the Supreme Soviet, the country\'s nominal parliament.     He said a new development strategy, fuller use of oil deposits and better housing and pay for oilmen had allowed an upsurge in the oil industry after three years of stagnation which began in late 1983.     Last year the Soviet Union produced 615 mln tonnes of oil, slightly short of the target of 616.7 mln.     January-September figures released at the weekend showed Soviet oil output in the first nine months of this year at 467 mln tonnes. The 1987 target is 617 million.     Dinkov said the Soviet Union would develop 38 new oil deposits in the coming year. He called for speedier geolog prospecting across the country to spur the oil industry.     The Supreme Soviet convened on Monday to endorse the 1988 budget and plan. The session is expected to end on Tuesday.  \n',crude
'Kuwait has agreed to charter tankers from the Soviet Union in a move to protect its oil exports through the Mideast Gulf, diplomatic sources said.     They said the agreement followed months of talks with the Soviet Union and the U.S. On ways to secure its oil exports after Iran started to attack Kuwaiti-connected vessels in retaliation for Kuwait\'s backing for Iran\'s war enemy Iraq.     Diplomats said they expect three Soviet tankers initially to reinforce other flags already supporting Kuwait\'s 22-tanker fleet.     The diplomats said they knew of no deal for Moscow to provide a naval escort for its own vessels, but \"the idea of protection is implicit,\" one said.     They said Soviet cargo ships bound for Kuwait in the past to unload arms and materiel for road delivery to Iraq were known to have sailed under escort. So far, none of the Soviet ships are known to have been attacked by Iran. Diplomats said they expected the chartered Soviet tankers to sail between Kuwait and Khor Fakkan on the United Arab Emirates (UAE) coast a short way outside the Strait of Hormuz at the mouth of the Gulf.  \n',crude
'Ceylon Petroleum Corp (CPC) has decided to renew its one-year contract with Abu Dhabi for 480,000 tonnes of Upper Zakum crude oil, CPC officials tolds.     They said CPC made the recommendation to the cabinet and is now awaiting its approval.     CPC\'s one-year contract with Abu Dhabi expired on May 31 this year and it wants the renewed contract to begin on June 1 at the government selling price. Delivery will be determined in the course of the year. Last year, shipments were in three parcels of 120,000 tonnes each and four of 30,000 tonnes each.     CPC officials also said the company agreed with the Egyptian government for the supply of 240,000 tonnes of Gulf of Suez crude for delivery in two shipments this year at the government selling price.     Last year, CPC bought 120,000 tonnes Gulf of Suez through C.Itoh.     Officials said plans to buy 240,000 tonnes of Basra Light from Iraq have not been finalised yet because of several constraints. CPC said it could not accept 120,000 tonne parcels and proposed to lift 30,000 tonnes in eight shipments.     Iraq National Oil Co (INOC) told CPC a Red Sea port where lifting was to take place could not accept small ships. INOC then proposed to deliver eight shipments of 30,000 tonnes each.     CPC said INOC planned to ship the oil to an Indian port for delivery of Indian requirements, later going to Colombo to offload CPC\'s needs, but CPC considered this unsuitable.     CPC said it had not received a reply from INOC since December. Sri Lanka imports all its annual needs of 1.7 mln tonnes. This year it plans to buy 400,000 tonnes on the spot market compared with about 1.3 mln tonnes last year.  \n',crude
'Norwegian state oil company Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap (Statoil) signed contracts worth a total of 1.5 billion Norwegian crowns in connection with the development of the Veslefrikk oil field, Statoil said.     Moss Rosenberg Verft of Stavanger has been awarded a contract to convert the the drilling platform West Vision to a floating production platform. The work is to be completed in the summer of 1989.     Aker Verdal has been awarded a contract for the engineering, purchasing and construction of the steel jacket for the wellhead platform, also to be completed in 1989, Statoil said.  \n',crude
'Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap A/S (Statoil) STAT.OL, operator on Norway\'s North Sea Veslefrikk oil field, has placed field development contracts totalling 1.5 billion crowns with two domestic yards, the company said in a statement.     Moss Rosenberg Verft, a subsidiary of Kvaerner Industrier A/S KVIO.OL won a 1.2 billion crown contract to convert Statoil\'s semisubmersible rig West Vision to a floating production platform and to build the deck for a separate, fixed well-head platform to be placed on the field, it said.     Statoil said Aker Verdal, a unit of Aker Norcem A/S AMVO.OL, won a 300-mln crown contract to design and build the well-head platform\'s 10,000-tonne steel substructure, to stand in 150 metres of water next to the converted rig.     Statoil said using a floating production unit rather than a fixed platform would cut construction time, enabling field partners to bring Veslefrikk on stream in late 1989 -- several months earlier than previously planned.     Veslefrikk, with estimated recoverable reserves of 258 mln barrels oil and 140 billion cubic feet gas, is located 145 km west of Bergen.     Statoil estimates the field\'s total development cost, including drilling, at 6.6 billion crowns. Planned daily output is 65,000 barrels oil and 35 mln cubic feet gas.     Veslefrikk\'s oil will be landed via the nearby Oseberg field pipeline at the Sture crude terminal near Bergen. Its gas will be fed into the Statpipe line, which gathers gas from Norway\'s Statfjord, Gullfaks and Oseberg fields.     Partners on the field are Statoil, the operator, with a 55 pct share, Unocal Norge A/S (18 pct), Deminex (Norge) A/S (13.5 pct), Norsk Hydro A/S NHY.OL (nine pct) and Svenska Petroleum AB (4.5 pct).  \n',crude
'U.S. oil traders said Texaco Inc\'s filing for protection under the Chapter 11 bankruptcy code is adding uncertainty to an already skittish oil market, but opinions are divided on the impact to the market.     \"The filing is holding up wet barrel trading today,\" said one trader. \"Everyone is talking about it, assessing their company\'s situations in relation to Texaco,\" he added.      Some traders said companies that deal with Texaco are concerned about whether they will receive payment or supplies under the bankruptcy filing.     However, others were less worried. \"The first paid will be the trading community and those connected with Texaco in the shipping industry,\" one New York trader said.     \"If Texaco doesn\'t get crude supplies it can\'t run its refineries, so its other assets would not be worth anything,\" he added.     Texaco filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. bankruptcy code yesterday after failing to reach a settlement with Pennzoil on an 11 billion dlrs court award for illegally interferring with Pennzoil\'s proposed purchase of Getty Oil Co.     However, others were less worried. \"The first paid will be the trading community and those connected with Texaco in the shipping industry,\" one New York trader said.     \"If Texaco doesn\'t get crude supplies it can\'t run its refineries, so its other assets would not be worth anything,\" he added.     Texaco filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the U.S. bankruptcy code yesterday after failing to reach a settlement with Pennzoil on an 11 billion dlrs court award for illegally interferring with Pennzoil\'s proposed purchase of Getty Oil Co.     \"There is some reluctance to trade with Texaco but no great change,\" said another trader, adding that traders are tending toward prudence in their dealings with the company.     Traders are assessing whether to require cash prepayment or letters of credit, or to continue to trade as usual with Texaco on an open line basis, he said.     Another trader, however, described today\'s activity as business as usual, adding that traders feel more secure because no liens can be put on Texaco\'s assets while it is in bankruptcy.     Traders said there was no apparent effect of the Texaco filing on crude futures trading although they said the exchange might lower Texaco\'s position limit and require higher margins for Texaco\'s trades.     New York Mercantile Exchange President Rosemary McFadden declined to comment on Texaco\'s futures trading, saying that is is proprietary information. McFadden did say, however, that as a matter of procedure, it is possible the exchange can lower allowable position limits or increase margin requirements for companies that are in financial trouble.  \n',crude
'Turkey said today its disputes with Greece, including rights on the continental shelf in the Aegean Sea, should be solved through negotiations.     A Foreign Ministry statement said the latest crisis between the two NATO members stemmed from the continental shelf dispute and an agreement on this issue would effect the security, economy and other rights of both countries.     \"As the issue is basicly political, a solution can only be found by bilateral negotiations,\" the statement said. Greece has repeatedly said the issue was legal and could be solved at the International Court of Justice.     The two countries approached armed confrontation last month after Greece announced it planned oil exploration work in the Aegean and Turkey said it would also search for oil.     A face-off was averted when Turkey confined its research to territorrial waters. \"The latest crises created an historic opportunity to solve the disputes between the two countries,\" the Foreign Ministry statement said.     Turkey\'s ambassador in Athens, Nazmi Akiman, was due to meet Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou today for the Greek reply to a message sent last week by Turkish Prime Minister Turgut Ozal. The contents of the message were not disclosed.  \n',crude
'Energy Secretary Donald Hodel said he expects oil prices to rise significantly by the year 2000, probably to around 33 dlrs a barrel in current dollars.     \"I do anticipate a significant increase (by 2000). Thirty-three dlrs a barrel is not unreasonable,\" Hodel told the Senate Energy Committee.     Hodel said the loss of some domestic oil production through the shutdown of stripper (10 barrels a day or less) wells because of low prices was probably permanent. He said he was also concerned by the decline in domestic oil exploration.     Hodel urged Congress to approve oil exploration in section 1002 of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge in Alaska. He said geologic condtions in the area were favorable for the discovery of oil fields equal to those in nearby Prudhoe Bay.  \n',crude
'U.S. warships destroyed an Iranian oil platform in the Gulf on Monday and the Navy also raided a second oil rig in retaliation for Friday\'s Iranian missile attack on a U.S. flag tanker, the Pentagon said.     President Reagan and Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger warned Iran of even stronger countermeasures if the military escalation between the two countries continued in the volatile waterway.     Reagan said he ordered the strike on the first platform by four U.S. destroyers, which fired about 1,000 five-inch shells at the Rostam oil rig 120 miles east of Bahrain in the central Gulf.     A short time later, Navy personnel boarded a second Iranian oil platform about five miles to the north and destroyed radar and communications equipment before leaving the structure, the Pentagon said.      Defense Department spokesman Fred Hoffman told reporters that the second platform had been abandoned by Iranian personnel during the shelling and destruction of the first rig.     The United States said both platforms were being used to keep track of Gulf merchant shipping and to launch speedboat attacks on such shipping by Iranian Revolutionary guards.  \n',crude
'The United States\' dependency on foreign oil sources may reach record levels by the mid-1990s, according to John H. Lichtblau, president of Petroleum Industry Research Associates.     Lichtblau, speaking at an alternative energy conference here, said the U.S. may depend on foreign suppliers for as much as 52 pct of its oil by 1995, surpasssing the previous high level of 47 pct in 1977.     \"The long term growth in dependency on foreign oil is inevitable,\" Lichtblau said. As much as 30 pct of U.S. oil imports in 1995 could come from OPEC nations, he said.     Lichtblau said the U.S. depended on foreign suppliers for 33 pct of its oil in 1986 and predicted that would increase to 40 pct by 1990.     \"However, the rate of this growth can be affected positively or negatively through government action or inaction,\" Lichtblau said.     He said that one of the government\'s negative actions is the maintenance of the windfall profits tax which acts as a disincentive to developing existing fields and reduces cash flow for oil exploration.     Lichtblau called for the adoption of an international floor price for crude oil to help stabilize world oil prices.     \"An international floor price adopted by all or most industrial countries would clearly be a much more effective measure and would be much less distortive for the U.S. than if we imposed it alone,\" Lichtblau said.     Development of alternate energy sources such as synthetic fuels as well as increased development in Alaska could lessen U.S. dependency on foreign oil, Lichtblau said.     A potential for alternative supplies could limit the willingness of OPEC nations to raise oil prices, he said.     Lichtblau also called for the federal government to offer tax abatements for oil drilling, to fill the Strategic Petroleum Reserve at a faster rate and to develop pilot plans for alternative energy.  \n',crude
'U.S. crude oil prices are at their highest level in more than a year ahead of next week\'s OPEC meeting, even though most industry analysts do not expect any policy changes from the session.     They said prices, which have steadily climbed since the organization\'s accord in December, have risen on technical factors within the market and concerns about supplies because of the Iran-Iraq war, which could disrupt deliveries from the Gulf.     The U.S. benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate is trading around 20.55 dlrs in the July contract on New York Mercantile Exchange\'s energy futures and in the spot market. That is its highest level since January 1986.     OPEC conference president Rilwanu Lukman, who is Nigeria\'s oil minister, said Friday he expects the meeting in Vienna to be brief and calm and that OPEC\'s current price and production agreement may only need a slight review.     Although most industry experts expect just a reaffirmation of the December agreement, oil prices continue to climb due to a desire to hedge positions in case of any surprises.     Analysts expect the higher prices to continue until soon after the OPEC meeting. At that point, barring any increased tension in the Gulf or changes in OPEC\'s policies, prices should begin easing.     \"OPEC will probably not do anything it hasn\'t already agreed to in December because oil prices are firm,\" said John Hill, a vice president at Merrill Lynch Futures.     OPEC agreed in December to maintain official oil prices at 18 dlrs a barrel and raise the group\'s production ceiling to 16.6 mln barrels per day in the third quarter and to 18.3 mln barrels in the fourth quarter.     This agreement helped send prices sharply higher, rising from 15 dlrs a barrel in early December.     Several OPEC members who are price hawks, including Iran, Algeria and Libya, will seek a higher official price and a reduction in output.     \"And if U.S. West Texas Intermediate crude continues to trade above 20 dlrs a barrel, there is a greater chance that OPEC will raise its official 18 dlrs price,\" said Nauman Barakat, analyst at Smith Barney, Harris Upham and Co.     But most analysts expect the more moderate producers, such as Saudi Arabia, to block any changes in policy.     \"The meeting will be a non-event with no change in the official prices because OPEC, and in particular the Saudis, are committed to stabilizing the market,\" said Rosario Ilacqua, analyst with L.F. Rothschild.     However, some analysts said OPEC may need to hold a meeting in September to re-evaluate market conditions.     Overproduction by OPEC will become a real problem in the fourth quarter when the quota is raised to 18.3 mln barrels a day and Iraq\'s pipeline through Turkey brings another 500,000 barrels to the market each day, said John Lichtblau, president of Petroleum Industry Ressearch Foundation.     Most expect Saudi Arabia to oppose a price increase at this meeting but many look for an increase by year-end to 20 dlrs to offset the decline in the dollar. Oil prices are denominated throughout the world in dollars, so as the currency declines, producers receive less money for their oil.     \"The only real production restraint in OPEC is Saudi Arabia,\" said Sanford Margoshes, analyst at Shearson Lehman Brothers.     \"In the second half of the year we expect the Saudis not to produce at their 4.1 mln barrel a day quota and therefore act as a vehicle to stablize the market and pave the way for a two dlrs a barrel price increase at the December 1987 meeting,\" he said.     One uncertain factor is the course of the Iran-Iraq war.     \"The wild card is the increased tensions in the Persian Gulf,\" said Frank Knuettel, analyst with Prudential-Bache Securites.     Oil tankers taking oil from Iraq and Kuwait have been regular targets for Iranian planes. The Reagan administration is planning to put Kuwait tankers under the protection of the U.S. flag, with naval escorts.     \"Extra (oil) inventories are needed during a time of crisis like this, and just general nervousness over an incident that could disrupt oil supplies drives prices up,\" Knuettel said.  \n',crude
'The United States invoked the right of self-defense in destroying an Iranian oil platform in the Gulf, the American delegation told the United Nations.     Lieutenant General Vernon Walters sent letters about the incident to Security Council President Maurizio Bucci, the delegate of Italy, and Secretary General Javier Perez de Cuellar.     U.N. press secretary Francois Giuliani said the Secretary General had no comment on the attack, which followed his appeal last Friday for restraint in the crisis while he pursued efforts to obtain a ceasefire between Iran and Iraq.     In his explanation, Walters said the United States took defensive action in response to an Iranian attack against American ships in the Gulf.     He cited an Iranian Silkworm missile strike last Friday in Kuwait waters against the United States-flag ship Sea Isle City.     Walters said that military forces on the destroyed Iranian platform had engaged in a variety of actions against United States-flag and other nonbelligerent vessels and planes.     \"In accordance with Article 51 of the United Nations (Charter), I wish, on behalf of my government, to report that United States forces have exercised the inherent right of self-defense under internation law by taking defensive action in response to attacks by . . . Iran against United States vessels in the Gulf,\" Walters said.     Members of the Security Council met behind closed doors on Monday to discuss developments in the Gulf war, but no statement was issued afterwards.  \n',crude
'UAE Oil Minister Mana Said al-Oteiba arrived in Alexandria last night for a visit to Egypt, the national Middle East News Agency (MENA) said.     It said Oteiba, who had just attended the OPEC ministerial meeting in Vienna, would stay for several days but gave no details.     Non-OPEC Egypt has pledged to restrain output to support OPEC\'s moves to boost oil prices. Oil Minister Abdel Hadi Kandeel last week said Egypt plans to leave its oil production of 870,000 barrels per day unchanged for the next five years. Egypt is able to produce up to one mln bpd.  \n',crude
'Union Texas Petroleum said its worldwide proved reserves fell to 511 mln barrels of oil equivalent at the end of 1986 from 555 mln barrels reported in 1985.     In its newly released annual report, Union Texas said it replaced about 71 pct of its production of 56 mln barrels of oil equivalent last year after taking into account the sale of 27 mln barrels of U.S. reserves.     Union Texas, the nation\'s largest independent oil and gas producer based on revenues, is a privately-held company owned by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and Co and Allied-Signal Inc ALD.     The Houston-based company said it lost 57.5 mln dlrs on 1.26 billion dlrs in sales last year, compared to profits of 165 mln dlrs on 2.04 billion dlrs in sales in 1985.     Union Texas said it received an average of 13.35 dlrs per barrel for its international oil production and 2.99 dlrs per mcf for its foreign natural gas sales. The majority of the company\'s total energy production is in the United Kingdom, Indonesia and Pakistan.     In the United States, Union Texas said it completed evaluation work on its oil find in Alaska\'s Colville Delta area.     \"Although significant oil reserves were confirmed, development of this discovery will not be economical without substantially higher prices,\" the company said.     Union Texas said it planned to spend about 42 mln dlrs over the next two years to develop its Eugene Island Block 371 in the Gulf of Mexico.     In 1987, the company said it budgeted 178 mln dlrs for capital spending, less than half of the amount spent in 1985 and down from 199 mln dlrs budgeted last year. Union Texas also said it would seek acquisitions of oil and gas properties as well as petrochemical-related businesses.  \n',crude
'The State Department says many U.S. diplomatic missions overseas are on high alert for possible retaliation from Iran for Monday\'s attack on two Iranian oil platforms by American forces in the Gulf.     At the same time, the Pentagon announced on Tuesday that U.S. forces have begun escorting another Kuwaiti tanker convoy southward through the Gulf from Kuwait.     The State Department renewed its warning to Americans not to travel to Iran because of what spokeswoman Phyllis Oakley called, \"its virulent anti-American policies and support for terrorism.\"     \"The threat to Americans has increased significantly,\" she said in announcing that the department was reiterating advice it last made in January. The department said about 2,600 American citizens live in Iran, the overwhelming majority dual nationalities.     Oakley said no specific warning has been issued to U.S. diplomats and Americans living abroad in the aftermath of the U.S. attack on the oil drilling platforms, but \"many of our missions are on a high state of alert.\"  \n',crude
'U.S. military planners ruled out Iran\'s Silkworm missiles as a target in the retaliatory attack mounted on Monday for fear of being drawn more deeply into the Iran-Iraq war, defense and Middle East experts said.     U.S. naval forces destroyed an offshore oil platform and raided another in what the administration called a \"measured and appropriate response\" to an Iranian Silkworm missile attack last Friday on a U.S.-flagged tanker in Kuwaiti waters.     Private analysts generally agreed that going after the rig rather than an onshore economic or military target such as Silkworm launch sites reflected a careful bid by Washington to limit the political, military and diplomatic fallout both at home and in the Gulf.     \"It simply demonstrated the United States will take military action when they (Iran) take military action,\" Norman Polmar, a defense analyst and author, said.     He said hitting the platforms had spared Iran the embarrassment of casualties on its own soil, possibly avoiding an escalating spiral of attack and counterattack.     In addition, it minimized the risk to U.S. forces and the potential embarrassment of any losses, including aircraft that could have been shot down had they taken part in an attack.     Anthony Cordesman, author of a new book on the Iran-Iraq war, said the United States apparently chose a limited target to keep alive the possibility that U.N. Secretary General Javier Perez de Cuellar might still persuade Iran to accept a Security Council call for a ceasefire.     \"We want the U.N. peace initiative to work if there\'s any chance at all,\" he said, adding that the action made it clear tougher steps would follow if Iran to attack Gulf shipping.     In targeting an oil rig -- albeit one said by the Pentagon to have been turned into a military command post -- Washington also sent a message that it might be willing to attack Iran\'s economic lifeline. Pentagon officials said the platform had been used as a base for Iranian raids against shipping in the lower Gulf.     \"We have chosen a military target, but we also have shown Iran that we are willing to interfere with its oil-exporting capabilities,\" Cordesman said.     He predicted the United States would respond to any future major Iranian challenges by hitting Iran\'s naval base at Bandar Abbas on the Straits of Hormuz, followed by mining the approaches to Iran\'s oil export terminal on Kharg Island.     Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger said on Monday the United States did not seek further confrontation with Iran, \"but we will be prepared to meet any escalation of military action by Iran with stronger countermeasures.\"   \n',crude
'Venezuela will back Ecuador\'s bid to raise its OPEC quota above 221,000 barrels per day (bpd) because it is a justifiable demand, Venezuelan Energy Minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said on Monday.     He told reporters the country deserved a higher quota in compensation for the five months it was forced to suspend oil production when its main pipeline was destroyed by an earthquake last March.     \"For this five-month period, Ecuador did not exercise its right to produce 221,000 bpd,\" he said. \"We should recognize Ecuador\'s right to increase its quota ... There is a basis of justice in that country\'s petition.\"     He added however, the quota increase should be gradual to avoid harming the market, he added.     Hernandez Grisanti said he understood Ecuador would formally submit the request for a higher quota at the next ministerial conference of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) opening December 9 in Vienna.  \n',crude
'Venezuela\'s government tomorrow presents a 1988 budget proposal for 183.432 billion bolivars, based upon an oil price of 16.35 dlrs per barrel, finance minister Manuel Azpurua said.     Azpurua told reporters after a cabinet meeting the new budget projects ordinary income of 149.925 billion bolivars and extraordinary income of 34.186 billion. Oil revenues are expected to produce 92.014 billion, or 61 pct of the total.     The finance minister said the oil revenue projection is based on an average price of 16.35 dlrs per barrel in 1988. Venezuelan oil through the first half of 1987 has averaged 16. 20 dlrs per barrel, according to the state oil company Petroleos de Venezuela, S.A.  \n',crude
'World oil prices would remain stable despite the U.S. Attack against Iranian oil platforms and growing tension in the Gulf, Venezuelan Energy Minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti said on Monday.     He described the situation as \"extremely tense,\" but said Gulf military activity would not significantly affect prices because supply and demand were roughly equal.     Demand for OPEC crude in the final quarter of 1987 was 18.5 mln barrels per day (bpd) and the group\'s members were now pumping above 18 mln bpd, he told a news conference.     Hernandez Grisanti said the supply/demand balance was precarious and prices were in danger of falling from their current average of about 18 dlrs per barrel if overproduction continued.     Three or four members of the 13-nation Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries were \"overproducing in an exaggerated manner\" above their assigned quotas, he said.     OPEC\'s overall ceiling is 16.6 mln bpd.  \n',crude
'Oil prices would skyrocket for a time if conflict in the Gulf closed the Strait of Hormuz, but oil supplies could be adjusted to take care of world demand, Indonesian Energy Minister Subroto said.     He made no explicit reference to the latest U.S. Military action in the Gulf.     But in an address to a conference of the Indonesian Petroleum Association, he said, \"If worst comes to worst and say the flow of oil through the Straits of Hormuz is completely shut off, I believe the world oil supply, given time to adjust, can take care of the situation.\"     \"But this is not to say that prices, at least for a short duration, will not skyrocket as speculators take advantage of the situation,\" he declared.     Tensions in the Gulf, however, usually had a relatively short-term impact on prices, he added.     Assessing future price trends, he said, \"Short-term spot prices will probably still fluctuate, but they will most likely hover around the official Opec price basket of 18 dlrs per barrel.     \"The upward deviations, however, are likely to be greater than the downward ones.\"     \"The balance between supply and demand in the short term will still be delicate,\" he added. \"Non-Opec production may still go up, competing with Opec for the expected additional increase in world demand.\"     Subroto, a member of Opec\'s three-man quota committee which has been touring cartel members, said speculation may play havoc with spot prices, but Opec was trying to stabilize the situation by urging cooperation by non-Opec producers.     In the medium term, non-Opec production would reach a plateau in the early 1990s, leaving Opec much stronger, he said.  \n',crude
'Distillate fuel stocks held in primary storage were unchanged in the week ended April three at 106.9 mln barrels, the Energy Information Administration (EIA) said.     In its weekly petroleum status report, the Department of Energy agency said gasoline stocks were off 200,000 barrels in the week to 248.1 mln barrels and refinery crude oil stocks rose 6.3 mln barrels to 335.8 mln.     The EIA said residual fuel stocks fell 100,000 barrels to 38.1 mln barrels and crude oil stocks in the Strategic Petroleum Reserve (SPR) rose 1.1 mln barrels to 520.0 mln.     The total of all crude, refined product and SPR stocks rose 9.4 mln barrels to 1,561.1, it said.  \n',gas
'Esso Singapore Pte Ltd said it raised pump prices of petrol from today.     New prices for 0.15 gm lead grades are 97.0 cents/litre for 97 octane and 90.8 cents for 95 octane.     Other Singapore oil companies announced yesterday that they would revise their pump prices effective today.     Shell Eastern Petroleum Pte Ltd, Mobil Oil Singapore Pte Ltd, Caltex Asia Ltd, Singapore Petroleum Co Pte Ltd and BP Singapore Pte Ltd are pricing 97 octane at 96.8 cents. Shell, Mobil and Caltex are pricing 92 octane at 90.2 cents, and SPC and BP at 90.6 cents.  \n',gas
'Finland\'s national oil company Neste Oy NEOY.HE said in a statement it had agreed with Canadian firms to study the feasibility of building a plant in Edmonton, Canada, to produce a replacement for lead in petrol.     The prospective plant would cost an estimated 270 mln Canadian dlrs and would produce methyl tertiary butyl ether (MTBE) from raw materials available locally, it said.     The partners in the study are Neste Oy, Celanese Canada Inc, Hoechst Celanese Corporation and Trade Mountain Pipe Line Company Ltd, of Vancouver, B.C.     The Edmonton site was suitable because of the raw materials availability, the proximity to pipeline transportation and the important capital and operating advantages gained by locating on an existing Celanese Canada site, the statement said.     The partners would look into the feasibility of a plant producing 500,000 tonnes per annum of MTBE, an octane enhancer that can replace tetra ethyl lead.     Most of the MTBE would be targeted for the United States where lead levels in gasoline are being lowered because of health concerns, the statement added.     Canadian lead limits are currently 11 times as high as the U.S. Limit but lead is scheduled for virtual elimination in Canada by 1993, which should create a Canadian demand for MTBE, it said.     Finland\'s Neste Oy, whose turnover last year was over five billion dlrs, has extensive experience with MTBE. It has a major investment in an MTBE plant in Saudi Arabia.     The Edmonton, Alberta plant would be scheduled to go on stream in late 1989, the statement said.  \n',gas
'Japanese oil companies are starting campaigns to market 100 octane gasoline to meet growing domestic demand for higher quality motor fuel, oil sources said.     Ten companies plan to offer the unleaded gasoline this summer, starting with Idemitsu Kosan Co Ltd on June 20.     Showa Shell Sekiyu KK SHOL.T introduced its Formula Shell 98 octane gasoline to the Japanese market in January this year.     Formula Shell has achieved strong sales in Japan despite a higher price than regular octane gasoline, which has prompted other oil firms to offer a rival product, the sources said.     \"We have received a good response from consumers of Formula Shell in terms of a smoother ride and effective fuel consumption,\" Showa Shell said.     Shell\'s product sells for 145 yen per litre, 15 yen higher than regular gasoline, and has already achieved a 38 pct share of Japan\'s high octane gasoline market, it said.     High octane gasoline accounts for 25 pct of Shell\'s total gasoline sales in Japan, it added.     Idemitsu said it hopes to raise high octane sales to 20 pct of its total gasoline sales from about seven pct, immediately after the launch of its Idemitsu 100.     Nippon Oil Co Ltd NPOL.T said it will launch its 100 octane gasoline on July 1, aiming for an increase in high octane sales to 20 pct from six pct of its total gasoline sales.     The rush to compete for high octane gasoline market share has been spurred by expectations that the government will lift gasoline production quotas and restrictions on gasoline station construction in the next two to three years.     \"Major oil companies are trying to boost their gasoline sales network ahead of the proposed lifting of gasoline production quotas,\" an official at a major oil company said.     An advisory panel to the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) recommended this week that the government press ahead with deregulation of the oil industry, including the lifting of gasoline production quotas, to help oil companies increase their international competitiveness.     Japan\'s three biggest gasoline marketers, Nippon Oil, Idemitsu and Showa Shell, suffered supply shortages under the production quota guideline in fiscal 1986, ended last March.     Domestic gasoline demand during the year was up 2.5 pct from the previous year, according to a MITI report.  \n',gas
'Singapore Petroleum Co Pte Ltd said it will raise posted prices for its products from June 19, by one cent/gallon for lpg, naphtha and gasoline, two cents for gas oil and by 60 cents/barrel for marine diesel oil.     New prices are - lpg 36.0 cents/gallon, chemical naphtha 47, unleaded reformate 65.8, 0.4 gm lead 97 octane 61.3, 95 octane 59.3, 92 octane 55.5, 85 octane 49.5, 0.125 gm lead 97 octane 64.3, 92 octane 58.5, 85 octane 52.5, jet kerosene 51.5, kerosene 50.5, premium kerosene 54.5, dual purpose kerosene 52.5, 0.5 pct sulphur gas oil 52.0, one pct sulphur 51.0 and marine diesel oil 21.20 dlrs/barrel.  \n',gas
'U.S. analysts expect the American Petroleum Institute\'s weekly report on oil inventories to show a slight build in U.S. stocks of gasoline for the week ended May 29, oil traders and analysts said.     While the consensus is for an increase, a few would not rule out the possibility of an decline. Traders said that barring any surprises in tonight\'s report, they expect the report to be neutral to bearish for oil prices.     Heating oil stocks are also likely to build and runs to be steady to slightly higher, which could add pressure on oil prices, the analysts said.     Crude oil was seen likely to build assuming imports continue at relatively high levels.     Analysts expect gasoline stocks to rise 500,000 to two mln barrels above the 234 mln reported for May 22.     Peter Beutel, oil analyst with Elders Futures inc, who looks for a build said, \"We have had five weeks of gasoline demand at 7.3 mln bpd or more and it is likely to taper off to between 6.7-7.0 mln bpd, which should make stocks build. Demand would have to stay above 7.0 mln bpd to have a draw,\" he added.     Rising demand is why oil traders and analysts expect a draw in stocks of about of about one mln barrels.         The U.S. Energy Information Administration in its latest report for the four weeks ending may 22 said that gasoline demand was up 4.4 pct to 7.3 mln bpd from the previous year.     But analysts said hopes of reduced stocks is likely to founder on increased runs in refineries, which could be up 0.3 pct above May 22\'s 81.2 pct capacity operated.     Such an increase would raise runs about 100,000 bpd and add to U.S. stocks.     But some analysts said that refiners may have held refinery runs.     Heating oil stocks were also expected to build between 700,000 barrels and one mln from the 96 mln barrel level reported last week, but a rise in distillate stocks was discounted as having a market impact at this time.     \"A build is seasonal now and not out of line with last year,\" one futures analyst said.     Analysts said they also expect crude oil stocks to build between 1.5 mln barrels and three mln from the 325 mln barrels reported by API for the week of may 22.     The consensus appears for about two mln barrels to be added to the nation\'s inventory.  \n',gas
'Kuwait\'s oil-reliant and debt-ridden economy has started to pull out of a nosedive but oil prices will determine the pace of recovery, bankers and economists say.     Crucial will be the ability of the 13-member OPEC to hold oil prices around a new benchmark of 18 dlrs a barrel in the northern hemisphere summer when demand usually slackens.     Bankers estimate the economy, measured in terms of gross domestic product (gdp), shrank 19 pct in real terms last year after contracting 8.1 pct the year before.     This was after taking into account inflation in consumer prices of 1.5 pct in 1985, slowing to 1.0 pct in 1986.     Factors depressing economic activity include the 6-1/2-year-old Iran-Iraq war on Kuwait\'s doorstep, which threatens the emirate\'s vital oil export lifeline through the Gulf and has sapped business confidence.     But sentiment received a much-needed boost in September when, after a series of piecemeal steps to combat a debt crisis caused by the 1982 crash of local stock market, a comprehensive new debt settlement program was introduced.     The share crash, result of a speculative spree in forward trading, left 95 billion dlrs of post-dated cheques in default.     The cheques were also used as collateral for consumer spending, thus generating an informal credit system.     Much of the debt has been watered down but big sums are still owed by individuals and companies.     There was some 4.4 billion dinars (about 15.7 billion dlrs) in outstanding bank credit at the end of 1986, of which one-quarter to one-third was estimated by bankers to rank as bad or doubtful debt. But the government has repeatedly said it will not allow any banks to go under.     The new debt settlement scheme entails a rescheduling of problem credit over 10 to 15 years, depending on whether debtors have regular cash flows or not.     Banks\' shareholders and depositors will have their rights guaranteed by the government -- an edict of vital significance in a country of only 1.7 mln people where the financial sector is the biggest after oil.     Kuwait is better placed than any other OPEC country to ride out the oil glut, bankers and economists say.     Kuwait has an OPEC quota of 948,000 barrels per day (bpd) compared with production capacity of 4.0 mln bpd mentioned last year by Oil Minister Sheikh Ali al-Khalifa al-Sabah.     But strategic diversification into downstream operations in Europe several years ago and a hefty refining investment at home gives it guaranteed markets abroad and enables it to sell over one-half of its output as high-grade refined oil products.     Oil industry sources say Kuwait is able to get an average 2.00 dlrs a barrel more by selling oil in the form of processed product such as gas oil, kerosene and naphtha, rather than as crude.     Bankers say the rebound in oil prices is the major reason for cautious optimism. Other reasons are low domestic inflation, a bottoming out of the fall in imports in recent years and signs government spending on productive sectors will remain steady.     External accounts are in good shape, with an estimated 1.8 billion dinar current account surplus in 1986, 16 pct below that for 1985, but still an achievement in the recession-hit Gulf.     Kuwait\'s petrodollar reserves in mid-1986 were put officially at over 80 billion dlrs, earning investment income of the equivalent of about 3.65 billion dlrs a year.     But for the first time since the end of the oil boom, these reserves may not be enough to prevent a \"real\" budget deficit for the 1986/87 fiscal year ending June 30, bankers say.     In a budget portrayed by bankers as mildly contractionary, revenues for 1986/87 were cut 38.6 pct and spending 11 pct, doubling the nominal deficit to 1.33 billion dinars.     This left out income from state reserves, usually excluded in official budget accounting, which are forecast by bankers at up to 1.0 billion dinars in 1986/87, resulting in some shortfall.     Bankers say it is too early to venture a forecast for economic growth this year or next.     \"It depends on oil prices,\" one said. \"This summer is important.\"     Cabinet Affairs Minister Rashid al-Rashid said last Sunday the cabinet has ratified recommendations to rationalise state spending in favour of productive sectors and reactivate the economy.     He gave no details but bankers say these are expected to be spelled out in the 1987/88 budget, possibly in June.  \n',gnp
'Sri Lanka today ordered its armed forces to defend the island\'s territorial waters as India prepared to send a flotilla with relief supplies that Colombo says it does not want for the Tamils in the Jaffna peninsula.     The sudden crisis between Sri Lanka and its giant neighbour deepened as Prime Minister Ranasinghe Premadasa told parliament: \"We have our territorial limits and nobody can be allowed to trespass there ...     \"President (Junius) Jayewardene has ordered the army, navy and air force to protect the island and its territorial waters,\" Premadasa said to a round of applause from the house.     In New Delhi an Indian spokesman said the plan to send a flotilla of 20 small unarmed boats with Red Cross supplies to Jaffna tomorrow would go ahead despite Colombo\'s objections.     The confrontation was the latest result of the long and bitter conflict between Sri Lanka\'s Buddhist Sinhalese majority and the Hindu Tamil minority, which has strong ethnic and cultural links with India\'s 50 mln Tamils.  \n',ship
'Iranian foreign minister Ali Akbar Velayati warned that Iran would combat any superpower intervention in the Gulf.     \"Iran, which is the most powerful (country) in the Gulf... Will not allow the superpowers or any other foreign forces to interfere in the region,\" he said.     Velayati, visiting the United Arab Emirates on the first leg of a Gulf tour, told reporters Iran had the \"capabilities and means\" to prevent any interference. President Reagan has pledged to keep the Gulf sealanes open and to protect Kuwaiti tankers from possible Iranian attack.  \n',ship
'Iran said U.S. Naval forces attacked two of its oil platforms in the southern Gulf on Monday afternoon, the Iranian news agency IRNA reported.     IRNA, received in Nicosia, said an informed source at the Iranian oil ministry identified the two platforms as Resalat and Reshadat, about 60 miles from Iran\'s Lavan island oil storage site.     Regional shipping sources earlier said three Iranian offshore oil sites at Sassan, Rostam and Rakhsh had been attacked at 7.00 A.M. (0300 GMT) on Monday by unidentified aircraft.     In Washington, U.S. Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger said four U.S. Destroyers attacked and destroyed an Iranian oil platform about 120 miles east of Bahrain.  \n',ship
'A top Iranian military official said America\'s attack on an Iranian oil platform on Monday had involved the United States in full-scale war and Iran would avenge it with a \"crushing blow.\"     \"The United States has entered a swamp from which it can in no way get out safely,\" the Iranian news agency IRNA quoted the head of Iran\'s war information headquarters as saying.     The official, Kamal Kharrazi, said Washington had now become involved in what he called a full-fledged war with Iran.     It was the first official Iranian reaction to the attack by four U.S. Navy destroyers on the Reshadat oil platform.  \n',ship
'Italian Prime Minister Giovanni Goria told the cabinet on Monday he was worried about the increased tension in the Gulf, but said America\'s retaliation against Iran had been limited.     A statement issued after a cabinet meeting said Goria had been informed by the United States that it would take action against an Iranian target in the Gulf, but had not known beforehand that the action would involve an attack on an oil platform.     \"The prime minister expressed his concern over the possible consequences of increased tension in the Gulf, at the same time recognizing the limited character of the American military reaction to the attacks it has suffered in the past few days,\" the statement said.     Goria said Italy\'s own ships were far from the platform at the time of the attack and the fleet had been advised to follow events with caution.     Italy has sent eight ships, including three frigates and three minesweepers, to the Gulf to protect Italian merchant shipping there.  \n',ship
'Japan was ready to use diplomacy to help maintain the security of the Gulf, Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone said.     But he told reporters Japan should not cut its lines of communication with Iran and Iraq because its policy was to take a broad political stance. Officials of the foreign ministry said Japan had maintained good relations with both Iran and Iraq, which have been at war since September 1980.     Last week Nakasone ruled out Japanese military or financial help to patrol the waters of the Gulf. About 60 pct of Japan\'s crude oil passes through the waterway.     President Reagan said yesterday the threat to oil routes in the Gulf from attacks by Iran and Iraq was high on the agenda for next week\'s G-7 summit in Venice.     Reagan has approved plans for the United States to step up its naval presence in the Gulf despite congressional expressions of concern and he has called on U.S. Allies to help maintain freedom of navigation.     Japan\'s constitution prevents its armed forces from being deployed overseas. Nakasone has said that Washington understands this problem.  \n',ship
'Kuwait, a target of Iranian anger over the emirate\'s backing for Iraq in the Gulf war, today rejected charges that fishing vessels seized recently by Iran were spy boats.     \"There are no bases of truth to the contents of the Iranian accusation on the nature of the operations of the vessels recently taken into custody by Iran. These vessels were out fishing,\" the Foreign Ministry said in a statement.     It said Iranian Charge d\'Affaires Mohammad Baqeri was summoned by the Ministry yesterday to confer with Foreign Undersecretary Suleiman Majed al-Shaheen.     The Iranian News Agency IRNA said on Sunday Iran had seized seven Kuwaiti speed boats and detained their crew, who confessed to spying for Iraq under the cover of fishing.     It said the boats were intercepted in the Khur Abdullah waterway which separates Kuwait and Iraq\'s Faw peninsula at the head of the Gulf, captured by Iran last year.     The Kuwaiti response came as Iranian envoys toured Gulf Arab states saying responsibility for security and stability in the waterway was a regional matter. A U.S. Senate team was scheduled today to meet Kuwait\'s Crown Prince and Prime Minister Sheikh Saad al-Abdulla al-Sabah and the defence and oil ministers.     Today\'s Foreign Ministry statement, carried by the Kuwait News Agency KUNA, said the recent detention of Kuwaiti fishing vessels by Iran was not the first.     Tehran in the past had held back a number of vessels Kuwait had sought to release through diplomatic contacts, it said.     \"However, Kuwait is perplexed that this time the Iranian charges are accompanied by accusations that the vessels were undertaking espionage activities,\" it said.     Shaheen condemned the detentions and accusations, and asked Tehran to free all fishing boats and sailors held by Iran, the statement said.  \n',ship
'House Speaker Jim Wright predicted passage of legislation requiring the Reagan administration to provide Congress with a report on its Mideast Gulf policy, but a last-minute revolt by an alliance of liberals and conservatives left the bill\'s fate in doubt.     The legislation was written in the wake of the May 17th Iraqi missile attack on the U.S. frigate Stark in the Gulf, which killed 37 Americans, and President Reagan\'s decision to protect 11 Kuwaiti oil tankers by putting them under U.S. flags -- effectively making them American ships.     Since the administration made known its reflagging plans, congressional leaders complained they had not been consulted, and some charged the policy could lead the United States into the 6 1/2-year-old war between Iran and Iraq.     The House was to vote today on a bill -- supported by the Democratic and Republican congressional leadership and the administration -- which demanded a report within seven days on plans to meet the security needs of U.S. forces in the gulf.     The resolution was expected to pass without controversy today in the House Foreign Affairs Committee before the full House was to take up the bill. But in a surprise move, liberal Democrats and conservative Republicans on the committee joined in an unusual alliance to oppose the resolution.     Liberal Democrats said a lack of any restrictions in the bill implied consent to Reagan\'s policies.  \n',ship
'Secretary of State George Shultz said today that a boost in allied forces in the Mideast Gulf was not vital to protect shipping against attack but that possible allied contributions should be examined.     Asked if he saw the need for a greater military presence by the allies in the gulf, Shultz told reporters, \"Not necessarily, particularly, so.\"     But he said an adequate force was needed to deter attack and noted that the British and the French, as well as the United States, maintained naval contingents there.     \"We have to look at things that others might do,\" he said.  \n',ship
'A U.S. Defense Department spokesman said he had no information on London oil and stock market rumors that the United States had launched a retaliatory strike against Iran for an attack on Friday that damaged a U.S. shi     \"I don\'t have anything,\" Major Randy Morger said. \"I have no information at all.\"     President Reagan said on Sunday he had already made a decision on the U.S. response to Friday\'s Iran attack but would not say what the decision was.     Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger said on Saturday the attack on a U.S.-flagged ship in Kuwaiti waters on Friday was almost certainly by an Iran Silkworm missile.     Some of the rumors in the London markets were that the United States had launched an offshore strike against Iranian missile installations.  \n',ship
'President Reagan said he would discuss the Mideast Gulf situation with allied leaders at next week\'s Venice economic summit and hinted he would seek their help in preserving free navigation.     In a speech prepared for delivery as the United States made plans to protect 11 Kuwaiti oil tankers from Iranian attack, Reagan said the American people were aware that \"it is not our interests alone that are being protected.\"     Saying that allied dependence on gulf oil was no secret, Reagan declared, \"During the upcoming summit in Venice, we will be discussing the common security interests shared by the western democracies in the MIDEAST Gulf.     \"The future belongs to the brave. Free men should not cower before such challenges, and they should not expect to stand alone.\"     Reagan will meet the leaders of Britain, France, West Germany, Italy, Canada and Japan at the economic summit, which will take place in Venice June 8-10.         The 13th annual top-level meeting of the major industrial democracies will take place against a backdrop of rising congressional concern over Reagan\'s plan to protect gulf shipping and demands that the allies do more.      These concerns were heightened by the May 17 Iraqi missile attack on the U.S. frigate Stark which killed 37 seamen.     \"They died while guarding a chokepoint of freedom, deterring aggression and reaffirming America\'s willingness to protect its vital interests,\" Reagan said.         In a pre-summit speech celebrating the 40th anniversary of the Marshall Plan, Reagan, who spoke to an audience of foreign affairs experts, also pledged to push for economic expansion by West Germany and Japan to bolster the world trading system.     \"While the vibrancy of the U.S. economy has contributed enormously to the world expansion, preserving a growing world economy is the business of every member of the world trading community,\" he said.         \"It will be made clear, especially to our friends in Japan and the Federal Republic of Germany, that growth-oriented domestic policies are needed to bolster the world trading system on which they depend.\"     Reagan coupled this appeal with a call for compliance with allied accords on exchange rate stability.     \"Economic policy decisions made last year in Tokyo and at this year\'s meetings of Group of Seven finance ministers in Paris and in Washington cannot be ignored or forgotten,\" he said. \"The commitments made at these meetings need to be translated into action.\"  \n',ship
'Saudi Arabian Crown Prince Abdullah bin Abdul Aziz was thanked by the Reagan administration for his country\'s close, and closed-mouthed, cooperation with Washington in the Gulf, a senior U.S. official said.     \"The Saudis are being very cooperative. It would be nice if the Saudis would go more public, but it\'s their real estate,\" said the official who asked not to be named.     He declined to describe what sort of help the Saudis were providing, saying that Saudi officials are reluctant to acknowledge their role in the Gulf where the United States has stationed forces to protect shipping lanes.     The prince met Vice President George Bush on Monday after U.S. naval forces attacked offshore Iranian oil platforms in what Washington said was retaliation for an Iranian attack on a ship moored off Kuwait and flying the U.S. flag.     Asked at the start of the meeting how he felt about the attack, the prince, who is here on an official visit, replied, \"I believe what the United States has done is their responsibility as a superpower.\"     The senior U.S. official said his remark was an endorsement of the U.S. attack.  \n',ship
'The U.S. House of Representatives  approved a bill that requires the Reagan administration to provide Congress with a report on its Gulf policy but does not place any restrictions on its actions.     The bill passed 305-102 -- winning a necessary two-thirds of those voting -- despite a last-minute revolt by an alliance of liberal Democrats and conservative Republicans who sought to defeat it as a signal that a growing number of legislators oppose President Reagan\'s policies in the region.     The legislation was passed in the wake of the May 17th Iraqi missile attack on the U.S. frigate Stark in the Gulf, which killed 37 Americans, and Reagan\'s decision to protect 11 Kuwaiti oil tankers by putting them under U.S. flags -- effectively making them American ships.     The legislation -- supported by Congress\' Democratic and Republican leadership as well as by the administration -- required Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger to provide a report to Congress, within seven days of enactment, on plans to protect U.S. warships and flag ships in the Persian Gulf.     It did not, however, place any restrictions on the administration as it proceeds to reflag the Kuwaiti ships and thus has no immediate effect on U.S. policy.     The Senate was expected to approve the legislation this week. The bill would then be sent to Reagan for signature.     Supporters of the bill said passage of the bill was only a first step toward a greater congressional involvement in formulating policy.     But Democratic critics said the bill did not ask the administration to address tough policy questions in the report.  \n',ship
'The House today approved a bill requiring the Reagan administration to report to Congress on its Mideast Gulf policy but not restricting its actions.     The vote in favor was despite a last-minute revolt by an alliance of liberal Democrats and conservative Republicans who sought to defeat it as a signal that a growing number of legislators oppose President Reagan\'s policies in the region.     In the Senate, a leading Republican senator, former Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Mark Hatfield of Oregon, said he would try to prevent consideration of the bill.     He said he will put a so-called \"hold\" on the bill until he finds out whether the War Powers Act applies to protecting Kuwaiti tankers.     Congressional leaders complain they were not consulted about plans to put the U.S. flag on Kuwaiti ships and some charged the policy could lead the U.S. into the Iran-Iraq war.     Conservative Republicans said increasing the U.S. military obligation in the gulf would place impossible burdens on American servicemen and equipment, and warned it could lead to war.     \"It is a real snake pit at best and a powder keg that will blow sky-high at worst,\" said Wisconsin Rep. Toby Roth.      \n',ship
'American lawmakers rallied behind President Reagan for the U.S. strike against Iranian targets in the Gulf but the attack fueled a sharp new White House-Congress debate over limits on his powers to make war.     The Pentagon announced on Monday that U.S. warships destroyed a non-producing oil platform used for monitoring Gulf ship traffic and military operations, and also raided a second Iranian oil rig in retaliation for an earlier Iranian attack on a Kuwaiti ship flying the American flag.     Many Democrats, who control Congress, and Republicans expressed support for the attack and praised it as an appropriate \"measured response.\"     But Democrats and liberal Republicans voiced new fears that the growing confrontation between Tehran and the United States could erupt into a major war, and demanded that Reagan comply with the 1973 War Powers Act, which could lead to a pullout of American forces from the waterway.     \"Those who contend the strike was necessary must realize their words are easily construed as a tacit endorsement of war with Iran,\" said Sen Mark Hatfield of Oregon, a Republican.  \n',ship
'U.S. warships attacked and destroyed an Iranian oil platform on Monday in retaliation for Friday\'s Iranian attack damaging a U.S.-flagged ship, U.S. Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger said.     When asked how much was left of the oil platform, Weinberger said, \"Nothing.\"     \"There was no Iranian reaction,\" he said. \"... We consider this matter is now closed.\"     Weinberger said four U.S. destroyers attacked the platform about 120 miles east of Bahrain in the central Gulf with fire at 0700 EDT, Weinberger said.     \"We chose a platform used by the Iranians to interfere with and be a source of potential attack on convoys...,\" Weinberger said at a Pentagon briefing.      \"We know it has been used indeed, to not only launch small boat attacks on shipping but to fire on U.S. helicopters...     \"It\'s removal will contribute significantly to the safety of U.S. forces in the future,\" Weinberger said of the U.S. Navy\'s operation to escort oil tankers through the Gulf.     \"We do not seek further confrontation with Iran but we will be prepared to meet any escalation of military actions by Iran with stronger countermeasures,\" Weinberger said.     He said the 20 to 30 Iranian personnel on the oil platform were given a 20-minute warning to abandon the platform.     \"As far as we know they did abandon the site,\" he said.     Weinberger was asked why the United States had chosen to attack an oil platform rather than Iranian Silkworm missile platforms blamed by Washington for Friday\'s attack.  \n',ship
'The United States responded to an apparent escalation of Iranian rhetoric with continued assurances that its expanded military force in the Gulf would play purely a deterrent role.     \"I can only emphasize that our role there is deterrent, that we\'re going to be assuring safety for American shipping and that that shipping is not related to the war itself,\" State Department spokesman Charles Redman told reporters.     He was asked about Iranian claims that the United States was moving towards the brink of armed conflict with Iran.     Tehran Radio quoted defence spokesman Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani telling a visiting Nicaraguan delegation yesterday, \"At the moment the United States is moving towards the brink of an armed encounter with us.     \"We are not concerned about this and believe that the U.S. Presence in the war will make our nation even more serious. We are determined to stand firm and will certainly win.\"     The United States disclosed last week it was beefing up its Gulf fleet from seven to 10 warships and also sending the refurbished battleship Missouri to patrol just outside the strategic Strait of Hormuz, entrance to the Gulf.     The buildup ties in with U.S. Plans to escort Kuwaiti oil tankers which have been re-registered to fly the American flag and gain naval protection against Iranian attacks.     Asked about the Iranian rhetoric, White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said, \"We won\'t have any comment or response to the Iranian statements. Our position has been made clear about the status of events in the Gulf. We want an end to the war with no winners and no losers and any activities or statements that tend to prolong the war or increase hostilities are not helpful or welcome.\"     Redman said he could not independently confirm reports that Iran has offered to halt attacks on Gulf shipping.  \n',ship
'The leaders of a U.S. Senate team probing American defense strategy in the MidEast Gulf said they favored a multinational force to keep oil flowing through the waterway.     Sen. John Glenn and John Warner, in Kuwait as part of a Gulf Arab tour, said at a news conference that top officials in the area appeared ready to discuss extra facilities needed if the U.S. upgraded its defense role.     The Senate team next heads for the United Arab Emirates, their last stop on a fact-finding mission prompted by Reagan administration plans to let half of Kuwait\'s 22-tanker fleet fly the U.S. flag.     Glenn and Warner said the U.S., Britain and France, should explore the possibility of a unified Gulf force.     \"The American ships, the British ships, the French ships now talk to each other and all we\'ve got to do is formalize this arrangement,\" Warner said.     Glenn said a multinational force could be effectively deployed within 24 hours of a decision.     Glenn voiced a preference for a United Nations multinational force, or failing that, an American, British, French force with cooperation from the Gulf Arab states.     Warner voiced concern that the Soviet Union might use the situation in the Gulf to raise its presence. \"And, unequivocally, all GCC states we have talked with, have said that would not be in the interests of the Arabian peninsula.\"  \n',ship
'U.S. military forces in the Mideast Gulf are under orders to protect only American flag vessels and occasional U.S. arms deliveries on other ships to \"non-belligerent\" states in the area, the Pentagon said today.     \"No one has ever stated or supported a policy of protecting all shipping in those waters,\" Pentagon spokesman Bob Sims said as the Reagan Administration drew up plans to increase the protective U.S. military presence in the gulf.     Sims denied published reports that U.S. Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger sought air cover to protect all neutral shipping in the western gulf from attacks by Iran and Iraq.     \"As we have said repeatedly, only American flag vessels are under our protection with the exception, on a limited case-by-case basis, of ships carrying our Foreign Military Sales equipment to friendly, non-belligerent states in the region,\" Sims said.     U.S. warships in the gulf two weeks ago protected a Kuwaiti ship which sailed to Bahrain with U.S. arms for Bahrain and Kuwait. But Sims said Washington had received assurances that the the arms would not be used elsewhere.     He said Kuwait, which is turning 11 oil tankers over to U.S. firms to fly the American flag and be protected by the U.S. warships, is not considered a belligerent despite Iranian charges that Kuwait is supporting Iraq in the gulf war.     Kuwaiti tankers have come under repeated Iranian attack.     Sims refused to say how the United States will beef up its seven-ship Middle East Task Force in the gulf to protect the 11 Kuaiti tankers. But Pentagon officials said that additional ships and air cover are under consideration.  \n',ship
'U.S. House Speaker Jim Wright said he would question President Reagan tomorrow about his plan to protect Kuwaiti oil tankers with U.S. warships from attacks by Iran in the Gulf.     House and Senate Democrats, who control Congress, have been critical of Reagan\'s plan but have not decided how or if they should try to pass legislation to prohibit it.     Wright, a Texas Democrat, told reporters the Administration had gone ahead with plans to reflag the Kuwaiti tankers as U.S. ships without asking Congressional leaders for their advice.  \n',ship
'Confronted by new hostilities involving U.S. forces in the Gulf, the U.S. Senate voted to end Republican stalling tactics and limit debate on a measure that could give Congress a larger role in Gulf policy.     The measure, however, does not require President Reagan to comply with the 1973 War Powers Act as does a related Senate bill. The controversial War Powers Act could require a pullout of U.S. forces from the Gulf.     The Senate voted 67-28 to stop a filibuster and limit debate to 30 hours on a bipartisan measure that requires Reagan to report to Congress on Gulf policy within 60 days and calls for a resolution to be passed in the House and Senate on the situation in the volatile waterway 30 days later.     The resolution could be about any Gulf-related issue, including an expression of support or of disapproval for Reagan\'s policy of protecting 11 Kuwaiti tankers from Iran in the waterway. The Pentagon said the 12th U.S.-protected convoy began moving through the Gulf early Tuesday.  \n',ship
'The United States warned Iran again  that it was ready to retaliate for any further hostile military action in the Gulf as U.S. warships began escorting another tanker convoy southward from Kuwait.     U.S. Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger said the U.S. sought no further Gulf hostitilies but was ready to deal with any Iranian response to Monday\'s attack on an Iranian oil rig.     Several hours later, the Pentagon announced that U.S. warships had begun escorting two U.S. flag Kuwaiti tankers -- the 80,000 ton product carrier Ocean City and 46,000 ton liquified petroleum tanker Gas King -- southward from Kuwait.     The Defense Department said the 12th such convoy of U.S. flagged Kuwaiti tankers through the Gulf began at 0230 EDT under the escort by the U.S. guided missile frigate Ford. It did not say what oth U.S. warships were in the area.     \"It (the convoy) is now progressing uneventfully in the central Gulf,\" the Pentagon statement said.     Asked on NBC\'s \"Today\" program if the United States was prepared for a major war with Iran, Weinberger said, \"Well we are prepared I think for whatever eventualities emerge from this situation but we don\'t look on it as a war.\"  \n',ship
